5444546
Hollinger_Park
thumb|right|230px|Holliger Park Clock Towerthumb|right|230px|Holliger Park Playground Areathumb|right|230px|Fred Salvador Athletic FieldHollinger Park is a municipal park in Timmins, Ontario, located at the southeast corner of Algonquin Blvd. and Brunette Road (formerly Park Road).The park is located on the site of what was once Miller Lake.  The Hollinger Mine backfilled the lake with mine tailings and it was eventually beautified into one of the Citys finest parks.The park is named after Hollinger, a mining prospector whose major 1909 gold discovery further launched the Porcupine Camps early gold rush and the citys mining viability.The park, approximately one square kilometre in size, includes a regulation size baseball diamond, two soccer fields and a beach volleyball pitch. It has been home to the Timmins Mens Baseball League since 1985. Timmins native Twain performed at Hollinger Park on July 1, 1999 during her on Over Tour. An estimated 22,000 people were in attendance, making it the largest event ever to be held in the city. Other sporting and musical events have been held in the park.  In 2000, the Canadian Mounted Police Ride held a show in the park.In 1999, a large renovation of the park was started as a millennium project. A water park, a clock tower, new playground equipment and a bandstand were erected in the newly renovated park.  New trees were also planted following a large windstorm in July 1999 which knocked down many of the large willow trees that had graced the park for many years.In August 2007, the athletic grounds at Hollinger Park, the citys centrepiece recreational field, was named the Fred Salvador Athletic Field in honour of the late Fred Salvador, Sr., who served with the citys parks and recreation department for 37 years.
5453726
Temeraire_(series)
Temeraire (disambiguation)TemeraireThe Temeraire series of novels by Novik is composed of Majestys Dragon (released as Temeraire in the Kingdom), of Jade, Powder War, of Ivory, of Eagles, and of Serpents. The novels are works of both fantasy and history: they are a reimagining of the epic events of the Wars with an air force  an air force of dragons, manned by crews of aviators.() Novels *Majestys Dragon (2006) / Temeraire (UK)*of Jade (2006)*Powder War (2006)*of Ivory (2007)*of Eagles (2008)*of Serpents (2010)*Crucible of Gold (forthcoming) (scheduled for release on March 6, 2012) ()Also, In His Majestys Service is a compilation book that includes the first three books in the series.SettingThe series of books revolves around the primary characters Temeraire and Captain William Laurence. Captain Laurence is a member of the British Navy, serving in combat against Napoleons navy when he recovers a dragon egg unlike any other known to the British. The egg soon hatches, and Temeraire, a Chinese dragon, is born. Temeraire immediately leaves an impression upon Laurence, and Laurence begins to think of the dragon as his dearest friend. This forces a change in the sailors life, drawing him from the prestigious Royal Navy to the less desirable Royal Aerial Corps. The subsequent novels in the original trilogy follow the adventures of Laurence and Temeraire as they do battle with the forces of Napoleon Bonaparte and the diplomatic fallout caused by Captain Laurences adoption by the Chinese Emperor. The fourth novel deals with Laurence and Temeraire seeking a cure for a draconic illness, introduced by a North American dragon, which spreads throughout the British dragons while Napoleon seeks to press his advantage. The fifth novel is the account of Napoleons invasion of England, forcing a British retreat to Scotland, while Laurence faces with the consequences of his treason in taking the cure for the illness to the French. The sixth novel begins with in the penal colony of Australia (Laurences death sentence for treason commuted to transport to the colony), and a chase across the continent to a discovery that has far reaching consequences for the global war. List of characters  The dragons Dragons in this world are similar to dragons in many mythologies, although they are divided into different breeds, with differences in coloration, size, skeletal structure, etc. All (with the exception of sea serpents, which are probably a separate species) have wings and the ability to fly, even those that can mass up to fifty tons (this is partly due to their bodies compartments of lighter-than-air gas; weight figures represent overall mass, although a fifty-ton dragon might show a mere ten tons on a scale).Dragons are intelligent and sapient, although the degree of their intelligence varies from sufficient to understand a few words, to sufficient to compose poetry. Dragons are typically born with the ability to speak - they learn languages while still in their eggs, and can speak any language they are sufficiently exposed to during that time fluently from birth. Particularly intelligent dragons can continue to acquire languages quickly throughout their entire lives. In the wild, dragons usually have their own languages.Domesticated dragons bond with a human on hatching. The dragon and human bond when the human presents the dragon with their first meal, usually meat, and the dragon accepts it. The Chinese, who are renowned for their dragons, have a different method, however. They have another dragon take care of the hatchling and educate it until it is knowledgeable enough to choose its own companion. Both methods form a strong bond similar to filial imprinting seen in species of birds; in some cases this is reminiscent of an owner-pet relationship, and in others, a friend-friend relationship. Dragons will do anything to prevent their companions from coming to harm  in battle, dragons can be captured, forced into compliance, if their aviators are held at gunpoint or in some other way threatened. Dragons are commonly jealous of the attentions of their human companions.Because of their great longevity, dragons frequently outlive their human partners. When this happens they may take another companion (often a relative of their lost partner), or fall into depression. If they do not care to take new companions they are often sent to live in breeding grounds, providing a comfortable, albeit mundane existence.Some dragon breeds can breathe fire, or spit acidic venom, traits that are prized in countries where dragons are primarily thought of as military tools. The Chinese Celestial breed has a unique trait called the Divine Wind, a roar that can shatter wood, crack stone and cause hemorrhages at a short range. Other breeds have a variety of unique traits such as the ability to make sharp turns (British Anglewing), the ability to ingest and spew large quantities of water (Japanese Siu Riu), or the ability to see clearly at night (French Fleur-de-Nuit). Dragon classification by size HeavyweightDragons in this category are enormous, although size varies greatly between heavyweights of different breeds (2050 ton weight range).  The largest British heavyweight, the Regal Copper, weighs a maximum of 50 tons, can be up to 120 feet long (40 m) and have a wingspan of 180 feet (60 m).  A typical middling heavyweight Chinese Celestial/Imperials and the French Chanson-de-Guerre, both of which weigh in around 20-25 tons at a minimum.  The Turkish Kazilik is the only known fire-breathing heavyweight.  Heavyweight eggs are extremely valuable, often said to be more valuable than gold per pound (a Regal Copper egg is said to be worth 56,000 pounds, an enormous amount of money in the early 19th century).  Kazilik eggs command incredible value, with the British paying the Empire half a million pounds for three eggs (most of which was allocated for the Kazilik).(Powder War, p. 125.)MiddleweightMuch more common than heavyweights, these dragons make up the bulk of any countrys aerial forces.  Middleweights range in weight from 10 tons to 20 tons.  Yellow Reapers can weigh as little as 10 tons (with a maximum weight of 17 tons), making them one of the smallest middleweights.  British Parnassians are said to be large middleweights, weighing around 18 tons on average, very close to the minimum weight of a heavyweight dragon.  Middleweights are much more likely to show special offensive capabilities, such as spitting acidic venom (Longwings), or breathing fire (Flamme-de-Gloire) than heavyweights.  Middleweights tend to be faster and more agile than heavyweights, although if lacking special abilities, they are unlikely to be able to match any heavyweight in a fight.LightweightThis group is divided between courier and light-combat dragons.  Couriers are the lightest of dragons, and usually carry mail, important military messages, and royalty/VIPs.  They range in weight from a mere 2 tons (Winchester), to around 5 tons (Greyling).  Couriers also do work as scout dragons doing reconnaissance over enemy territory.  Light-combat dragons are little larger, and act as skirmishers and flank attackers against enemy formations.  They range in weight from around 6 to 9 tons, with the French Pascals Blue being a prime example of such a breed.  Lightweights exhibit more excitable behavior than do other dragons of heavier weights.  The Spanish possess a fire-breathing lightweight, the Flecha-del-Fuego (Fire Arrow), which is the rare lightweight breed that is a prime combat dragon. Dragons in society The societies of this world tend to view dragons differently.  So far only two cultures have been described in depth, but some clues have been given about the state of dragonhuman relations in the rest of the world.In BritainThe treatment of dragons in Britain seems to be indicative of the treatment they have received in the rest of Europe and the Middle East, although this may not be the case.  Draconic domestication in Britain began with the arrival of the Romans, continued in a disorderly manner with the influx of Anglo-Saxons and Vikings, and continued to the present of the series.In Britain, it was held that dragons could very easily turn feral and therefore useless (to humans).  To prevent this, properly trained aviator candidates needed to be present at the hatching of every egg.   A newly hatched dragon would speak to the nearest person suitable for bonding.  The human would then give it a name (in Britain, the names are typically chosen by school boys fond of grandiose Greek and Latin names). Newborn dragons would be very hungry, but it was said they would fly away immediately after feeding unless they willingly accepted a harness.  If the aviator could not convince the dragon to accept the harness, it would never be useful to people, except possibly as broodstock.The ceremony of bestowing a name and harnessing a dragon seems to be more of a superstitious ritual than rooted in necessity.  Some dragons have been known to name themselves and still accept harness, while feral dragons can be induced to help humans.  The elaborate naming ritual probably stems from an innate European fear of dragons.  In Britain, dragons are housed in coverts, secluded spots away from most human habitation.  The general populace is terrified of dragons, whether they are feral, friendly, or part of a foreign military.  In fact, many people in Britain can live their entire lives without meeting a dragon close up.  Because of the exclusion of the covert, aviators are looked upon as being inferior to the other branches of the military (especially because the special relation between aviator and dragon may preclude raising a family).  Dragons deemed not useful under harness (i.e. feral, depressed from death of partner, captured from another nation, etc.) are forcibly detained in secluded breeding grounds and used for broodstock.In ChinaIn China, Tian-lung (sky dragons) are treated very differently than their European counterparts.  Instead of being treated as intelligent animals, they are venerated as beings of generally equal or occasionally higher standing than humans.  Chinese dragons are not harnessed at birth.  Instead, they are raised by other dragons and are treated similarly to the children of noble families.  They attend school and can take the Confucian exams that may lead to positions in the service.  After completing their schooling, they are considered able to choose a companion for themselves.  They can then enter the military, messenger services, bureaucracy, etc. depending on their personal abilities and the tendencies of their breed.  These dragons are then paid from the Imperial treasury, can own property, and employ servants.At large, the citizens of China seem used to the large population of dragons that inhabit their land.  Dragons are used as a kind of transit; streets and other infrastructure are built large enough to accommodate them, and many vendors cater to their needs.  While some dragons, like humans, may live in relative poverty, the majority enjoy a higher degree of autonomy and self-determination to those in Europe.In FranceWhile not as fully covered as Chinese and British society in draconic relations, from observations made by Laurence and Temeraire, the dragons were originally treated similarly to the way they are treated in Britain.  In the fourth book, it is mentioned that French society, especially in terms of the military, is beginning to treat dragons along the pattern of Chinese society, with many Parisian streets being widened for dragon use under Napoleons orders.In AfricaUntil the fourth novel, it was presented that dragons living in Africa were believed to be primarily feral (at least by European standards).  Many European courier dragons disappeared just from trying to find shelter on African shores. In of Ivory, it is revealed that some sub-Saharan tribes such as the Sotho and Tswana practice a form of ancestor-worship wherein notable ancestors may be reincarnated in draconic form. The practice in Africa consists of ritual and song praising the ancestors deeds and life. Performing these rituals around an incubating egg imprints these traits on the dragon, identifying the dragons personality with that of the ancestor. The Tswana Empire is led by one such dragon-king. Dragons also protect and work with the tribe members (their children), performing military actions and tasks that would often be associated with technology in other cultures, such as deep mining. In other parts of the world So far, only a few clues have been released about this topic.  These tidbits are included below.*Americas: The Incas seem to live with dragons, but little has been revealed of their society.  Likewise, the natives of the North American Plains have dragons that are always accompanied by a single rider rather than a whole crew as in Europe.*Japan: It is stated that Dragons in Japan tend to be bred for traits useful in combat, such as breathing fire.*Europe: Seems to have followed lines of development very close to those in Britain. Recently, France has begun to adopt the Chinese norm.*Ottoman Empire: As in Europe, dragons are used primarily for military purposes, although in the lax nature of the late Empire, they did not see much action other than guarding city gates, acting as border patrols, and the common courier duty.  Dragons do seem to be more in evidence in the city of Istanbul, and guard the palace of the Sultan.*Russia: It is implied that Dragons are treated much worse in Russia than in other European nations though specifics are not gone into.*Australia: It is stated that there are no Dragons in New South Wales (i.e., Australia).  however in the sixth book, Tongues of Serpents, a new species similar in nature to modern geckos in the desert, is discovered. They are referred to by the natives as Bunyips. They are about the size of a courier dragon and burrow beneath the sand to capture their prey through means of a sort of trap door. They also show signs of significant intelligenceFeral dragon societyAlthough many human authors in this world seem unaware of the fact, dragons in the wild seem to have their own unique society.  They have languages unique to their species; one such language, spoken in Asia, is called Durzagh.  Feral dragons may band together in small groups or live in a solitary manner depending on their inclination.  They also may have their own tradition, consisting of story-telling accompanied by elaborate pantomime. Film version Hollywood Reporter reports that Jackson, who is best known  for directing the Lord of the Rings trilogy and King Kong, has optioned the rights to the series. Jackson added that Temeraire is a terrific meld of two genres that I particularly love  fantasy and historical epic. I cant wait to see Napoleonic battles fought with a squadron of dragons. Thats what I go to the movies for.()On July 24, 2009 in an interview with IGN, Jackson stated that he has considered making the story as a mini-series, as he is worried that if the first movie would flop at the box office, it would put the story at a full stop and leave it incomplete.(http://movies.ign.com/articles/100/1007061p1.html) References External links* Naomi Noviks personal website* The Temeraire WikiFeuerreiter Seiner Majesttja:(cykl fantasy)
5463240
Schneeberg,_Saxony
Schneeberg is a town in Saxonys district of Erzgebirgskreis. It has roughly 16,400 inhabitants and belongs to the Town League of Silberberg (Stdtebund Silberberg). It lies 4 km west of Aue, and  southeast of Zwickau. Geography  Location Schneeberg lies on the Silver Road in the upper western Mountains. Visible from afar is its prominent St. Wolfgangskirche (church). The town core lies on the Schneeberg, which reaches 470 m above level and is also the towns namesake. Among the surrounding peaks are the Gleesberg (593 m) to the east and the Keilberg (557 m) to the north.thumb|none|400px|View of the town from the southwest History thumb|Marketplace with Town Hallthumb|Town HallSchneebergs more than 500-year-long history has been shaped by mining more than anything else, laying the very groundwork for the towns founding. The original silver mining also yielded cobalt and bismuth mining by the mid 16th century. When uranium mining was being undertaken between 1946 and 1958, the towns population quickly rose, leading to Schneebergs status as a district-free town (kreisfreie Stadt) between 1952 and 1958. Afterwards it once again belonged to the district of Aue. Amalgamations * 1939 Bergstadt Neustdtel, near which lies the popular outing destinations Gleesberg and Filzteich* 1952 Community of Griesbach, northwest of Schneeberg* 1999 Community of Lindenau Population development Development of population figures (as of 1960 on 31 December):1 29 October2 31 August Culture and sightseeing |thumb|St. WolfgangskircheThe St. Wolfgangskirche is one of the biggest and architecturally most mature churches built in the Gothic style, and is an earlier type of Reformation church construction. Inside are found works by Cranach the Elder and the Crodel family of painters, whom the Krodel-Brunnen (fountain), demolished in late 2005, commemorated.Among the other sights to be seen are the neo-Gothic Town Hall, newly built in the mid 19th century, various Baroque buildings and mining memorials. Economy and infrastructure  Transport In Schneeberg ends Bundesstrae (Federal Highway) 93 from Leipzig, which once led further, across the border, to Karlsbad (now Vary in the Republic). Furthermore, Bundesstrae 169 runs through the town from Plauen to Chemnitz.From 1859 to 1952, the town had a railway connection afforded by a 5-km-long spur leading to Niederschlema on the Zwickau-Schwarzenberg-Johanngeorgenstadt-Karlsbad railway line. State institutions Schneeberg is until 31 March 2008 headquarters of the Bundeswehrs Gebirgsjgerbataillon (Mountain Rangers Battalion) 571 and Versorgungskompanie (Supply Company) 370. Education Schneeberg had at its disposal a lyceum, out of which grew a Gymnasium. Moreover, the town was home to a lace tatting school, an school, a vocational Gymnasium and a teachers college. Schneebergs Johann-Gottfried-Herder Gymnasium was chosen in 2004-2005 as Saxonys best Gymnasium in the course of a study by the magazine Capital. It enjoys an outstanding reputation even beyond Germanys borders. Famous people  Honorary citizens * 2002 - Werner Unger (b. 1922), Heimatforscher (homeland researcher)* 1992 - Walter Rau (1909-1992), educator* 1991 - Gerhard Heilfurth (1909-2006), folklorist* 1985 - Werner Kempf (1925-1999), painter* 1981 - Karl Schreiter (1903-2001), fireman* 1965 - Artur Gnther (1885-1974), Heimatforscher and municipal politician Sons and daughters of the town * Hans Schenck (about 1500- about 1566), sculptor in Berlin* Musculus (1514-1581), professor at the University of an der Oder and Generalsuperintendent of the of Brandenburg* Ambrosius Lobwasser (1515-1585), humanistic writer and translator* Kaspar Eberhard (1523-1575), Lutheran theologian and educator* Petrus Albinus (1543-1598), vice chancellor of the University of Wittenberg and Electorate of Saxony historian* Veit Hans Schnorr von Carolsfeld (1644-1715), ironworker and founder of Carlsfeld* Karl Gottlob Hofmann (1703-1774), Lutheran theologian and historian* Christian Friedrich Brendel (1776-1861), mining engineer* Stlzel (1777-1844), musician* Christoph Friedrich Otto (17831856), gardener and botanist* Christian Friedrich Rder (1827-1900), headmaster, Ore Mountain poet and singer* Otto Schill (1838-1918), jurist and municipal politician in Leipzig* Prof. Christian Hermann Walde (1855-1906), vocational school headmaster  in Saxony and Silesia, textbook author* Edwin Bauersachs (1893-1948), Ore Mountain dialect poet* Armin Gnther (1924-2003), footballer with SC Wismut Karl-Marx-Stadt* Gnther (* 1927), German film director* Kern (b. 1979), German footballer with Hansa Rostock Famous people who have worked locally * Peter Weidenhammer (about 1480about 1540), alchemist, introduced blue dye making into the Ore Mountains* Andreas Reinhard (15711613), master arithmetician and writer of a textbook for mathematical instruction* Johann Bhme (1623-1663), sculptor* Christoph Gottlieb Grundig (17071780), clergyman, naturalist, writer* August Geitner (17831852), chemist, physician and inventor of German silver* Julius Paufler (1834-1901), town councillor, head of the lace tatting model school, royal lace tatting school inspector for Saxonys municipal lace tatting schools * Carl Schumann (1801-1849), book printer and publisher, composer Schumanns brother* Siber (1516-1584), German humanist and educator Partner towns Schneebergs partner towns are:* Herten in Rhine-Westphalia* Veresegyhz in Hungary References  External links * Schneebergs website* website of the mining brotherhood Schneeberger Bergparade e. V.(Erzgebirge)(Erzgebirge)(Saksimaa)es:Schneeberg(Ercmontaro)()(Saxe)(Sassonia)(Erzgebirge)(Saksonia)(Saxnia)(Erzgebirge)( )()(Sachsen)Saxony
5473585
Russ_Weeks
 footnotes Russ Weeks (born May 12, 1942()) is a former Republican State Senator from Virginia the 9th Senatorial District. Weeks was elected in 2002, defeating Senate Judiciary Chairman Wooton. Weeks had not served in public office prior to being elected. He was defeated in 2006. He was the Republican nominee for 2008 West Virginia gubernatorial election.Born May 12, 1942 to Jeanette Weeks and Russ Weeks, Sr. in West Virginia, he is a lifelong resident of the city. He has a sister, Pat W. George RN BSN, and a brother, Tom Weeks. He is married to the former Helen C. Peterson with whom he had two children, Sharon and Russ Weeks III. The couple has three grandchildren.Weeks did not graduate from public schools, but he began working to help support his mother and siblings. He enlisted in the US military and served in Vietnam, commanding a boat in the Delta. Returning to Beckley, he became a leader in the to Life organization. This advocacy spurred his interest in seeking public office. Weeks won the 2002 election.  Russ Weeks (R) 9,982Bill Wooton (D) 9,340His committees once included: Judiciary, Government Organization, Health and Human Resources,Military, Energy, Industry and Mining, and Agriculture.Weeks was defeated for re-election in November 2006 by Democrat Mike Green.In January 2008 it was learned that Weeks was planning to challenge incumbent Governor Manchin in the 2008 election. Russ lost the election to Joe Manchin.See also*of members of the 77th West Virginia Senate*Virginia gubernatorial election, 2008External links*West Virginia LegislatureReferences
5487006
Energy_Resources_of_Australia
thumb|right|250px|The Ranger uranium mine of Energy Resources of AustraliaEnergy Resources of Australia Ltd () is a public company based in Australia. It is a subsidiary of the Tinto Group which owns 68.4% of the company. The chairman is Klingner and executive officer is Kenyon-Slaney.()ERA is the worlds third-largest uranium producer, through the Uranium Mine in the Territory. It also owns the nearby Jabiluka ore body 20 km further north, which has not been mined.()In 2009, ERA produced 5,240 tonnes of oxide.()See also*mining controversy in Kakadu National Park*in the environment*Margarula*KatonaReferencesExternal links*Energy Resources of Australia official website*Uranium mining and the question of corporate social responsibilityResources of Australia
5495622
So_Thom_das_Letras
So Thom das Letras is a small town in the south-end of Gerais state in southeastern Brazil, 35 km east of Coraes city. Its population in 2008 was of 6,880 inhabitants.Economic activitiesThe major economic activity is stone mining and natural tourism deeply focused on the alternative lifestyle. So Thom das Letras has a large number of waterfalls, natural jungle (known as Atlntica) and cave systems.HistoryThe name of the town was based in a legend of a black slave that found a statue of Saint Thomas with a letter of perfect writing and superb caligraph (impossible to an illiterate, untrained slave), in a grotto, after fleeing the plantation farm where he was kept captive, belonging to the powerful Baron of Alfenas (a rich landlord). Such fact generated the posterior emancipation of the slave from its owner, who was greatly amazed by the facts and story the slave brought to him. The baron afterwards commanded the construction of a church beside of the related grotto, that today meets in what it is the center of So Thom das Letras.Geological FeaturesSo Thom das Letras is a typically provincial locality, built on a wide mineral quartzite deposit - known as rock-of-saint-thome (widely used in the edge pavement of swimming pools) that they had been used in the construction of some houses in the town, the stone pavement of the streets and currently heavily used in the elaboration of local handcrafts, like small houses made of rock sold as souvenir to tourists. Its privileged localization with its rustic and typically mineiro countryside style, in point mountainous and raised the 1,440 meters above sea level (allowing the view of practically an all the enclosed region around, valleys and mountains), makes with that the town is preferred destination of many enthusiastic tourists of the nature and people who likes arts in general, having been also scene for an old novel of the extinct Manchete TV, called Pantanal.There are a lot of must be seen attrations: the Grotto of So Thom, Carimbado Grotto, Pyramid House (a mysterious and them-currently abandoned Scorpio-shaped quartzite house), rock formations - of the Witch it is most famous, constructions in rock and the waterfalls - Shangri-l, Eubiose, Veil of Fianc (Vu da Noiva), Paradise and of the Moon, among others.MysticismSome believe that So Thom das Letras is one of the seven energy points of the Earth, which is a main attration for mystics, spiritualists, scientific and alternative societies. All those elements give to the town the title of  Mystic. The town most famous legend regards a mystical character named Chico Taquara, that the locales believe to have control on animals and that vanished inside the Carimbado cave long ago. Its not unusual to hear about UFO sightings, many people most of them tourists usually go to the top of the hill nearby the Casa da Piramide looking for UFOs signs or any phenomenons in the sky.Thom das LetrasThom das LetrasThom das Letras  Thom das LetrasThom das LetrasThom das LetrasThom das LetrasThom das LetrasThom das LetrasThom das Letrasru:---Thom das LetrasThom das Letras
5510704
La_Quemada
La Quemada is a Mesoamerican archeological site, also known (according to different versions) as Chicomztoc.(Chicomoztoc is the name of the mythical place of origin for Aztecs, Mexicas, Tepanecs, Acolhuas and other Nahuatl (or Nahua) speaking peoples from Mesoamerica, in the central region during the Postclassical period. Other versions locate this mythical place in Culhuacan (of Mexico), Culiacn (Guanajuato), etc.)( ) It is located in the Villanueva Municipality, in the state of Zacatecas, about 56 kilometers south of the city of Zacatecas on Federal Highway 54 ZacatecasGuadalajara, in Mexico.  History Given the distance between La Quemada and the center of Mesoamerica, this archeological zone has been subject of different interpretations on the part of historians and archeologists, who have attempted to associate it with different cultures.It is supposed that this place could be the legendary Chicomostoc, a Caxcan site, a Teotihuacn fortress, a Tarascan center, a fort against Chichimeca intruders, a Toltec trading post, or simply consequence of independent development and a city of all the native groups established north of the Grande de Santiago.In 1615, Juan de Torquemada identified La Quemada as one of the places visited by the Aztecs during their migration from the north to the Mexico central plateau, and where older people and children were left behind. Javier Clavijero, in 1780, associated this site with Chicomoztoc, where the Aztecs remained for nine years during their voyage to Anahuac. This speculation originated the belief La Quemada is the mythical place called The Seven Caves. Archeological investigations since the 1980s determined that La Quemada developed between 300 and 1200 AD (Classical and early Postclassical periods) and that it was contemporaneous of the Chalchihuites culture, characterized from the first century of our era, by intense mining activity. La Quemada, Las Ventanas(Archaeological site located in the Can de Juchipila, Zacatecas) El Ixtepete, major settlements in the Altos de Jalisco, and northern Guanajuato, formed a trade network linked to Teotihuacn (350-700 AD), that extended from northern Zacatecas to the Valley of Mexico.It is possible that links established by Teotihuacn were with local rulers of ceremonial centers, of the mentioned network, or through alliances with regional intermediaries, or by small Teotihuacn merchants groups, living in these centers, that ensured the various products flow, such as minerals, salt, shells, quills, obsidian, and peyote, among others.Between 700 and 1100 AD, La Quemada did not participate as a network member, but as the dominant trade location at the regional level, it began to compete with other neighboring sites. It was during this time that the site acquired a defensive character, evidence of which is the construction, on the north flank of the site, of a wall approximately four meters high by four meters wide, as well as the elimination of two stairways in the complex with the intention of restricting internal circulation.From the evidence of fire in several parts of the site, a violent decline of the settlement is inferred. It is this apparent destruction by fire which gives the site its name of la (ciudad) quemada, the burnt city.The siteLa Quemada is made up of numerous different size masonry platforms built onto the hill, these were foundations for structures built over them. On the south and southeastern sides is a high concentration of ceremonial constructions, some of which are complexes made up of sunken patio platforms and altar-pyramid, a typical Mesoamerican architectonic attribute.On the west side is a series of platforms or terraces, apparently more residential structures than ceremonial. All architectonic elements of La Quemada were constructed with rhyolite (volcanic effusive rock of the granite family) slabs, extracted from the hill located northeast of the Pyramid.To build the structures and join the slabs a clay and vegetal fiber mortar was used, as it degrades and erodes in time, it caused wall deterioration. Over the masonry walls several clay stucco layers were applied, currently only a few samples of original finishing remain.Studies made to date, provide basis to determine that the monumental complex was constructed at different times. It is known that the structures built were constructed over previous constructions, which were covered by later constructive stages.If the total elements of this site are considered, from the extensive roads and the numerous smaller sites linked to La Quemada, this is a singular archaeological site in the context of mesoamerican sites.Structuresright|thumb|300px|Votive PyramidThe archaeological zone is divided in three complexes: the Ciudadela with a wall that surrounds the north side of the site (800m long, 4m wide and 4m high); the Palace located in the central part of the hill and the Temple located in the south end.() Saln de las ColumnasColumns Hall. This 41 by 32 meter enclosure, probably reached a height of more than five meters before the fire that caused its destruction. In their interior eleven columns supported the roof. Until now its specific function is not known. Although works made in the 1950s indicate a ceremonial use possibly related to human sacrifice.( ) Calzada MayorMain Avenue. This esplanade extends about 400 meters from the plaza in front of the Columns Hall, where many smaller dimension roads initiate that cross the Malpaso Valley. In order to construct this road, as well as the majority of other roads, side walls were built of stone slabs and stone; later the area in between the walls was covered with stone slabs and a pavement made of clay and pebbles. If the proportion of this element with respect to other dimensions of the site is considered, its size is remarkable. In addition, there are vestiges to two altars at the main entrance end. Recent studies confirm the existence of more than 170 kilometers of roads that cross the valley and interconnect several other smaller archaeological sites.(Juego de PelotaBallgame Court. This structure, of mesoamerican features, was constructed on an enormous platform that extends from the north of the Votive Pyramid throughout the access stairway at the south slope of the court. It measures 70 by 15 meters and it displays the characteristic letter I shape; the side walls are as wide as those of the Columns Hall (2.70 meters) and assumed a height of between three and five meters.( As is the case in almost all archaeological sites in Mexico, this site has had vandalism.Pirmide Votiva Votive Pyramid. This structure, more than 10 meters high, is highlighted by the angle of its slopes. During Corona Nuez works, in 1995, slope vestiges with remains of a stairway were found, that ascended the south side of the pyramid. With time the middle and top parts crumbled to the ground, where they can be seen at the present time. Originally, the stairway reached the top of the pyramid where a room or temple constructed with perishable materials apparently existed.(EscalinataStairway. At about 30 meters west of the Votive Pyramid this stairway was discovered, was used as main access to the top levels of the site. It was constructed in two stages; the first, that approximately reached the middle of the height now observed, apparently it was round shape, and can be associated with shapes of now missing structures; the second, built over the former and with greater height, it reached the walkway on the second level, evidence shows ties with a two ramp stairway that ascended to the third level. At a point in time the main stairway was canceled, by defense reasons by means of the retaining wall, limiting access.(Other platformsIn the third level sector of the site, on the west side of the hill, are numerous platforms or terraces that, according to recent investigation works are residential areas; to date 25 structures constructed towards 650 AD, have been identified.(MurallaThis wall (Muralla is the protective perimeter wall) is emphasized, by its dimensions (four meters high by three meters thick) as well as by its location on edges of the cliffs surrounding the north and northeast parts of the site. Apparently this structure was constructed towards the end of the occupation of La Quemada and, perhaps, it represents one of the best indicators of the problems faced by city residents as well as their perseverance to remain there.(CiudadelaLocated at the highest part of the site,(, several buildings have been identified, possibly used for ceremonial and defensive purposes.(El CuartelHeadquarters. This structure probably was used to build houses. Reportedly, the roof caught fire and collapsed. The reference web page has photographs.(.( )  Pirmide de los SacrificiosSacrifices pyramid, Structure and terrace 18. It is believed that human sacrifices for the gods were conducted here. Presumably young women and children. (Photographs at the referenced web page, courtesy of Ricardo Espejel)((Site museum Located in the archaeological zone, its architectonic design was conceived such that it integrates to the surrounding landscape and the archaeological site by the use of material characteristic of the buildings constructed in the site (stone slabs, stucco and finishing). This museum offers a panorama of the region archaeological evolution through diverse informative elements, a site scale model and descriptive videos of the main prehispanic settlements in Zacatecas: Loma San Gabriel, Chalchihuites and of course La Quemada.( )NotesReferences* Chicomoztoc - La Quemada, Zacatecas. Ricardo Espejel Cruz, 2003  2005.QuemadaQuemadaQuemadaru:-Quemada
5516555
Max_Bell
George Maxwell Max Bell (October 13, 1912  July 19, 1972) was a Canadian newspaper publisher, race horse owner and philanthropist. He was best known as the co-founder of FP Publications, Canadas largest newspaper syndicate in the 1960s.  He built his newspaper empire after inheriting the Albertan, and its $500,000 debt, from his father in 1936.  He repaid debt by 1945 and proceeded to purchase papers across the country, including the Citizen and the and Mail.  Much of Bells fortune was built on Albertas burgeoning oil and gas industry.  He formed several companies in the late 1940s that came to be worth millions of dollars when sold.Bell was a long time owner of thoroughbred race horses.  He partnered with Frank McMahon to form two stables that won races across Canada, the United States and Europe.  The pair joined with singer Crosby to win the Derby in 1965 while he and McMahon won the 1968 Plate.  Bell was a part owner of several race tracks, including Park, of which he became the first Canadian president. A noted philanthropist, he established the Max Bell Foundation shortly before his death, which has awarded millions of dollars in grants for medical, veterinary, sporting and educational causes.Early lifeBell was born October 13, 1912 in Saskatchewan.  He was the son of Melrose Bell and Edna Mae Parkin and had one brother, Gordon and two sisters, Audrey and Olive.()  His grandfather, Alexander Bell was a Canadian pioneer and Liberal minister in the Assembly of Saskatchewan.  His father earned his fortune selling insurance and owned several newspapers and periodicals before losing much of his wealth investing in mining and oil.(Gray, 2004, p. 190)Bell earned a degree in commerce from Montreals University during the Depression while working for his father at the Albertan newspaper during his summers.( After graduating in 1932, Bell moved to British Columbia where he unsuccessfully attempted to prospect for gold in the Kootenays for a time and played two seasons of hockey with the Kimberley Dynamiters.  He met and married his first wife, Suzanne Staples, during this time and in 1935 returned to Calgary.(Gray, 2004, p. 191) He returned to the Albertan, earning $35 per week as the classified advertising manager.  Bell inherited the paper upon his fathers death in 1936, however control of the Albertan was under the control of the Bank of Canada against $500,000 in loans that the elder Bell had made.()Additionally, Bell invested in an well near Valley, Alberta.  When the well struck oil in mid 1936, the income from his one percent share was double that of his newspaper salary.(Newspaper careerDespite the oil strike, Bell continued to work for the Royal Bank at the Albertan.  After seven years of what he called clerking for the paper, he made a bid to regain his familys control of the paper.  He convinced five friends in the oil and gas industry to form the Essex Company and put up $35,000 to operate the paper.(Gray, 2004, p. 192)  He then convinced the Royal Bank to give him control of the paper, and in mid-1943, was made publisher of the Albertan.(  Under Bells leadership, the paper returned to profitability, prompting the partners in Essex to raise his salary to $85 per week.(  Within three years, Bell was able to repay both his parners in Essex and purchase full control of the paper from the bank.() Almost immediately after repaying his partners, Bell convinced them to purchase the Bulletin. However, Bell lacked the capital to support the paper that was strife with labour difficulties and old equipment that required replacing.  He made the decision to fold the paper in 1951.(Gray, 2004, p. 193)While he worked to regain control of the Albertan, Bell also continued to invest in oil ventures.  He partnered with Frank McMahon and others in forming Empire Petroleum Limited in 1944, an unsuccessful attempt a raising enough capital to drill a wildcat well. Two years later he tried again with two new companies, Reef Petroleum and Tower Petroleum.  The two companies also failed to find oil, but the efforts raised enough money for Bell and his partners to form Calvan Petroleums on the heels of Oils discovery of a large oil field at Alberta.(  The company found success trading in leases and drilling rights on land, prompting Bell to form several other oil companies in the years that followed.  In 1951, Bell amalgamated his various companies into Calvan Consolidated Ltd.  The new company held an interest in 77 wells at the Redwater field.(Gray, 2004, p. 195) He sold Calvan to Petrofina in 1955 for $40 million, and while he continued to trade in oil and gas companies for several years, his focus returned to the newspaper business.(Gray, 2004, p. 196)Bell purchased the Victoria Times in 1959 for $750,000, and one year later built a plant to print both the Times and The Colonist, which he gained control of in 1953 for $1 million. In 1954, Bell acquired a controlling interest in the Herald.(  He had a habit of appearing unannounced at the offices of his papers, often to chat with the editors, but never told them what to print.(Byfield, 2001, p. 46)  Bell continued to acquire newspapers, joining with Victor Sifton, owner of the Free Press to purchase the Citizen in 1959.  The pair combined their interests to form FP (Federated Paper) Publications Ltd. that same year.  Bell purchased the Sun in 1963, and Torontos and Mail in 1965, making FP Publications Canadas largest newspaper syndicate.(  By 1972, the papers had a combined circulation of over 820,000.(Acquisitions outside the newspaper industry followed.  Bell led a group that attempted to gain control of the Bay Company in 1950. At the time, the bid was thought to have been motivated by the land and mineral rights that the company controlled, but thwarted by company bylaws that prevented the transfer of such rights.() It was later suggested that Bell backed out of the deal in the belief that the company would struggle to adapt to his ideas.(  By 1965, Bell was the largest single shareholder in Pacific Railway (CPR).()In addition to serving as a director for the CPR, Bell was also director for the Bank of Nova Scotia, was a member of the board of governors at McGill and was a senior director of the Calgary Exhibition and Stampede.(Thoroughbred horse racingA longtime thoroughbred racing enthusiast, Bell met future jockey Longden as a young man in Calgary,( and later bought a horse from Longden, Mac Aurelius, whose victory in a Regina claiming race fueled Bells interest in the sport.() He invested in several ranches and was at least part-owner in three race tracks, including Park, where he was the tracks first Canadian president.(Bell partnered with Frank McMahon to form West Farms near Alberta,( and the pair joined with Longden and Wilder Ripley in 1952 to form Ranches, Ltd., which raced in California.( The stables won numerous races throughout North America, as well as England and Ireland.(  Among Bell and McMahons biggest successes was Four-and-Twenty, whose victories included the 1961 Anita Derby,() and the Derby.(Among his biggest victories, Bell won the 1965 Derby with the colt Court, whom he had sold one-third shares of ownership to McMahon and Crosby just prior to the race.()  Meadow Court then won two more races before being retired to stud following the season.  The horse, purchased by Bell for $9,000 won over $280,000 in purses before being sold for over $1.2 million.(Gray, 2004, p. 197) He and McMahon won the 1968 Plate with Merger.()Max Bell was inducted into the Horse Racing Hall of Fame in 1977.(Personal lifeBells marriage to Suzanne ended in 1949.  The couple had four children: sons Chester (died 1970) and Paul, and daughters Diane and Gretchen.(  He later married Frank McMahons daughter-in-law Agnes, who was widowed when her husband Frank Jr. was killed in an automobile accident in 1953.(  The family maintained a winter home in Desert, California and a ranch in Okotoks.( An ardent member of the Presbyterian Church, Bell was said to have read the Bible as often as his weekly horse racing forms.(  He neither drank nor smoked, and was a generous donor to his church.(Byfield, 2001, p. 47) He enjoyed playing golf and badminton,( and frequently sailed his yacht, Campana, throughout the area around Vancouver Island and used it to ferry politicians and businessmen to a special forum on Canadian-American relations which he organized in 1959.(Gray, 2004, p. 198)  Bell was a supporter of organized sport at several levels and helped finance the Canucks entry into the Hockey League.(Bell fell ill to a neurological illness in 1967 that resulted in numerous surgeries over the following five years. He died on July 19, 1972, at the Neurological Institute.(  Shortly before his death, he created the Max Bell Foundation and funded it with $17 million of FP Publications stock.  Within 30 years, the foundations assets had grown to $55 million in addition to over $65 million distributed as part of 200 grants across the nation.  Thirty percent of the grants go to McGill University, half to the Faculty of Medicine specifically, while the foundation focuses its grants on health care, veterinary medicine and education.  Capital grants have also helped to fund several facilities throughout western Canada, including Calgarys Bell Centre.(References;Footnotes;General**External links* Max Bell Foundation biography* George Maxwell Bell at Canadian Encyclopedia 
5524830
Pisonia_grandis
Pisonia grandis is a species of flowering tree in the Bougainvillea family, Nyctaginaceae.DescriptionThe tree has broad, thin leaves, smooth bark and bears clusters of green sweet-smelling flowers that mature into sticky barbed seeds. Dispersal occurs when seeds stick to bird feathers. reproduction frequently results when fallen branches sprout or shoots develop into new trees.DistributionPisonia trees are distributed throughout the coral cays of the Indian and Oceans. The species often dominates mature coral cay vegetation, growing in dense stands up to  tall. Pisonia wood is rather weak and soft and decays rapidly when the trees fall.Pisonia forests are a common nesting site for seabirds. One of the best remaining Pisonia forests can be found on Atoll.Pierre Island, Group, was once covered by a Pisonia grandis forest. This forest disappeared after guano mining between 1906 and 1972. The natural vegetation had to be destroyed in order to scrape the guano and the islands landscape became barren.( (1961): Notes on some of the Seychelles Islands, Indian Ocean. Atoll Research Bulletin 83: 1-10. PDF fulltext)UsesThe leaves are traditionally used as a leaf vegetable in some countries.(Capricornia Cuisine: Bush Tucker in Central Queensland)ReferencesExternal links* Nature Seychelles - Seabird deaths caused by P. grandis. Accessed 11 May 2007.grandisMengkudu Siamgrandisto:Puko
5535607
Calver_Hill
File:Calver Hill from Fremington Edge.jpg|thumb|right|260px|Calver Hill seen from the east, from Edge on the opposite side of lower Arkengarthdale. The Arkle Beck can be seen in the valley bottom as it flows down towards Reeth to join the Swale seen from the south, across Swaledale, with Healaugh to the right of the picture and Fremington Edge beyondCalver Hill is a fell in the Yorkshire Dales National Park in Yorkshire, England. It composed of limestone(The Rivers, Mountains and Sea Coast of Yorkshire, John Phillips, States that Calver Hill is composed of limestone.) and is situated at grid reference , near where the valleys of Swaledale and Arkengarthdale meet, the village of Reeth is located on its lower south eastern slopes, it reaches an altitude of 487 metres (1,599 feet) and is a distinguished feature in mid Swaledale. Calver Hill is an area of grouse shooting and the fell is dotted with grouse butts. Most of the drainage from the fell goes north and easterly to join the Arkle Beck in lower Arkengarthdale which eventually joins the River Swale just south of Reeth.Industrial pastOlder versions of the 1:25000 Survey map show a point at the summit of Calver Hill but all there is now is a pile of rubble and mining spoil to form a summit cairn. The fell is littered with signs of Calver Hills industrial past; there is a large disused quarry 500 metres north west of the summit cairn, there are also disused tips, pits and shafts from former lead mines. Lead mining reached its heyday in the 19th century in this area and they were some of the most productive mines in Yorkshire. Calver Hill was a hill a place where the lead from the mines was smelted in an open air furnace which used the prevailing wind to increase the heat. Burnt stones and a scattering of slag show the locations of these furnaces.(Industry in the Landscape 1700 - 1900, Marilyn Palmer & Peter Neaverson, ISBN 0415112060 Gives information on lead smelting.)(Ordnance Survey Outdoor Leisure Map 30 (Yorkshire Dales North & Central), ISBN 0319236617  Gives information on quarrying and mining locations.)WalksCalver Hill can be climbed from Reeth or from Langthwaite and Town in Arkengarthdale. From Reeth, Skelgate Lane is taken from just to the west of the village, this climbs through farmland until the open fell is reached at a height of 300 metres, the western ridge is then followed to the summit of the fell. From Arkengarthdale, the Arkle Town to Healaugh bridleway can be used to attain the western ridge at a height of 420 metres; it is then a simple walk to reach the top.References
5542777
Royal_Military_College_(Malaysia)
The Royal Military College (also known as RMC is a school in Malaysia. The RMC campus covers an area of  near the town of Besi (about 10 miles (16 km) from Lumpur) with a view of the Mines Resort and the Commonwealth Games Jalil Stadium. RMC shares its grounds with the Defence University of Malaysia. In the language, it is known as Maktab Tentera Diraja. A current student of RMC is known as a Present Putera, while a graduate of the institution is known as an Old Putera or OP in short. The term Putera, literally meaning prince in Malay, is attributed to the RMCs royal status.CharterThe Charter of the Royal Military College says that the Royal Military College has been established with the objective of preparing young Malaysians to take places as Officers in the Armed Forces, in the higher divisions of the public service and as leaders in the professional, commercial and industrial life of the country.The motto of the college is Serve to Lead or Berkhidmat Memimpin.Sportsmans PrayerThe Sportsmans Prayer is inscribed on a bronze plaque, on a white rock that sits by the rugby field in the college compound.The Sportsmans Prayer is traditionally recited before a sporting competition by the members of a team. The prayer is as follows:Oh God, please help me to win for I always want to win. But if in thy inscrutable wisdom Thou willest me not to win, then make me a good loser. For when the one great scorer comes to write against your name, he writes not that you won or lost, but how you played the game. HistoryPrior to 1952, there had been what was called the Training Depot of the Malay Regiment in Dickson. Here courses were held in signals, tactics and military administration. The Depot also provide educational facilities to bring selected members of the Regiment up to the necessary academic standard for acceptance at the Royal Military Academy, Sandhurst, for higher military training, with a view to qualifying for commissioned rank.thumb|A passing-out parade at the RMCs marching grounds, also known as the parade square. The building in the foreground is the Tun Templer Hall.On 3 July 1952, Mr. David, the of Defence, in the Federal Legislative Council Meeting, announced the decision to expand the Malay Regiment Training Depot. The expansion was to result in the formation of  The Malay Regiment Training Center, that was to constitute two additional sections: The Pre-Officer Cadet Training Unit (Pre-OCTU) and an inter-racial Boys Company.The Boys Company was to be part of the Army, serving the Malay Regiment and the Federation Regiment. The function of the Boys Company was to provide education to sons of serving officers and other ranks in the Malay Regiment, leading to the School Certificate level, coupled with the rudiments of military training.The first intake of 74 Boys into the Boys Company were recruited in August 1952, from a total of 100 applicants. The ages of the Boys ranged between 14 and 15 years. Their educational qualification, according to a 1952 newspaper buletin, was to be the equivalent of Standard 4 (English-medium). In addition to these academic requirements those who were shortlisted had to undergo various aptitude tests too.The task of looking after the academic aspects in the Boys Wing was entrusted to a Director of Studies (DOS)  a civilian Senior Education Officer. He was responsible to the Commandant for carrying out the scholastic policy drawn by the of Governors of the College and thus adviser to the Commandant on general educational policies. The DOS had two Senior-Assistants each responsible for the teaching of a group of subjects  called the Head of Science and Mathematics (HOS) and Head of Arts (HOA).For the purpose of military training, and the co-ordination of domestics military administration required within the Boys Wing, an Officer-in-Charge (O.C.) (later to be known as Chief Instructor - CI) was posted. He was responsible to the Director of Studies (DOS) and thus ultimately to the Commandant.In September 1954, the Commemoration Foundation Day was celebrated. Present to witness the Commemoration Day Parade were the High Commissioner, Sir MacGillivray, His Highness, the of Selangor, the di-Pertuan Besar of Negeri Sembilan, The Prime Minister Abdul Rahman, Deputy Prime Minister Abdul Razak and a large number of dignitaries.thumb|The conferment of the Royal Colours to the college by HM the King of MalaysiaIn 1958, reports of a proposed $20 million cantonment, covering an area of , to be located near Sungai Besi (about  from Lumpur) began appearing in local press. The entire project, expected to be completed by 1963, was financed by the Government under the United Kingdom Grants-in-aid Funds. An area of  was allocated for the new Federal Military College.The site reserved for the College consisted of scenic surroundings. The new home of the FMC was situated on a hill overlooking a disused mining pool. The College buildings were to be modelled on the lines of some of the best military academies overseas such as Point in the States and Military College of Canada. They were to consist of an assembly hall, dormitories, classrooms, a gymnasium, laboratories, some 140 married-quarters for all ranks and civilians employees and numerous playing fields.On 20 June 1961, the di-Pertuan Agong, as Supreme Commander of the Malayan Armed Forces, officially opened the new complex. In acknowledgement of the immense debt of which the FMC owed the High Commissioner Field Marshal Tun Sir Templer, the Assembly Hall was named Tun Templer Hall (Dewan Tun Templer).On December 9, 1966, in a ceremony held at the college, the Yang Di-Pertuan Agong conferred the Royal title to the FMC. This was a great honour for the college for no other educational institution in the history of this nation has the Royal title bestowed upon it. Hence since 1966, the former Federation Military College came to be known as the Royal Military College.SportsThe college has won numerous awards and accolades at all levels of competition and at various sports, most significantly in rugby and hockey. The college also fields a formidable English Debate team that has won the prestigious Ministers Trophy a record number of times, only to be equalled by its arch-rival on the debating stage, the Kurshiah College. The College also organises an annual multi-game carnival with its other arch-rival, the College Kuala Kangsar. Both colleges take turns to host the competition.left|thumb|A commemorative fountain with the college charter inscribed on it at the parade squareWithin the College, each Putera belongs to one of eight Companies. They are:* Alpha (navy blue)* Bravo (yellow)* Charlie (green)* Delta (red)* Eagle (black)* Foxtrot (maroon)* Golf (amber)* Hotel (blue)The eight companies compete with each other for four trophies:* Piala Ali (academic)* Piala Murad (military)* Piala Halim (field sports)* Piala Razak (other sports).The overall winner is presented the Commandants Trophy, which is awarded to the winning company at the Annual Passing-out Parade, usually inspected by the Minister of Malaysia. The victorious company will hold the title of Commandant Company, and all the Puteras of that company shall be entitled to wear a royal yellow lanyard cord on their right shoulder during the Passing-out Parade and for the rest of the academic year.For 2010, the Commandants Trophy was given to Hotel company.Organisation and rankAll Companies have four senior rankholders and four junior rankholders.thumb|The Royal Military College rank structure from the 1980s until 1996Every Company is led by one Senior Officer (SUO) and assisted by three Junior Under Officers (JUOs), who are fourth year Puteras appointed by the College administration. The terms SUO and JUO are a throwback to the traditions of the Royal Military Academy at Sandhurst, where such titles are still in use today for senior rankholders. Fourth year Puteras who are not rankholders are entitled to be referred to as Senior Puteras (SP).The SUO is responsible for all aspects of the Puteras under his command, and is the highest ranking Putera in the Company. The three JUOs, covering the General, Administration and Quartering billets of the Company, are equal in terms of rank and assist the SUO in the running of the Company on a day-to-day basis. All Under Officers are entitled to a private bunk each, and SUOs are also entitled to have their meals at the High Table in the Mess Hall.SUOs  lead their Company at all Parades and are the main liaisons between the military administration and the Puteras under his care. SUOs and JUOs are also subject to the authority of the Companys commissioned officers and instructors, and play a role in the selection of junior rankholders.left|thumb|The Royal Military College rank structure from 1997 onwardsRank is denoted by slip-on shoulder epaulettes and is worn on all uniforms except the Mosque Order (traditional Malay dress) and the Planters Order (formal blazer and College tie dress). Prior to 1997, these slip-on epaulettes were only worn by the senior and junior rankholders, and its use was accompanied by a metallic shoulder title, bearing the name Maktab Tentera Diraja underneath the rank insignia on the epaulette.In 1997, this rank insignia structure was amended to bring it in line with the Officer Cadet rank insignia in use at the Army College (KTD, Kolej Tentera Darat) and the then-newly established Malaysian Armed Forces Academy (ATMA, Akademi Angkatan Tentera Malaysia). The main difference between an Officer Cadet rank insignia and the Putera rank insignia is the color of the insignia; the bars, knots and chevrons on an Cadet rank are white in color, while the same on a Putera rank is royal yellow in color.An SUOs rank insignia consists of four horizontal bars (one bar for each year of study at the College) with an knot and chevron pointing upwards underneath the knot, on a dark green epaulette.A JUOs rank insignia is identical to the SUOs, except that there is no underneath the Austrian knot.The letters MTD (acronym of the Colleges Malay name, Maktab Tentera Diraja) are also emblazoned in royal yellow at the bottom edge of the epaulette for both ranks.Junior rankholders on the other hand are understudies for the senior rankholder posts and are invested with similar authority with senior rankholders. Nevertheless, all actions of junior rankholders are subject to review by the senior rankholders and the College administration.Putera Sergeants (P/SGT) are normally appointed from the third year Puteras in the first quarter of the academic year, and they are further promoted to Acting Senior Under Officer (A/SUO) and Acting Junior Under Officer (A/JUO) ranks by the third quarter of the academic year to allow for the gradual takeover of the Company from the graduating seniors.A P/SGTs rank insignia consists of three horizontal bars and three chevrons pointing downwards. An A/SUOs rank insignia consists of three horizontal bars and a bright red Austrian knot and chevron pointing upwards underneath the knot. An A/JUOs rank insignia is identical to the A/SUOs, except that there is no chevron underneath the Austrian knot. The letters MTD (acronym of the Colleges Malay name, Maktab Tentera Diraja) are in royal yellow at the bottom edge of the epaulette for all three ranks.P/SGTs, A/SUOs and A/JUOs are not entitled to any privileges accorded to the senior rankholders.Winner2009:commandant boySUO Muhammad Al-Ash bin Khalid2010:commandant boySUO Abdul Aziz bin AsmuniNotable alumniThe alumni association of the RMC is known as the Old Putera Association or OPA.Alumni include:*Osman*Tun Dr Ling Liong Sik*Seri Radzi Sheikh Ahmad, former Home Minister*Kwame Sundram*Nawawi, former national hockey player*Tan Sri G. Gnanalingam*Ibrahim, Indian classical dancer*Raj, orthopaedic surgeon and authorAlmost all the former Chiefs of Armed Forces, Chiefs of Army, Navy and Air Force of Malaysia are graduates of RMC.Past Commandants*1953 - 1955: Lt. Col. J Mahoney OBE MC*1956 - 1958: Lt. Col. P A C Don DSO*1959 - 1961: Lt. Col. R DE L King*1962 - 1964: Lt. Col. JW Pearson*1965 - 1967: Lt. Col. DW Grove DSO*1967 - 1968: Col. Abdul Jamil Bin Ahmad jssc psc*1969 - 1970: Col. Jaafar Bin Onn SMK KMN psc*1971 - 1972: Col. Syed Hamzah Bin Syed Abu Bakar JSD KMN PJK psc*1973 - 1974: Col. Baharuddin Bin Mohd Diah*1974 - 1977: Col. Nik Mahmood Fakharuddin Bin Sri Nik Ahmad Kamil PSK KMN psc*1978 - 1980: Col. Murad Bin Haji Jaafar KMN AMP PIS BE(UM) MEIM Eng jssc psc*1981 - 1983: Col. Mohamad Bin Munip SMK MIprod E AMIAME psc*1983 - 1985: Col. Aboo Samah Bin Aboo Bakar KMN Dip. Pol MBIM AMITD psc*1985 - 1990: Col. Abdul Ghani Bin Yunus PAT AMN MA psc*1990 - 1993: Col. Hussin Bin Haji Yusoff AMT AMK PIS PJK MA psc*1993 - 1995: Col. Haji Yusop Bin Haji Hussin KAT AMN PMC PJK BSoc  Sc (Hons) M Ec psc*1995 - 1996: Col. Ramli Bin Haji Nik DNS AMT PMC MA (Lancs) PAT psc te*Sept 1996  Oct  1996: Col. Khalid Bin Saad AMN PJK MSM (US) mpat psc*1996 - 1999: Col.Ahmad Rodi Bin Zakaria PAT KAT AMN PNBB mpat psc*1999 - 2000: Lt. Col. Ahmad Ghazali Bin Abu Hassan AMN LLM (Lancs) psc*2000 - 2002: Col. Mohd Razif Bin Hj Idris ADK KAT ACM DBS (Mktg) DIM (UKM) mpat psc (Phil)*2002  2004: Col. Azizan Bin Md Delin KMN AMK AAP MA (NPS) LL.B (Hons) psc*2004 - 2006: Col Mohd Shukri bin Ahmad*2006 - 2007: Kept Syed Shahirudin Putra bin Syed Osman TLDM*2007 - 2010: Kept Alias bin Baharuddin TLDM*2010 - Present: Col Zakaria YadiOn 28th June 2010, A Royal Military College (RMC) student was sacked while four others suspended in connection with the death of another student, Mohammed Naim Mustaqim Mohamad Sobri, 16, after an alleged bullying.References*Royal Military College Official Website*Royal Military College Unofficial Website - now defunct*Old Putera Association Official WebsiteInformation and links*of Malaysia*Army*Defence University of MalaysiaExternal links*Old Putera Association*OP Online forum (as of 7th May 2010)Tentera Diraja
5551236
Tubal_Cain_mine
thumb|275pix|Tubal Cain MineTubal Cain Mine is an abandoned mine in the Wilderness, east of National Park in the US state of Washington. The main adit penetrates 450 meters into Buckhorn Mountain.The mine is named after Tubal-Cain, a character mentioned in the Bible. The of Genesis 4:22 says that Tubal-cain was a forger of all instruments of bronze and iron,  a  metalsmith. History In 1902 copper was discovered in the River drainage. The ore was said to have both copper and gold.(Horace J. Stevens (1908) The Copper Handbook, v.8, Houghton, Mich.: Horace Stevens, p.1341.)  Later that year, the Tubal-Cain Copper & Manganese Mining Co. headquartered in Seattle built a trail and began to mine ore out of the area. After several cave-ins, washouts, and low-grade ore, the mine was abandoned in 1906.Two camps were established: Copper City at the bottom of Copper Valley, and Tull City located in Tull Canyon. Evidence of these camps such as metal boilers, wire, and old cabins are still visible today. References
5568942
Orepuki
Orepuki in Southland, Zealand is a small country township on the coast of Te Waewae Bay  some 20 minutes from Riverton, 15 minutes from Tuatapere and 50 minutes from Invercargill that sits at the foot of the Range. Once a thriving gold mining settlement of 3000 people, today Orepuki is something of a ghost town with an assortment of abandoned stores, goldmining relics and sluicing scars as the only reminders of its former glory. History In pre-European times, local Mori used the unique and highly prized garnet gemstones on the beach to polish and sharpen their toki or adzes/axes. European sealer Boultbee noted in 1827 that there was an old and small Mori village situated near present day Orepuki http://www.jstor.org/view/00251496/dm995087/99p0285b/0. It seems likely that any trace of this village was washed away by later goldminers and their sluicing activities. The English translation of Orepuki has been subject to numerous theories: Aro-puke or crumbling cliffs being one of the more popular suggestions.The European origins of Orepuki township begin with the discovery of gold in the beaches black sand in 1865. The first tent town of Hirstfield sprung up near Monkey Island (in the lee of which ships anchored). Several years later a slightly more permanent second township was constructed to the north of the present day village, known as Garfield. Mining operations however, dictated that this site was on gold bearing land and the people and their houses, including the school, shifted to the present site to allow further mining.  On 25 May 1885 a line railway was opened to Orepuki, providing it with swift transport to Invercargill.  On 1 October 1903, a further extension beyond Orepuki was opened and the line ultimately became the Branch.  The section of line between Riverton and Tuatapere closed on 30 July 1976. Orepuki station building still stands, relocated to serve other purposes on a farmers paddock. Other industries to have operated in Orepuki include: sawmilling, coal mining, a shale works http://www.teara.govt.nz/EarthSeaAndSky/MineralResources/OilAndGas/4/ENZ-Resources/Standard/2/en, a smelter to extract platinum, a flax mill and farming which remains as the main industry today.An array of old buildings still exist and currently the township supports a pub, a bowling green, a community hall, a church http://www.yesteryears.co.nz/province/southland/diaries/orepuki_c1860.html and a population of around 100 people. Orepuki primary school closed in 2003.The area is famous for a number of former All Blacks, world champion shearers, and its odd trees which appear to be in a perpetual gale, even in complete calm (frequent strong salt winds from the sea have warped and bent many trees by nearly 90).Surrounding areas include Pahia, Round Hill, Wakapatu, Ruahine, Bay, Waihoaka, Te Waewae and Te Tua. Nearby attractions *Monkey Island; http://kiwiwendy.tripod.com/id15.html a small island and mini lagoon off the southern end of the beach. Accessible during low tide, with a small walking track. Local Mori used the island as a traditional lookout for whales and named it Te Puka o Takitimu, or the Anchorstone of Takitimu waka/canoe.*Gemstone Beach; http://rebeccathewrecker.blogspot.com/2007/03/pebbles-are-calling.html situated  km north of Orepuki, this wild beach contains semi-precious gemstone such as: garnet, orbicular jasper, garnet sands, rodinguite quartz, semi nephrite, fossil worm casts, oil shale and elusive sapphire.External links* Riverton to Orepuki Goldfieldshttp://www.yesteryears.co.nz/province/southland/diaries/orepuki_c1860.html* Orepuki on the Western Southland Website* A to Z guide. http://www.atoz-nz.com/intro.asp?Loc13
5574878
Parallel_Virtual_File_System
 website                 http://www.pvfs.org/The Parallel Virtual File System (PVFS) is an source file system.  A parallel file system is a type of file system that distributes file data across multiple servers and provides for concurrent access by multiple tasks of a parallel application.  PVFS was designed for use in large scale computing.  PVFS focuses on high performance access to large data sets.  It consists of a server process and a client library, both of which are written entirely of user-level code.  A Linux kernel module and pvfs-client process allow the file system to be mounted and used with standard utilities.  The client library provides for high performance access via the passing interface (MPI).  PVFS is being jointly developed between The Parallel Architecture Research Laboratory at University and the Mathematics and Computer Science Division at National Laboratory, and the Supercomputer Center.  PVFS development has been funded by NASA Goddard Space Flight Center, DOE Argonne National Laboratory, NSF PACI and HECURA programs, and other government and private agencies. HistoryPVFS was first developed in 1993 by Walt Ligon and Eric Blumer as a parallel file system for Virtual Machine (PVM) (A. Blumer and W. B. Ligon, The Parallel Virtual File System, 1994 PVM Users Group Meeting, 1994.) as part of a NASA grant to study the I/O patterns of parallel programs.  PVFS version 0 was based on Vesta, a parallel file system developed at IBM J. Watson Research Center(Peter F. Corbett , Dror G. Feitelson, The Vesta parallel file system, ACM Transactions on Computer Systems (TOCS), v.14 n.3, p.225-264, Aug. 1996.).  Starting in 1994 Rob Ross re-wrote PVFS to use TCP/IP and departed from many of the original Vesta design points.  PVFS version 1 was targeted to a cluster of DEC Alpha workstations networked using switched FDDI.  Like Vesta, PVFS striped data across multiple servers and allowed I/O requests based on a file view that described a strided access pattern.  Unlike Vesta, the striping and view were not dependent on a common record size.  Ross research focused on scheduling of disk I/O when multiple clients were accessing the same file(W. B. Ligon, III, and R. B. Ross, Implementation and Performance of a Parallel File System for High Performance Distributed Applications, 5th IEEE Symposium on High Performance Distributed Computing, August, 1996.).  Previous results had show than scheduling according the best possible disk access pattern was preferable.  Ross showed that this depended on a number of factors including the relative speed of the network and the details of the file view.  In some cases a scheduling that based on network traffic was preferable, thus a dynamically adaptable schedule provided the best overall performance(W. B. Ligon, III, and R. B. Ross, Server-Side Scheduling in Cluster Parallel I/O Systems, Parallel I/O for Cluster Computing, Christophe Crin and Hai Jin editors, pages 157-177, Kogan Page Science, September, 2003.).In late 1994 Ligon met with Thomas Sterling and John Dorband at Space Flight Center (GSFC) and discussed their plans to build the first Beowulf computer(W. B. Ligon III, R. B. Ross, D. Becker, P. Merkey, Beowulf: Low-Cost Supercomputing Using Linux, IEEE Software magazine special issue on Linux, Volume 16, Number 1, page 79, January, 1999.).  It was agreed that PVFS would be ported to Linux and be featured on the new machine.  Over the next several years Ligon and Ross worked with the GSFC group including Donald Becker, Dan Ridge, and Eric Hendricks.  In 1997 at a cluster meeting in Pasadena, CA Sterling asked that PVFS be released as an open source package(Walt Ligon and Rob Ross, Parallel I/O and the Parallel Virtual File System, Beowulf Cluster Computing with Linux, 2nd Edition, William Gropp, Ewing Lusk, and Thomas Sterling, editors, pages 489-530, MIT Press, November, 2003.).In 1999 Ligon proposed the development of a new version of PVFS initially dubbed PVFS2000 and later PVFS2.  The design was initially developed by Ligon,  Ross, and Phil Carns.  Ross completed his PhD in 2000 and moved to National Laboratory and the design and implementation was carried out by Ligon, Carns, Dale Witchurch, and Harish Ramachandran at University, Ross, Neil Miller, and Rob Lathrum at Argonne National Laboratory, and Pete Wyckoff at Ohio Supercomputer Center(P. H. Carns, W. B. Ligon III, R. B. Ross, and R. Thakur, PVFS: A Parallel File System For Linux Clusters, Extreme Linux Workshop, Atlanta, October , 2000.  Best paper of conference award.).  The new file system was released in 2003.  The new design featured object servers, distributed metadata, views based on MPI, support for multiple network types, and a software architecture for easy experimentation and extensibility.PVFS version 1 was retired in 2005.  PVFS version 2 is still supported by Clemson and Argonne.  Carns completed his PhD in 2006 and joined Axicom, Inc. where PVFS was deployed on several thousand nodes for data mining.  In 2008 Carns moved to Argonne and continues to work on PVFS along with Ross, Latham, and Sam Lang.  Brad Settlemyer developed a mirroring subsystem at Clemson, and later a detailed simulation of PVFS used for researching new developments.  Settlemyer is now at Ridge National Laboratory.  in 2007 Argonne began porting PVFS for use on an IBM Gene/P(Samuel  Lang, Philip  Carns, Robert  Latham, Robert  Ross, Kevin  Harms, William  Allcock, I/O Performance Challenges at Leadership Scale, Proceedings of Supercomputing, 2009). In 2008 Clemson began developing extensions for supporting large directories of small files, security enhancements, and redundancy capabilities.  As many of these goals conflicted with development for Blue Gene, a second branch of the CVS source tree was created and dubbed Orange and the original branch was dubbed Blue. PVFS and OrangeFS track each other very closely, but represent two different groups of user requirements.  Most patches and upgrades are applied to both branches.FeaturesIn a cluster using PVFS nodes are designated as one or more of: client, data server, metadata server.  Data servers hold file data, metadata servers hold metadata include stat-info, attributes, and datafile-handles as well as directory-entries.  Clients run applications that utilize the file system by sending requests to the servers over the network.Object-based designPVFS has an object based design, which is to say all PVFS server requests involved objects called dataspaces.  A dataspace can be used to hold file data, file metadata, directory metadata, directory entries, or symbolic links.  Every dataspace in a file system has a unique handle.  Any client or server can look up which server holds the dataspace based on the handle.  A dataspace has two components: a bytestream and a set of key/value pairs.  The bytestream is an ordered sequence of bytes, typically used to hold file data, and the key/value pairs are typically used to hold metadata.  The object-based design has become typical of many distributed file systems including Lustre, Panasas, and pNFS.Separation of data and metadataPVFS is designed so that a client can access a server for metadata once, and then can access the data servers without further interaction with the metadata servers.  This removes a critical bottleneck from the system and allows much greater performance.MPI-based requestsWhen a client program requests data from PVFS it can supply a description of the data that is based on MPI_Datatypes.  This facility allows MPI file views to be directly implemented by the file system.  MPI_Datatypes can describe complex non-contiguous patterns of data.  The PVFS server and data codes implement data flows that efficiently transfer data between multiple servers and clients.Multiple network supportPVFS uses a networking layer named BMI which provides a non-blocking message interface designed specifically for file systems.  BMI has multiple implementation modules for a number of different networks used in high performance computing including TCP/IP, Myrinet, Infiniband, and Portals(Philip H. Carns, Walter B. III, Robert  Ross, Pete  Wyckoff, BMI: a network abstraction layer for parallel I/O, Proceedings of IPDPS 05, 2005).Stateless (lockless) serversPVFS servers are designed so that they do not share any state with each other or with clients.  If a server crashes another can easily be restarted in its place.  Updates are performed without using locks.User-level implementationPVFS clients and servers run at user level.  Kernel modifications are not needed.  There is an optional kernel module that allows a PVFS file system to be mounted like any other file system, or programs can link directly to a user interface such as MPI-IO or a Posix-like interface.  This features makes PVFS easy to install and less prone to causing system crashes.System-level interfaceThe PVFS interface is designed to integrate at the system level.  It has similarities with the Linux VFS, this making it easy to implement as a mountable file system, but is equally adaptable to user level interfaces such as MPI-IO or Posix-like interfaces.  It exposes many of the features of the underlying file system so that interfaces can take advantage of them if desired.(M.  Vilayannur, S.  Lang, R.  Ross, R.  Klundt, L.  Ward, Extending the POSIX I/O Interface: A Parallel File System Perspective, Technical Memorandum ANL/MCS-TM-302, 2008.)(Swapnil A. Patil, Garth A. Gibson, Gregory R. Ganger, Julio  Lopez, Milo  Polte, Wittawat  Tantisiroj, Lin  Xiao, In Search of an API for Scalable File Systems: Under the table or above it?, USENIX HotCloud Workshop 2009.)ArchitecturePVFS consists of 4 main components, and a number of utility programs.  The components are the PVFS2-server, the pvfslib, the PVFS-client-core, and the PVFS kernel module. Utilities include the karma management tool, utilities such as pvfs-ping, pvfs-ls, pvfs-cp, etc. that all operate directly on the file system without using the kernel module (primarily for maintenance and testing).  Another key design point is the PVFS protocol which describes the messages passed between client and server, though this is not strictly a component.PVFS2-serverThe PVFS server runs as a process on a node designated as an I/O node.  I/O nodes are often dedicated nodes but can be regular nodes that run application tasks as well.  The PVFS server usually runs as root, but can be run as a user if preferred.  Each server can manage multiple distinct file systems and is designated to run as a metadata server, data server, or both.  All configuration is controlled by a configuration file specified on the command line, and all servers managing a given file system use the same configuration file.  The server receives requests over the network, carries out the request which may involve disk I/O and responds back to the original requester.  Requests normally come from client nodes running application tasks but can come from other servers.  The server is composed of the request processor, the job layer, Trove, BMI, and flow layers.Request processorThe request processor consists of the server process main loop and a number of state machines.  State machines are based on a simple language developed for PVFS that manage concurrency within the server and client.  A state machine consists of a number of states, each of which either runs a C state action function or calls a nested (subroutine) state machine.  In either case return codes select which state to go to next.  State action functions typically submit a job via the job layer which performs some kind of I/O via Trove or BMI.  Jobs are non-blocking, so that once a job is issued the state machines execution is deferred so that another state machine can run servicing another request.  When Jobs are completed the main loop restarts the associated state machine.  The request processor has state machines for each of the various request types defined in the PVFS request protocol plus a number of nested state machines used internally.  The state machine architecture makes it relatively easy to add new requests to the server in order to add features or optimize for specific situations.Job layerThe Job layer provides a common interface for submitting Trove, BMI, and flow jobs and reporting their completion.  It also implements the request scheduler as a non-blocking job that records what kind of requests are in progress on which objects and prevents consistency errors due to simultaneously operating on the same file data.TroveTrove manages I/O to the objects stored on the local server.  Trove operates on collections of data spaces.  A collection has its own independent handle space and is used to implement distinct PVFS file systems,  A data space is a PVFS object and has its own unique (within the collection) handle and is stored on one server.  Handles are mapped to servers through a table in the configuration file.  A data space consists of two parts: a bytestream, and a set of key/value pairs.  A bytestream is sequence of bytes of indeterminate length and is used to store file data, typically in a file on the local file system.  Key/value pairs are used to store metadata, attributes, and directory entries.  Trove has a well defined interface and can be implemented in various ways.  To date the only implementation has been the Trove-dbfs implementation that stores bytestreams in files and key/value pairs in a DB database.  Trove operations are non-blocking, the API provides post functions to read or write the various components and functions to check or wait for completion.BMIFlowspvfslibPVFS-client-corePVFS kernel moduleSee also* List of file systems, the distributed parallel file system sectionReferences(External links*Official website
5579905
Vista,_South_Australia
Vista is a small north-eastern suburb of Adelaide, Australia and is within the of Tea Tree Gully local government area. It is adjacent to Houghton, Tea Tree Gully, St Agnes and Hope Valley.HistoryFirst farmed in the 1840s, the area was subsequently used for mining of dolomite and quartzite, grazing, fruit growing and an extensive plant nursery (in use from 1854 to 1913), which is now in ruins. The residential portion was settled since the 1890s as part of the Hope Valley settlement, and was primarily used for viticulture. The Vista subdivision was created in 1927 but was not significantly developed until the 1950s-1960s.GeographyThe boundary of Vista is defined by Lower North East Road to the south, Hancock Road to the west, and a line extending from Smart Rd, St Agnes to the north. The eastern three-quarters of the suburb is part of the Hill Recreation Park.At the ABS 2001 census, Vista had a mostly middle-income population of 918 people living in 366 dwellings, an outright majority of whom were from the Britain and Ireland.FacilitiesAnstey Hill (371m) (named after George Anstey (1814-1895), a local viticulturalist) and the surrounding 362-hectare Hill Recreation Park, which was dedicated in 1989, provides opportunities for bushwalking, birdwatching, photography, painting and flora enthusiasts, with historical sites and scenic views over the Adelaide Plains. The Park was ravaged by the Wednesday fires in 1983, and signs of the destruction can still be seen. The park also conserves a range of rare flora and fauna.(Department of Environment and Heritage - Anstey Hill) (Friends of Anstey Hill Accessed 18 June 2006.)St Agnes Primary School is across the road from the residential part of the suburb, and a prosthodonic dentist operates in Perseverance Road.TransportThe 557 and 558 bus routes service Vista, linking it with the Tree Plaza Interchange and Interchange. Paradise links to the Adelaide CBD via the Adelaide O-Bahn. All services are operated by Metro.ReferencesExternal links* Tea Tree Gully/Vista - Local Community Profile* ABS 2001 Census Data - Vista
5591768
Bagua_Province
thumb|220px|The Utcubamba River in the Amazonas Region, PeruBagua is a province of the Region in Peru. It is located in the north and central part of the department of Amazonas. Its territory is rugged in all its extension. It is also cut by deep gorges that have been formed by the important rivers that cross this province, as well as their numerous tributaries.Baguas heights are very varied. They can mainly go up to 400 m. in the banks of Maran and Santiago rivers up to 2500 m. in the mountain zone of the south.right|thumb|220px|Tigrillo, one of the fauna species in Bagua, PeruThe province is crossed from south-west to north-east by the Maran river, one of the principal rivers in the Peruvian Amazon. From south to north-east, it is crossed by the Chiriaco or Imaza river. From southeast to north, it is crossed by the Nieva river and from east to northwest by the Utcubamba river.The city of Bagua is located on a natural platform raised from the right shore of the Utcubamba river. All the houses of the western part of the city have a view of the river waters.There are a big quantity of animals that are typical of the zone: huanganas, pumas, anteaters, tigrillos, cashpaicuros, armadillos. There are also numerous snakes such as the macanche, colambo, uyurechonte, cascabel, shushupe, etc. The natives hunted them for food. Thanks to the valuable number of species, a tourist current dedicated to the sport of hunting can be achieved, of course with rules adapted to assure the survival of these species. For collectors, the quantity and variety of butterflies can be of big attraction in the wooded zone of the district principally. Political divisionBagua is divided into six districts, which are:El BaguazoIn August 2008 and June 2009, Bagua experienced social unrest and the occupation of road infrastructure by indigenous communities protesting against new laws that would allow oil and mining companies to enter indigenous territories without seeking consent or consultation of the local communities. Indigenous communities complain that some 70% of Peruvian Amazon territory would now be leased for oil and gas exploration, putting at risk their own lives and the environment. In other areas affected by oil drilling and the dumping of toxic waste, local communities in Peru have already experienced severe environmental and health damage (see BBC News 24 March 2008, Peru tribe battles oil giant over pollution). Further to the 2008 protest, some of the controversial decrees were repealed by the Congress. In 2009, however, new decrees were passed by the President, Alan Garca,  claiming that they were necessary to implement a Free Trade Agreement with the United States of America.  The 5 of June, the Government declared a state of emergency and ordered the police to break out the 59 day roadblock. The police intervined on the 6 of June resulted in a serious clash of the police with the civilian population of Bagua and the Indigenous population of its surroundings. According to the government 5 civilians were killed, 5 natives, 23 policemen and 89 people were wounded .(  title Informe de Adjuntia de Junio de 2009 )(). The indigenous population in Bagua and some newsreports dispute the government version, stating that the death tool was in the hundreds and the bodies of the indigenous population were thrown to the river in an attempt to hide them. Black Vultures were seen around a corpse in the reaver. Local news correspondents confirmed that the governments version did not adjust to the truth.(titleBagua: la matanza de nativos que oficialmente no ocurri)() See also *Peruvian political crisis*Peru oil scandal Places of interest * de Coln Reserved ZoneReferences(Provinz)de Baguade Baguadi Baguaprovincija(provincie)(provncia)pruwinsya(lalawigan)
5597362
Camberwell,_New_South_Wales
thumb|300px|St Clements Church at Camberwell.Camberwell is a small village just off the England Highway in the Valley region of South Wales, Australia. It is 196 kilometres north of Sydney and 15 kilometres northwest of Singleton in Singleton Shire.The village has an historic Anglican church, St Clements, which was opened in 1844. The area also has numerous open-cut mining operations.The placename almost certainly refers to Camberwell, a district in London, England.
5604188
Gwennap
Gwennap () is a village and civil parish in Cornwall, Kingdom. It is situated approximately five miles (8 km) southeast of Redruth.(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 204 Truro & Falmouth ISBN 9780319231494)In the 18th and early 19th centuries Gwennap parish was the richest copper mining district in Cornwall,( and was called the richest square mile in the Old World.() It is the location of the County Adit, and once-famous mines such as Mines, mine and Busy. Today it forms part of area A6i (the Gwennap Mining District) of the and West Devon Mining Landscape Heritage Site.()It lends its name to Gwennap Pit where Wesley preached 18 times between 1762 and 1789, although Gwennap Pit is about  to the north west at the hamlet of Busveal near St. Day. The pit was caused by mining subsidence in the mid-18th century. After Wesleys death the local people turned the pit into a regular circular shape with turf seats.() The parish church is an old foundation but was rebuilt in the 15th century and then thoroughly restored in the 19th century. The tower is detached. According to Charles Henderson few Cornish churches are less interesting than Gwennap.(Cornish Church Guide (1925); pp. 105-06) Copper and tin mining Mining in Gwennap is an industry stretching back to prehistoric times when tin streaming in the Carnon Valley is believed to have occurred. In surrounding valleys stones of cassiterite (SnO2) were washed downstream from outcropping lodes and trapped in the alluvial mud where they could be easily extracted. Later these outcropping tin lodes were worked by bounders and the open workings (coffins) of these early miners are still partially visible at Penstruthal.Early evidence of the antiquity of mining in Gwennap is recorded in the Stannary Roll of 1305-1306 which notes that Johannes Margh of Trevarth sent 30 shipments of tin to Truro. In 1512 two local men were overheard quarrelling in Cornish about the theft of tynne at Poldyth in Wennap.Tin raised in Gwennap was dressed and smelted locally.  Early modern crazing mills powered by water, such as that which existed at Penventon, were built to grind, and later stamp the tin ore.  This released cassiterite which was then smelted in local burning houses.  Demand for charcoal in the smelting process rapidly depleted Gwennaps ancient woodland, leaving a wild, moorland, landscape.Deep exploitation of the tin lodes was not possible with the limited technology of the early modern period as Cornish mines were wet due to the high rainfall of the area.  De-watering workings at depth with rag and chain pumps, leather bags or kibbles (metal buckets) were all ineffective.  Deep lode mining was only made possible by two innovations, the first of which occurred in 1748, when John Williams of Scorrier initiated the construction of the County Adit, a phenomenal feat of engineering, which drained mine workings through a system of adits.  Over the next century this was extended from Poldice to include many other mines consisting of 63 miles (101 km) of tunnels in all.The other remarkable invention was that of the steam engine, allowing mines to be de-watered to greater depths.  As one of Britains earliest industrial regions, Gwennap had by the early 19th century become synonymous with steam technology, attracting Britains top engineers including & Watt and Murdoch.  Together with Cornish engineers such as Loam, Sims, Woolf, Hornblower and Trevithick, these men enabled the pumping engine to perform beyond the expectations of the time.Such innovations coincided with an increased national demand for copper, needed in the brass parts for the machinery of the Revolution.  By 1779 copper was ousting tin as the main mineral extracted, but it was the period from 1815 to 1840 which was the heyday of mining in Gwennap.  This era saw the rise of huge mining enterprises including the Consolidated, United, and Tresavean Mines.  Consolidated yielded almost 300,000 tons of copper between 1819 and 1840 which sold for over 2 million.  Gwennap the Copper Kingdom was then the richest known mineralised area in the world.Mining rapidly transformed the landscape.  Consolidated Mines alone had 19 engine houses for pumping, winding and crushing: the red waste rock from deep underground lay strewn about the moors and the valleys constantly echoed to the roar of the stamps.  Another visible sign of industrialisation was the construction of mineral tramways which transported copper ore and Welsh coal to and from coastal ports more efficiently than packs of mules.In 1809 a horse drawn tramway was constructed between Portreath and Scorrier which was later extended to Poldice and Crofthandy.  This was followed by the building of the Redruth-Chasewater Railway in 1824 running from Pedn-an-Drea and Buller, Redruth to Devoran.Mining reached its technical apogee in Gwennap in the 1840s with the installation of the first ever engine in Britain at Mine; but the nature of the areas geology, which had bestowed such wealth, eventually proved its downfall. Image:Wheal Unity mine in Cornwall.jpg|thumb|right|View of the now defunct Unity mine to the east of St. Day. This image shows the badly scarred landscape of the area. In the nearby Camborne-Redruth district, rich deposits of tin were found below the copper.  In Gwennap no such deposits were found and when low prices caused the collapse of the copper market in the 1860s, many mines were forced to close or amalgamate.  Consolidated and United were incorporated into Amalgamated mine. Many of the mines that continued or went over to tin production could not survive the rising cost of coal and the fluctuations of mineral prices, causing a second wave of closures in the mid 1870s.Few mines survived the troubled times of the late 19th century, but Tresavean was one success story. Brought back to life as a tin mine in 1908 it was the second deepest mine in Cornwall at  when it closed in 1928. Other mines that were resurrected in the 20th century include Gorland, worked for tungsten before the War I, Busy, Mount Wellington, Whiteworks, Poldice, Parc an Chy, and Jane.  The last mine to work commercially was South Crofty Mine at Pool near Redruth which ceased operation in March 1998 bringing to a close over two thousand years of mining in the Gwennap area.(Adapted from panel in St Day Church by the Mining Villages Regeneration Project)ReferencesFurther reading* James, C. C. A History of the Parish of Gwennap in Cornwall. Penzance: C. C. James, 1949* Jenkin, Kenneth Hamilton. Mines and Miners of Cornwall; Pt. VI: Around Gwennap. Truro Bookshop  ISBN 0-904662-11-XExternal links* Gwennap Genealogy Records On-Line* Gwennap Parish Councilit:Gwennapnl:Gwennappl:Gwennap
5613670
Harewood,_British_Columbia
Harewood is the name of a lake and a plain of the Canadian province of Columbia. It is located  south of Nanaimo, on the east coast of Island. Its geographical coordinates are (Natural Resources Canada) The name has been in use since at least 1913, when Harewood referred to a small mining village in the area, no longer existing. The mine was owned in part by the seventh son of the third son of the of Harewood.(BC Geographical Names Information System) Today, the name Harewood is still in use to refer to a neighbourhood in south Nanaimo. It is also used as a street name and as a name for some other community amenities. References(
5624964
Von_MisesFisher_distribution
thumb|Points sampled from three von Mises-Fisher distributions on the sphere (blue: \kappa1, green: \kappa10, red: \kappa100). The mean directions \mu are shown with arrows.In statistics, the von MisesFisher distribution is a distribution on the (p-1)-dimensional sphere in \mathbb{R}^{p}. If p2the distribution reduces to the Mises distribution on the circle.The probability density function of the von Mises-Fisher distribution for the random p-dimensional unit vector \mathbf{x}\, is given by::f_{p}(\mathbf{x}; \mu, \kappa)C_{p}(\kappa)\exp \left( {\kappa \mu^T \mathbf{x} } \right)where  \kappa \ge 0, \left \Vert \mu \right \Vert 1 \, and  the normalization constant C_{p}(\kappa)\,  is equal to: C_{p}(\kappa)\frac {\kappa^{p/2-1}} {(2\pi)^{p/2}I_{p/2-1}(\kappa)}. \,where  I_{v} denotes the modified function of the first kind and order v. If p3, the normalization constant reduces to: C_{3}(\kappa)\frac {\kappa} {4\pi\sinh \kappa}\frac {\kappa} {2\pi(e^{\kappa}-e^{-\kappa})}. \,The parameters \mu\, and \kappa\, are called the mean direction and concentration parameter, respectively. The greater the value of \kappa\,, the higher the concentration of the distribution around the mean direction \mu\,. The distribution is unimodal for \kappa>0\,, and is uniform on the sphere for \kappa0\,.The von Mises-Fisher distribution for p3, also called the Fisher distribution, was first used to model the interaction of dipoles in an electric field (Mardia, 2000). Other applications are found in geology, bioinformatics, and mining.Estimation of parametersA series of N independent measurements x_n are drawn from a von Mises-Fisher distribution. The solution obtained by maximizing the log-likelihood is then (Sra, 2009):\mu  \frac{\sum_i^N x_n}:\kappa  A_p^{-1}(\bar{R})where:A_p(\kappa)  \frac{n}  \bar{R}A simple approximation to \kappa is:\hat{\kappa}  \frac{\bar{R}(p-\bar{R}^2)}{1-\bar{R}^2}but a more accurate measure can be obtained by iterating the Newton method a few times:\hat{\kappa}_1  \hat{\kappa} - \frac{A_p(\hat{\kappa})-\bar{R}}{1-A_p(\hat{\kappa})^2-\frac{p-1}{\hat{\kappa}}A_p(\hat{\kappa})}:\hat{\kappa}_2  \hat{\kappa}_1 - \frac{A_p(\hat{\kappa}_1)-\bar{R}}{1-A_p(\hat{\kappa}_1)^2-\frac{p-1}{\hat{\kappa}_1}A_p(\hat{\kappa}_1)}See also* distribution, a related distribution on the two-dimensional unit sphere* Mises distribution, von MisesFisher distribution where p2, the one-dimensional unit circleReferences* Dhillon, I., Sra, S. (2003) Modeling Data using Directional Distributions. Tech. rep., University of Texas, Austin.* Fisher, RA, Dispersion on a sphere. (1953) Proc. Roy. Soc. London Ser. A., 217: 295-305* * Sra, S. A short note on parameter approximation for von Mises-Fisher distributions. (2009) Computational Statistics (pending publication) 
5633579
Nevada_State_Route_305
next_route306State Route 305 (SR 305) is a highway in Lander County, Nevada. It is the only state highway to connect the southern and northern areas of the county.  It runs north from U.S. Route 50 at Austin to Battle Mountain, where it crosses Interstate 80 and ends at State Route 304.Route descriptionthumb|right|SR 305 with the Toiyabe Range in the backgroundState Route 305 begins just northwest of the town limits of Austin, Nevada.() From there, the route heads in a northerly direction through the River Valley, generally paralleling the River. The highway passes near many ranches and mining sites. After about , SR 305 curves slightly more westward, crossing through the Range.() The route continues northward, passing the of the Moon along the trek through Reese River Valley.() As the route nears the vicinity of Mountain, it curves northeast to head to the town of the same name. Along this stretch of highway, near milepost 110, are several dirt roads providing access to numerous mining sites.() Soon afterward, SR 305 enters Battle Mountain along Broad Street, crossing under Interstate 80 and ending in the middle of the town at an intersection with Front Street (SR 304/I-80 Business).()HistoryThe road dates to back to at least 1929. At that time, it appeared on state maps one segment of the much longer State Route 8A. At the time, it was an unimproved road in the state highway system, and the road approached Battle Mountain from a more southerly direction.() The northern end of the current highway alignment southwest of Battle Mountain, serving the present-day mining establishments near the town, was constructed by 1952, although SR 8A continued to follow the previous alignment according to maps.() The entire highway was paved by 1953,() and the SR 8A designation was moved onto the newer section near Battle Mountain by 1954.()On July 1, 1976, Nevada began renumbering its state highways. In this process, the Austin &ndash; Battle Mountain Road segment of SR 8A was reassigned to a new State Route 305. This change was first seen on state maps in 1978.() The route has remained relatively unchanged since then.Major intersectionsthumb|right|The Shoshone Range, as seen from SR 305 near Battle MountainroadroadroadSee alsoOther segments of former State Route 8A:*State Route 140, the northern segment that ran west from U.S. Route 95 via Denio to northwestern Nevada.*State Route 376, the southern segment that ran from near Tonopah to near Austin.ReferencesEstatal de Nevada 305
5641089
Olbernhau
Olbernhau is a town in the district Erzgebirgskreis, in the State of Saxony, Germany. It is situated in the Ore Mountains, 35 km southeast of Chemnitz, and 23 km north of Chomutov, Republic. History Presumably, the towns name arose from the old German name Albert (Albernhaw, Alberthau, Albernhau, Albretshain). Olbernhau has its origins back in the 13th century. Encouraged by Archbishop Albert I. of Meissen, the so-called White Monks (Cistercians) from Osek founded the first settlement in the upper Flha valley, shortly after ore was found here. Olbernhau was first mentioned in records in 1434 (as Albernaw) in a contract documenting the sale of Olbernhau to the patritian Caspar von Berbisdorf.Ore mining started in 1511. In the course of the reformation Olbernhau became a parish in 1539. A school is mentioned for the first time in 1556. The solidly built church was consecrated in 1590. About 1684 the industrial art of gunsmithing was introduced in Olbernhau. In 1690, Olbernhaus first barrel forge was erected in the Rungstock valley, and in 1708 the gun manufactory delivered 12,000 guns to the Saxonian Army. In 1815, a powder mill was founded, which was partly destroyed by explosions in the years 1835, 1850 and 1865. The last gun left the Olbernhau factory in 1854. The launch of the Floehatalbahn in May 1875 linked Olbernhau to the railway network. A Kindergarten was built in 1878. In the 1880es, Olbernhau gained a hospital, gasworks and gas street lights, and in 1892 Saxonys very first electric power station began operation in Olbernhau. From 1895, steam trains ran on the section of line between Olbernhau and Neuhausen. On 1 January 1902 Olbernhau received privileges. In 1906, the beautiful deco Concert and Ball Hall Tivoli was inaugurated. A public swimming bath opened in 1930. In 2002, one of the worst Flha floods in history destroyed parts of the town centre and many houses on the rivers banks. Thanks to many private donations from all over Germany, most of the enormous damages (amounting to several million Euros) was repaired within one year. Tourism Olbernhau is a popular tourist destination. Among the towns major sights are: * the Copper Hammer Mill Althammer on which the Russian tzar the Great once rode * the open-air museum Saigerhtte (founded in 1493, ore processing technology + tiny workmens houses) * the museum, located in a former manor, offering a wide range of information about local traditions * the Tanz- und Ballhaus Tivoli, a ballroom with beautiful Art Deco glass window * the pittoresque Oberneuschnberg church (consecrated in 1695). Snuggled in the beautiful Flha Valley with its six sub-valleys, Olbernhau offers scenic views and attractive paths for hiking and winter sports. References  External links * de:Olbernhauet:Olbernhaueo:Olbernhaufa:fr:Olbernhauit:Olbernhaunl:Olbernhaupl:Olbernhaupt:Olbernhauro:Olbernhauru:szl:Olbernhausr:vo:Olbernhauwar:Olbernhau
5655838
Lnitz
Bergstadt Lnitz (Mining Town of Lnitz, also spelt Lssnitz), sometimes also called Muhme (Aunt) for its age, is a town in the district of Erzgebirgskreis, Saxony, Germany, and belongs to the Town League of Silberberg (Stdtebund Silberberg). Its name comes from the Slavic lesnice, meaning forest place. Geography Lnitz is a small town in the western part of the Mountains lying nestled among wooded mountain ranges in a glen, roughly 432 m above sea level. It lies 4 km northeast of Aue and 27 km southwest of Chemnitz. Constituent communities Lnitz has six Ortsteile (constituent communities), namely Affalter (since 1999), Dittersdorf (since 1973), Grna (from 1974 a constituent community of Affalter), Dreihansen (said to have been a self-standing community in 1791), Niederlnitz (since 1898) and Streitwald (from 1939 a constituent community of Affalter). History Lnitz was founded by the Castle Counts (Burggrafen) at Meien in 1170, and in a document from 1284 it was already described as a Civitas. The towns first documentary mention, however, had already come in 1238, in which it was named as Lesnitz the forest place.Lnitzs early history is somewhat speculative. A schoolmaster is mentioned as being in the town in 1304, for instance, leading to the inference that the Lnitz Latin school was already there then. Likewise, the first known mayor Hermann von Buten appears in the towns history in 1372, leading to further speculation that there must have been a hall by that time.In 1382, Lnitz was designated a Bergstadt and a year later the whole town burnt right down as far as the town mill that stood before the gates. In 1406, the Count of Schnburg acquired the County of Hartenstein and made Lnitz its seat.In 1542, the Reformation was introduced. In 1601, the town hall portal appeared and the town hall remodelling was finished six years later. However, all of it was lost, along with the church, the parish building, the school and moreover 108 houses, in the Rote Ruhr (Red Dysentery, a name given this town fire). In the years that followed, the town also had to deal with sackings, the plague and yet another town fire.In 1714, the Baroque Hospitalkirche (Hospital Church) was consecrated. Town fires were nothing unusual in those days, and on 10 December 1806 it once again came to pass and among the buildings lost were, again, the town hall, the parish building and the school as well as the mediaeval St. Johanniskirche (church), the brewing and malting house, 182 houses and 16 barns. The town sprang back from this, but only three years later, there was yet another fire, this one started by a lightning strike. Of the 104 houses that were destroyed, 26 were ones that had already been rebuilt after burning down in the last fire. On 29 October 1826 the new church, Haupt- und Stadtkirche St. Johannis, was consecrated. There were later further fires in Lnitz, whereby the Baroque Hospitalkirche was destroyed, too.After jurisdiction over the town had been relinquished to the House of Schnburg, the Frstlich Schnburgische Justizamt Stein (Princely Schnburg Justice Office of Stein) came into being in 1861, and that same year, the new Hospitalkirche was consecrated. When the Schnburg principalities were taken over by the of Saxony in 1878, Lnitz was given a Kingdom of Saxony Amt court, which persisted until 1931.In 1917, the bells at both the St. Johanniskirche and the Hospitalkirche were removed for war requirements, but only three years later, the former acquired three new bells. In 1939, a carillon consisting of 23 bronze bells was installed in the churchs spire.On 20 April 1945, the towns deputy mayor Rudolf Weber, who wanted to surrender the town to the Americans without a fight, was shot by the Waffen-SS. Between 1985 and 1992 there arose on the edge of town a great area, where today almost half the towns population lives.In 1999 came the amalgamation of the community of Affalter. Population development The following population figures refer to 31 December of each given year.: Source: Statistisches Landesamt des Freistaates Sachsen Niederlnitz Todays constituent community of Niederlnitz (Lower Lnitz) was originally a farming village downstream from where the Aubach empties into the Lnitzbach. The first known naming of the community goes back to 1497, when it was known as Niderlesenitzs. About 100 years later, the community counted 6 landowners. One estate was exempted from combat duty and served as the lordly hunting lodge. A. Schuhmann mentioned in 1820 in his Lexikon two flour mills and a paper mill. However, the paper mill, which had supposedly once been a hammerworks and a coin blank works, burnt down in 1808 and was never rebuilt. Towards the end of the 19th century, the railway line between Zwnitz and Aue, on which the lower railway station was built somewhat later, came into service. After the station was built came residential areas and industrial development, leading eventually to Niederlnitzs amalgamation with the Town of Lnitz in 1898. Politics  Coat of arms Lnitzs arms show a black Saint Andrews cross (the arms of the Castle Counts at Meien, the towns founders) on a yellow background. The cross is surrounded by three towers set on a stylized wall on a red background. The wall and towers refer to the towns former formidable fortifications; the three towers symbolize the three former town gates. Town partnership Since 1991 there has been a partnership with the Westphalian town of Borgholzhausen. Culture and sightseeing  Buildings * Old Town* Parts of the former town wall (Rsselturm) * Town Hall from 1601* St. Johanniskirche with carillon. It consists of 23 bells from the Apolda bell foundry Franz Schilling Shne for a carillon that was dedicated at Whitsun in 1939 by carillon master Bender, musical consultant for the Youth from the Berliner Parochialkirche. It was to proclaim the thankfulness that the German people owe their Fhrer and his movement.(Apoldaer Tageblatt 25.5.1939) The St. Johanniskirche is the largest neo-classical church in the oremountains.(Website of the local lutheran congregation: http://www.kirche-loessnitz.de) Folk festivals and markets * Weekly market every Thursday* Dorffest Draffaller (village festival)* Lnitzer Salzmarkt (salt market, third weekend in June)* Naturmarkt (in September)* Christmas Market (Advent) Economy and infrastructure  Economy Lnitz was over the centuries a regionally important economic centre with market rights. With widespread industrialization beginning about the year 1850, Lnitz became one of the most important industrial centres in the western Ore Mountains. Important businesses were in shoemaking, machine building, textile refining and processing and metalware. Slate mining around the town was also important for a long while. Reunification brought far-reaching changes in the region leading to the loss of a great deal of the local industry. Transport The Bundesstrae 169 runs through the municipal area. The nearest Autobahn interchanges, with 72, are in Hartenstein and Stollberg.Lnitz lies on the railway line between Chemnitz and Aue (Zwnitztalbahn) and has two railway stations, called oberer Bahnhof and unterer Bahnhof  upper and lower stations. Trains are run by the Erzgebirgsbahn, a daughter operation of Bahn AG. For local transport  in the case of buslines that serve Lnitz  the fare structure of the Verkehrsverbund Mittelsachsen (Middle Saxony Transport Association) applies. Further reading * Akademie der Wissenschaften der DDR, Institut fr Geographie und Geokologie, Arbeitsgruppe Heimatforschung; Werte unserer Heimat; Heimatkundliche Bestandsaufnahme in der Deutschen Demokratischen Republik; Band 31; Zwischen Zwickauer Mulde und Geyerschem Wald; Akademie-Verlag Berlin, 1980.* Schumann, A.; Schiffner, A.: Vollstndiges Staats-, Post- und Zeitungslexikon. Bnde 1-18. Zwickau 1814-1833 References ( External links * Towns official homepage(Erzgebirge)et:Lnitzeo:Lnitzfa:fr:Lnitzit:Lnitznl:Lnitzpl:Lnitzpt:Lnitz(Erzgebirge)ru:()vo:Lnitzwar:Lnitz
5666993
Hatch_Ltd
Hatch is a global multidisciplinary management, engineering and development consultancy. Its group companies have more than 8,000 staff in 65 offices on six continents.  The company was founded in Toronto, Canada, by W.S. Atkins as W.S. Atkins & Associates in 1955. The company initially was involved in subway tunneling and other engineering projects, and expanded into metallurgy when Gerry Hatch joined the company in January, 1958. It became known as Hatch in 1962.  Hatch counts among its metals clients the top 20 (as measured by capitalization) mining and metals companies in the world, including Alcan, Alcoa, Billiton, Gold, Steel, Xstrata (formerly Falconbridge), Vale (formerly Inco) and Rio Tinto. In 1996 the company began an expansion program by purchasing several aligned engineering companies including Billiton Engineering (1996), Rescan Mining (1998), BHP Engineering (1999), Kaiser Engineers (2000) and Acres International (2004). Hatch today provides consulting, operations support, technologies, process design, and project and construction management to clients in three principal sectors: mining and metals; energy; and infrastructure.The companys main hub offices are in the following countries: Australia, Canada, South Africa, United Kingdom, U.S.A., Chile, Brazil, China. They also have various smaller offices around the globe. Main business areas Non-ferrous (base) metals  nickel, copper, zinc, gold, platinumLight metals  aluminum and magnesiumIron & Steel  iron making, steel making, rolling and finishingIndustrial minerals  titania slag, coal, diamondsMining & Mineral Processing  planning, design and maintenance consultingEnergy  hydroelectric power, wind power, alternative energies (ocean, solar, geothermal, etc.), power, thermal power, oil and gas, and electricity transmission and distributionInfrastructure  public: light-rail transit; water; private: power, water, rail, portsTechnologies - custom designed equipment and technology including autoclave for metallurgy, coilbox for steel rolling, furnace, bed, non-destructive testingOil Shale Processing External links *The Hatch Group website
5678192
Edward_Capehart_OKelley
 death_place City, OklahomaEdward Capehart OKelley (1858January 13, 1904) was notable as the man who murdered Robert Ford, who had killed James to receive a bounty.  He was the subject of a book, Ed OKelley: The Man Who Killed Jesse James Murderer, by Judith Ries, OKelleys great-great-niece.  (Over the years, historians and contemporary newspapers variously spelled OKelleys surname as Kelly or OKelly, sometimes mistakenly using the letter O  as his middle initial.)Early yearsLittle is known of OKelleys youth, except that his mother was Margaret Ann Capehart.  He was a child during the guerrilla warfare that divided the region during the Civil War.The murder of Robert FordRobert Ford befriended outlaw James in 1882, when he and his brother Charley joined his gang.  They lived with James and his family for a time.  Ford shot James in the back of the head to collect a state bounty.  By 1892, he operated a tent saloon in the mining camp of Colorado. On June 8, 1892, while Ford was preparing to open his saloon, OKelley walked into the tent with a shotgun.  Ford was turned away from the front entrance.  OKelley called out, Hello Bob. As Ford turned around to see who spoke, OKelley fired his shotgun, hitting Ford in the neck and killing him instantly. OKelley did not say why he had shot Ford. It has been alleged that Smith, the infamous Colorado confidence man, had convinced OKelley he would be a hero for killing the unpopular Ford.(Smith, Jeff (2009). Alias Soapy Smith: The Life and Death of a Scoundrel, Klondike Research. p. 246. ISBN 0-9819743-0-9)A dangerous manAfter his release, OKelley moved to City.  Shortly after his arrival in town, he was recognized by Otto Ewing of the Southern Club, a local gambling house.  It is claimed that Ewing had been connected with Fords saloon in Creede, and may even have been there when OKelley killed Ford. Ewing told people that OKelley was a dangerous man and best avoided.In December 1903, police officer Joe Burnett arrested OKelley as a suspicious character.  OKelley was staying at the Lewis Hotel.  When he had returned there after his release, he openly made threats that he was gunning for a man.  Everyone knew he meant Officer Burnett.  OKelley frequented the saloons on West 4th and 2nd Streets, which were known as the hangouts of criminals in the early years of the city.  On Wednesday, January 13, 1904,  OKelley was arrested by police officer Bunker.  OKelley was released and went to his hotel, where he commented to others that the police had better not try to arrest him again.OKelleys deathOn the evening of January 13, 1904, Joe Burnett was walking his beat on the south side of First Street, in front of the McCord & Collins building.  Burnett encountered OKelley and greeted him politely.  In reply, OKelley struck at the lawman and drew a revolver.  OKelley told Burnett, You come with me. Ill arrest you, you son of a bitch!  As OKelley struck at the officer again, Burnett grabbed the gun with his left hand.The two men began to wrestle in a life-and-death struggle.  OKelley fired his pistol several times, trying to shoot the policeman.  At the same time, OKelley repeatedly called Burnett foul names, saying he was going to kill him.  Burnett called out for help repeatedly.  OKelley did not hit Burnett with his gunfire, but Burnett did receive powder burns on one ear. Once out of ammunition, OKelley used his teeth to bite chunks out of both of the policemans ears.A friend of OKelley came to his aid and fired one shot at the policeman, but then lost his nerve and ran away.  OKelley called out to him to come back, allegedly saying, We will murder this fellow.R. E. Chapin witnessed the fight from the rear of the building on West Main Street and telephoned police headquarters.  Chapin heard officer Burnett call out to several men passing by, I am a police officer, help me!  One of the men replied, We dont know whether you are a police officer or not.Finally, A. G. Paul, a railroad baggage man, came running from the depot.  He grabbed OKelleys hand, thus freeing Burnetts gun hand. The policeman immediately fired two shots and killed OKelley.There were two bullet holes in the back of Burnetts overcoat, and the left hip pocket was torn by a bullet.  By the time friends reached his side, Burnetts gloves were burned and his clothing was on fire.  They called an ambulance to take OKelleys body to the morgue at Street and Harpers furniture store.  His body had a bullet wound in his left leg just above the knee. The fatal shot entered his head just behind the left temple and exited behind the right ear.OKelleys body remained at the morgue for about two weeks.  A number of people, including Otto Ewing, identified the dead man as the killer of Robert Ford.  The warden of the Colorado State Penitentiary, where OKelley had been imprisoned, sent city authorities a description and photograph of OKelley, leaving no doubt of his identification.On January 28, 1904, OKelley was interred at Fairlawn Cemetery in north City. The county provided the casket and service, at a cost to the taxpayers of $12.50.Burnett continued with the City Police Department, serving as a Captain and later as assistant Chief of Police. He died on July 20, 1917 of paralysis after a stroke, at St. Anthonys Hospital.  Burnett was buried in a marked grave in the same cemetery as the man he killed.Sources*OKelleyCapehart OKelleyOKelleyOKelley
5686309
Socit_Gnrale_de_Belgique
The Socit Gnrale de Belgique () was one of the largest companies that ever existed in Belgium. It was founded in 1822 by William I, and existed until 2003, when its then sole shareholder, Suez Lyonnaise des Eaux, merged it with Tractebel to form Suez-Tractebel. HistoryAs part of the terms of the Treaty of Paris in 1814, the countries of Europe agreed to augment their armed forces from militia to a standing army. Although Belgium had been offered independence by the Prussians, Viscount Castlereagh vetoed it on the grounds that the country was too small to be economically viable, and the question then arose of who should govern it, the Austrians having washed their hands of it as a historical accident of the breakup of the Habsburg empire.Although I of the Netherlands, refused it initially on the grounds of the added expense involved in maintaining the said army, Castlereigh persuaded him by asking him if he preferred to be Prince of Orange or King of the Netherlands, adding that from a practical point of view the Belgian Ducal Estates amounted to a third of the country. He therefore founded the company in 1822 to administer these estates under the name Algemeene Nederlandsche Maatschappij ter Begunstiging van de Volksvlijt, with the overt goal of increasing the welfare of the country, but with the covert objective of covering these costs.As the Standing Army project never got taken seriously by the rest of Europe in practice, and the delivery of the Company proved insufficient, the objectives changed in 1826 to the delivery of NFL 500 000 a year as a pension to the Kings personal account.After the Revolution of 1830, the company became Belgian, under the French name Socit Gnrale de Belgique, and it retained the Estates, which were sold off at low prices to the immediate circle of the Board. It then served until 1850 as the Bank of Belgium. The Socit Gnrale was an important provider of capital for the upcoming industry of Belgium in the 19th century.In the years before the World War, the company invested in roads, railroads and canals. It was also the main operation in the Belgian colonies, like in the Congo. After the 1929 Crash, the company split off its banking segment (1934), becoming the Bank (now Fortis, which was later sold to BNP Paribas, resulting in BNP Parisbas Fortis), but remained its largest stockholder. Starting in the end of the 1980s, the Suez company started to obtain a large portion of the Socit Gnrales stock, which resulted in the full take-over of the company in 1998, by Suez Lyonnaise des Eaux.Subsidiaries once (majority) owned by the Socit Gnrale* Coditel - public utility* Maritime Belge - cargo and shipping company* Distrigas - public utility* Electrabel - public utility* Nationale de Herstal - arms manufacturer* Socit Gnrale de Banque - bank* Tractebel - public utility* Minire du Haut Katanga - mining company* ACEC (Ateliers de Construction Electrique de Charleroi) - electric construction - electronics* Brugeoise et Nivelles, belgian rolling stock manufacturing companyDirectors* Davignon 1988-2001* de Mees 1822-1861* Francqui* Galopin* Cattier 1944* Jadot* Nokin* Lamy* Van Praet* Sengier* Francqui 1932-1935* Jadot 1913-1932* Baeyens 1892-1913* Tesch .?.-1913gnrale de Belgiquegnrale de Belgiquegnrale de BelgiqueMaatschappij van Belgi
5695610
Timeline_of_Llanelli_history
This article is a timeline of Llanelli history. For a full article on the town, see Llanelli.1600s1682  Creation of Llanelly Church1683  Start of parish records1700s1761  Oldest map of Llanelli created, where Machynys is shown to be an island.1772  Wesley visits Llanelly.1779  Wesley visits again.1780  Independent chapel established at Capel Als.1785  Calvinist Methodist church established at Gelli On.1791  furnace set up in Cwmddyche by Gevers and Ingman.1795   Raby begins to operate mining and melting of metal ores. Llanellys population recorded as less than 500.1800s1801  Llanellys first census  population 2,972.1802  Establishment of foundry and engineering works by Waddle in New Dock.1803  and Mynydd Mawr Railway opened1805  Llanellys copper works established by Daniel & Co.1809  Llanelly is hit by floods. Jubilee of King George celebrated by townsfolk. Establishment of Capel Newydd.1810  Erw Fawr pit founded by General Ward.1813  Box coal pit opened.1822  Sion Chapel founded.1823  Part of Parish Church is built.1828  Six bells put in tower of the Parish Church. Upper and Lower Markets opened. Wesleyan church built.1829  Construction of Hall Street and New Street begin. Railway allowed between St Davids and Machynys. R.J. Nevill buys all coal pits belonging to General Ward.1830  Cambrian copper works opened.1831  Town population recorded as 7,646.1832  Seventeen persons die in Llanelly after the town is hit by cholera.1835  New Dock opened in Llanelly, the gas company is formed and the local industrialist Alexander Raby dies.1839  Swansea Road workhouse opened.1840  The Llanelly Pottery was established.1875  RFC, one of the most storied union clubs in Wales, is formed; though the club itself misidentified its formation date as 1872.1879  Park opens as the home of Llanelli RFC. It remained the home for Llanelli RFC for nearly 130 years, and later for the regional side Scarlets, but closed in November 2008 when the teams new home, y Scarlets, opened in nearby Pemberton.1895  Host the Eisteddfod of Wales1900s1903  Hosts the Eisteddfod for a second time.1911  Riots occur as a part of railway strikes during great unrest. On 17 August, strikers at Llanelli held up trains at one of the level crossings in the town. The army was called in the next day and two bystanders were shot dead. Railway trucks carrying detonators were set on fire, causing an explosion that killed four people.() 1930  Hosts the Eisteddfod.1962  Hosts the Eisteddfod.1972  The Day the Pubs Ran Dry31 October, when Llanelli RFC defeated the touring Blacks of Zealand 9-3 (10-3 in todays scoring system) before a crowd of 26,000 at Stradey Park. Pubs throughout the town ran dry serving fans celebrating the win.2000s2000  Hosts the Eisteddfod.2008 * 24 OctoberStradey Park hosts its last match, an EDF Energy Cup contest in which the Scarlets defeat Bristol 270.* 15 Novembery Scarlets opens with a match between Llanelli RFC and RFC, with the home team comfortably winning 323.2009 * 31 JanuaryThe official opening ceremony of Parc y Scarlets is held; the main event is a match between the Scarlets and the Barbarians, with the Scarlets winning 4024.References*John Edwards. Llanelli; Hanes Tref. Copy available from Llanelli Central Library.*Keith Evans. The Secret History of Llanelli Co-operative 18952000. Copy available from Llanelli Central Library.
5702317
Art_Gallery_of_Western_Australia
thumb|right|250px|The Art Gallery of Western Australia.The Art Gallery of Western Australia is a public gallery that is part of the Cultural Centre, in Western Australia. It is located near the Australian Museum and Library of Western Australia. The current gallery opened in 1979.()The States art collection consists of over 15,500 works of art,() and the Art Gallery is visited by approximately 400,000 people annually.(HistoryThe Art Gallery was originally housed in the Building with the State Museum and Library.() The Jubilee Building, which was intended to be a public library only, was to be opened in honour of Victorias Jubilee in 1887, but instead, only the first stone for the foundation was laid.( The foundation stone was laid for the Art Gallery in July 1901 by the Duke of Cornwall and York, shortly after the of Australia.(Several notable individuals were involved with the development of the Jubilee Building and Art Gallery, including Winthrop Hackett, Battye, Glauert, Pitt Morison and Temple-Poole.(thumb|Centenary Gallery building, formerly the Police Courts, is linked to the main gallery. The Art Gallery Administration Building is housed in the former Police Quarters, designed by architect Hillson Beasley, who also designed Government House.() It was built during the boom created by the 1890s Kalgoorlie rush.( The Administration Building moved into the Police Quarters in the 1970s during the nickel mining boom.(The Main Gallery Building was built in 1977, and was also spurred by the mining boom.() Western Australia was also placing more importance on cultural institutions, and the government was inspired by the upcoming 150th anniversary of federation in 1979.( Construction of the Alexander Library began in the same period.(The architect of the Main Gallery Building was K. Sierakowski from the Public Works Department, who worked with engineer Philip Nadebaum and  architectural company, Summerhayes and Associates.( It was designed in the Bauhaus method with a Brutalist exterior, which was popular in European design.( The slab and shear head column system was an innovative architectural feature in WA at the time.(ExhibitionsThe Art Gallerys first collection was eclectic.( The first collection consisted of Indian and Asian craft work, followed by art created by European Australians and copies of English art.( The Movement inspired the collection with its broad definition of art.(Ongoing exhibitions include Indigenous traditional and contemporary art from the Territory and Western Australia, and WA art from the 1820s to 1960s.() An annual exhibition called Year 12 Perspectives highlights works from Western Australian Art and Art & Design students, including paintings, prints, art, design and sculpture.()Past exhibitions have included:*Rodin (2001)()*Monet (2001)( *Ernst (2002)()*Islamic art from Kuwait (2002)(*Pre-Raphealite paintings and drawings from the Gallery (2003)(*Renaissance, 17th century Dutch and 18th and 19th century French drawings from the Historisch Museum (2003)(*Indian art (2004-2005)(*Russian art from the early 1900s (2005)(*Australian ceramics from the 1950s to 1960s (2005-2006)(*Lindsay etchings (2006-2007)(*Egyptian art on loan from the Museum (2007)(ReferencesExternal links* Art Gallery of Western Australia website* Department of Culture and the Arts* See the Gallerys bathroom at the Art Museum Toilet Museum of Art
5710286
Landa_de_Matamoros
footnotes               Landa de Matamoros is a town and municipality located in the northwest of the state of Quertaro in central Mexico. It is part of the Gorda region, which consists of rugged mountains, canyons and wide diversity of flora and fauna, with the municipalitys flora representing about 25% of all the plant diversity in Mexico. In the pre-Hispanic period, the area was heavily influenced by Huastecas and local cultures, later dominated by the Chichimecas, especially the Pames. Complete Spanish domination came late, in the mid 18th century, but two of the five Franciscan mission complexes built to solidify this domination were built in the municipality. Today, Landa de Matamoros remains rural and impoverished with a high rate of emigration out of the area, especially to the United States. Remittances sent by relatives from there now form most of the municipalitys economy. The town Landa de Matamoros sits at the foot of a chain of small mountains with crags at an altitude of 1,040 masl.()()  just off Highway 120 about 210 km from the capital of Querrtaro. The town of Landa de Matamoros is considered to have first been occupied by a group of Purhpecha from Michoacn who migrated north.( In the pre-Hispanic period, it had an important tianguis market, which traded merchandise from other parts of the Huasteca and what is now Tampico.( Today, Landa is a small community with cobblestone streets centered on a traditional main square in front of the mission. Landas main economic activities include agriculture, livestock and services, including government services. It is also head of a district called Centro Estratgico Comunitario Micrregin 01, which oversees economic activities of thirteen communities with just under 2,000 people.()The town of Landa is best known for having one of the five Franciscan missions in the Sierra Gorda, which were made a Heritage Site in 2003. This mission is dedicated to Our Lady of the Conception. It along with the others are noted for their highly decorated Baroque facades, which contains indigenous elements. They were built under the direction of Junipero Serra in the mid 18th century, with the Landa mission built last, in the 1760s.()The Museo de Arte Agropecuario (Museum of Agricultural Art) is located in Landa has three exhibition halls. One room exhibits the fossil remains of a mastodon, which was found under the mission church during restoration work in 1984. The other two contain historical photographs, as well as implements related to farming, livestock, forestry, commerce and home. There is also an area with for temporary exhibits and a handcrafts store. The museum offers guided tours, conferences and summer courses.() There is also the municipal auditorium and a cultural center called a Casa de Cultura.(The most important annual celebration is the feast of the patroness of the community, Our Lady of the Immaculate Conception. At least a thousand migrants return each year to Landa to celebrate, with many of these come from Texas especially Corpus Christi, Houston, Austin and Dallas, bringing their pickup trucks and cowboy clothes with them, but a number also come from Florida and Atlanta. The town hosts a major dance for the occasion, in part to honor the returnees. The event is held during the first half of December. The event often features musical styles popular in Texas.() The municipality The town of Landa de Matamoros is the local governing authority for 130 communities, even though only 1,418 of a total municipal population of 18,905 live in the town proper.() These combined communities cover a territory of 840.2 km2, the third largest in Quertaro.( The municipality is divided into six micro-regions: Landa, Tilaco, Agua Zarca, El Lobo, Valle de Guadalupe and La Lagunita.( The municipality is located in the far northeast of the state, with altitudes that vary from 350 to 2100 masl. It borders only one other municipality in Quertaro, de Serra. It borders the state of Luis Potos to the north and east, and with the state of Hidalgo to the east and south. The municipality is headed by a municipal president and the government has nine officials called regidors.(As of 2000, there were 4,311 homes in the municipality, with an average occupation of 4.78, which is above state average. This has been the case for at least forty years. Most homes are owned by their residents and made of materials such as cement, wood and laminate. About 60% of these homes have running water, 80% have public lighting, 80% have garbage collection and 75% have police services. The municipal government is not in charge of water or sewer services. Landline telephone service is relatively recent, with only seventeen of the most important communities having access. Mail service is not comprehensive.(The municipality has 53 preschools, 57 primary schools, 26 middle schools, including twelve that are distance education, and two that are technical schools. High school level education is distance through video at Tres Lagunas, Tilaco and Agua Zarca. For higher education, it is necessary to leave the municipality. Most go to Jalpan de Serra or the Quertaro state capital to study. A technical college program was recently opened associated with the Autnoma de Quertaro.( Forty eight percent of those over 15 have not finished primary school and twenty-two percent are illiterate.() The migratory situation is diminishing the number of school age children in the municipality for a number of years, with the absence most noted in the primary schools. These children leave, accompanying their parents to the U.S.()The municipality has 180.6 km of paved highway and rural roads. 42.5 km is principal highway; 20.1 km is secondary road and 118 is rural road. There is bus service linking the municipal seat to San Juan del Ro, Quertaro and San Luis Potos. There are also taxis. The municipal seat has various areas for sports including multiple use fields and a grass soccer field.(The municipality consists of a number of communities that share a local government in the municipal seat of Landa de Matamoros. Tilaco comes from Nahuatl and means in black water. The community is head of a municipal delegation containing six sub delegations. Its primary economic activities are agriculture, livestock and tourism. It is 26 km from the municipal seat and has a population of 584. It is the seat of Centro Estratgico Communitario Microrregion03 covering thirteen communities with a population of 3,363.  Tilaco is home to the other Franciscan mission accredited to Serra. The mission has a Baroque facade with three levels in which saints, mermaids, coats of arms, columns and other ornamental details.( It also contains a community museum called the Museo Comunitario Lucio Balderas Mrquez, which displays historical photographs, documents and more related to the community and municipality.(() The feast of Francis of Assisi in Tilaco takes place over the week of 4 October, with activities such as events called jaripeos, horse racing, popular dances, sports and traditional dances in traditional outfits, which is unique to the town.( It is off the main highway of the municipality, with access by a narrow roads that leads to it from La Lagunita, a road built by the parish priest. The town of Tilaco received as parish priest a man by the name of Francisco Isidro Pinol Miracle in 1958. At the time, the town was cut off from the rest of the municipality. The priest worked to have a road built to connect Tilaco with Highway 120 and also work to have the mission church restored, using an old truck lent to him by a friend. Miracle died in 2003, but he is honored in the town by a square named after him.()() Agua Zarca is 51 km from the municipal seat and has a population of 1357. It is a municipal delegation with twenty one subdelegations, the largest in the municipality. It is the seat of Centro Estratgico Communitario Microrregion04 with thirty communities with a population of 6302.( It has a community museum, Museo Comunitario General Porfirio Rubio, which exhibits historical photographs, arms, farm tools, and research documents regarding the families of this community. It has a church that was constructed in the 1950s.((Tangoj is located on the River at the lowest point in the state of Quertaro at 320 masl. Most residents make their living from fishing river shrimp, tilapia, carp and other species. There is also ecotourism in the form of hiking, camping, and horseback riding. It is located 72 km from the municipal seat, past the community of Tilaco.( Tangoj is from Huasteca and means place where they fish.()El Lobo is located 28 km from the municipal seat and has a population of 664. Most residents are dedicated to livestock and forestry. It is a municipal delegation with seven sub delegations. It is the Centro Estratgico Communitario Microrregion06.(La Lagunita is located on the San Juan del Ro-Xilitla highway, eight km from the municipal seat. It is primarily dedicated to commerce with a population of 505. It is head of the Centro Estratgico Communitario Microrregion02 with eighteen communities with a total population of 2575.(Tres Lagunas is located 37 km from the municipal seat at the far northeast of the municipality. It has a population of 657 with seasonal agriculture and livestock as primary economic activities. It is the seat of Centro Estratgico Communitario Microrregion05 with twelve communities and a population of 2489.(Other communities include Las Pilas, El Madroo and Ro Verdito.Las Pilas is located 2 km from the municipal seat where there are important sources of water stored for various communities. El Madroo is characterized by its gray-brown and red soils. Underneath there is a base of limestone containing numerous 100 million year old marine fossils from when this area was under the sea. It is located 25 km from the municipal seat. Ro Verdito is a community located next to a river of the same name, which has a waterfall. It is 46 km from the municipal seat.( Demographics and culture There are no longer any representative indigenous groups in the municipality, with only 36 speaking any kind of indigenous language as of 2005.  Over 96% of the population is Catholic.(From 1950 to 2005, the municipalitys population grew from 9,226 to 19,493 people, representing a growth rate of 0.8%. Birthrates are high and mortality rates are low, however, since the 2000s, the municipality has experienced significant migration out. Without this migration, the growth rate would have been about 1.5%. From 2000 to 2005, the population has decreased to 18,905. It is estimated about 32% of the working age population of the municipality has emigrated to look for employment.( Most from Landa migrate to Texas, especially Houston.() However, those from certain communities tend to go to certain places in the United States. For example, those who are from La Lagunita generally go to Corpus Christi, while those from La Vuelta go to Austin or Dallas and those from the municipal seat tend to go to Florida or Atlanta.( Many from Tilaco got to Houston although at least a few have gone as far north as Nebraska. The money these migrants send back to their families is extremely important to the economy. Landa and other municipalities hold a yearly event at Christmastime in de Sierra to honor those migrants from the U.S. who are visiting families.( At the beginning of December, many of these migrants come back for the feast of Our Lady of the Immaculate Conception, often driving down in pickup trucks and wearing cowboy clothing. The event often features musical styles popular in Texas and also honors these migrants.(The major feast days in the municipality include the spring equinox (March 21) in La Vuelta, feast of the Laborer, (May 15) in Encino Solo, Foundation Day (May 25) in Agua Zarca, Feast of the Sacred Heart (June 16) in La Reforma, Virgin of Mercy (September 24) in La Lagunita, of Assisi (October 4) in Tilaco, and the of Guadalupe (December 12) in Valle de Guadalupe. Another traditional festival celebrated throughout the municipality is of the Dead, which is commemorated from 31 October to 2 November, with Huapango music, fireworks and other activities.( The Feast Day of Our Lady of the Immaculate Conception in Landa is 25 September, celebrated with masses, processions, offerings, dance, music and fireworks. The main feast day for Tilaco is 4 October, in honor of Francis of Assisi, celebrated with masses, processions, dance, including the dance of Moors and Christians, music and fireworks.() Huapango is the dominant traditional music, especially the form called Huapango arribeo, but Huapango abajeo is also played. Typical dishes include nopals with pipian sauce, grilled nopal, river shrimp prepared various ways, atole, beans with nopal, pulque bread, enchiladas in various styles, sweets made from squash seeds, peanuts and squash, gorditas, pacholes, and sacahuil (a very large tamale). Creatures called duendes are often claimed to be seen in the area, especially in areas where there are horses.( The churches The municipality is home to two of the five Franciscan missions in the Sierra Gorda, which were registered together at a Heritage Site in 2003.( The mission complexes standing today were constructed with stone and mortar under the leadership of Serra after he took over evangelization of the area in 1750.( However, both sites had been Augustinian missions earlier in the colonial period, and the Franciscan missions themselves were founded in the 1740s.( After the missions were handed over to regular clergy in 1770, they deteriorated over the centuries. Restoration work on all five churches began from 1979 to 1985, initially focusing on the integrity of the structures and the facades. From 1991 to 1997, restoration of the towns around the missions, including work on monuments, plazas, fountains, building facades, paving streets with stone and more were undertaken. From the late 1990s to the early 2000s, restoration of interiors were done, including to altars, choir areas, organs and paintings.( Much of the work was done to encourage tourism to the area, and the work cost anywhere from one to two million pesos for each church.(() The Santa Mara del Agua de Landa is dedicated to Our Lady of the Immaculate Conception.( The Franciscan mission was founded in 1744, the work on the current complex was done between 1761 and 1768, the last of the five mission complexes built.((() Its construction is generally attributed to Friar Miguel de la Campa, but a number of other Franciscans were active in the area at the same time such as Jos de la Sierpe, Domingo de Arroyabe, Esteban de Basabe, Palu y Pedro Jos Perez, Antonio Paterna Ramos de Lora and Jos Campos.( According to legend, when the Landa mission was being built, there was a small stream that flowed from the Cerro de San Esteban past the mission site. Workers used the water from this stream to quench their thirst. When the complex was finished, the stream dried up and disappeared.( The Landa mission is the most elaborately adorned and considered to have the most equilibrium in its composition.((( It contains a chapel, sacrament portal, baptistery, sacristy, cloister, atrium and garden area.( The atrium is bordered by a wall with access on three sides. In the center is an atrium cross and there are stone paths in the interior of the atrium.( It has a narrow bell tower, which is unified with the facade, which is primarily in ochre tones.(( The main portal includes a very large number of Baroque style ornaments, with vegetative elements and angels with support curtains. There is an image of Our Lady of the Immaculate Conception, along with a number of saints including of the Marshes, of Siena, of Capistrano and of Assisi. On the sides of the choir window, there are two important Franciscans, Scotus and de greda, along with the coat of arms of the order.( At the summit in the center, there is an image of the Michael defeating a demon. The facade has a number of indigenous elements, including an indigenous headdress on the head of the Archangel Michael, but it is not obvious.( For Landa, the mission was restored at a cost of one million pesos. The main plaza was also restored with items such as benches and lighting added. Lighting was later added to the mission itself.( During restoration work in 1985, a mastodon bone fossil was found at the base of the church.( The Tilaco mission contains a choir area, baptistery, sacristy, cloister, chapels and gardens. The mission was built on a mostly leveled incline.( Its bell tower is separate from the body of the church, but connected through the baptistery. Structurally, the tower functions as a buttress.( It is the smallest and simplest of the five missions.() The main doorway is guarded by sculptures of Saints Peter and Paul. There are two niches with Joseph with the Jesus and one with an image of the Conception. Between the two, there is a dove, which represents the Spirit. Above this, there is a rhomboid choir window marked by curtains supported by two angels. An image of of Assisi is at the top of the portal surrounded by cherubs, some of which are reclined against pre-Hispanic style eagles. There are also four columns, each one supported by a mermaid.( Mermaids are not often seen in colonial architecture and it is not known why they were included. Much of the rest of the portal is decorated with flowers and vines along with a representation of the cord Franciscans use to tie their habits.((To encourage tourism to the mission, basic services were installed. There was also restoration of the main plaza and many of the facades around the mission church as well as paving work, which cost about 1.5 million pesos.( Environment The municipality is part of the Gorda region, which is centered on northern Quertaro state. This region is a branch of the Madre Oriental, consisting of mountain chains that parallel the of Mexico.(() This land was sea bed 100 million years ago, which formed ancient sedimentary rock, mostly limestone, which easily erodes. This makes the area part of the Karst.(( Landa de Matamoros is completely within the Sierra Gorda Biosphere Reserve of Quertaro, which was established in 1997.  Of the biospheres nucleus, 1,250 hectares are within the municipality.( Over eighty five percent of the territory is mountainous and rugged with inclines of over 25%. These are mostly found in the south, southeast and northeast. Main elevations include Cerro de Tejocote (2720 masl), La Cebadilla (2560 masl), Cerro Grande de San Juan (1580 masl), Piedra Encimada (1620 masl), La Barca (1380 masl) and Los Orujos (1260 masl). There are a limited number of small valleys, including Plan de Hongos, Tilaco, Tres Lagunas, Valle de Guadalupe and Acatitln de Zaragoza. These areas are mostly covered by forests. Semi flat areas are those with gradients under 25%, with accounts for about 3.5% of the territory.  Much of this area is either forested or arid. Flat lands with gradients of less than 5% correspond to about 11.2% of the municipality. This is where most agriculture takes place, mostly during the rainy season. Most of the flatter areas of the municipality have rich sedimentary deposits of topsoil over a bed of limestone, which was former seabed.  The limestone and other sedimentary rock erode fairly easily, which has led to the formation of caverns and caves (locally called stanos) dispersed throughout the municipality. The pit caves generally run from 400 to 600 meters in depth. Many have straight drops of between 50 and 100 meters, and end with a flat bottom with vegetation and wildlife. The largest is the Tilaco pit cave, 649  meters deep.( The territory is a part of the River basin. In the north the main rivers are the San Juan and the Tangojo, which the Tancuiln is the most important within the south. The River runs along the municipalitys border with Hidalgo.( Other flowing water includes the Ro Verdito and a number of fresh water springs and arroyos, most of which run only during the rainy season. As most residents of the municipality do not have potable water piped to their homes, there are large water storage facilities in Encino Solo, Landa, Tres Lagunas, Otates, Santa Ins, Malpas and Acatitln de Zaragoza from which trucks deliver water to home storage facilities. Many homes also have their own systems to catch rainfall and runoff during the rainy season.(Most of the municipality is covered in various types of mostly deciduous forest, with leaves fully or partially fall during the dry season and the very cold weeks in December and January. Forests of pine, red and white cedar and sweetgum are prominent in the higher elevations. In the hot and dry areas, various cactus and other arid area plants such as cats claw, biznaga cactus, maguey, organ cactus, and nopals can be found.( Landa has one of the few mesophile forests in the state of Queretaro, which is mostly found in steep canyon areas between 800 and 2000 masl. Between 600 and 800 meters, the mesophile forest blends with tropical rainforest such as in the bottom of the Tancuilin Canyon. A study of flora in the municipality counted 774 species of vascular plants, with the most diversity found in old growth areas where the thick tree canopy traps moisture. These areas have trees that measure thirty to forty meters in height. Most of the plant species are classified as herbs, followed by bushes, then trees, reeds, epiphyte and parasitic plants. Ninety one percent are classified as tropical vegetation. The variety of species here represents about 25% of the plant diversity in Mexico.( A recently discovered species, named queretaroensis, is a rare plant restricted to the municipality. It is related to volubilis,  which is restricted to Jalisco and Michoacn, but differs in form and insertion of the leaves and vestiture. It is an herb that grows about seventy cm in height in the forest areas of oak, pine and mesophile forests in altitudes between 1700 and 1850 masl.()However, much of the forest is fragmented and highly disturbed. The best-conserved areas are in the canyons and steep inclines that are hard to access, such as the Tancuiln Canyon around Neblinas and El Humo. Another area with is well preserved are the highest elevations of the mountains including the area around La Joya del Hielo, La Florida and La Yesca up to Puerto Hondo. In other areas, forests are broken up with patches of farmland or pasture.( Despite being in the biosphere reserve, destruction of the environment still proceeds, even in areas considered to be nuclei such as La Joya del Hielo and Llano Chiquito.( Landa de Matamoros, along with Arroyo Seco, have begun controlled pasturing using electric fences, which also allows forage plants to recover. They are also developing hydroponic forage, which is grown in water, without soil.()This mesophile forest is found in the wettest part of the Sierra Gorda, where the moisture can reach the east facing slopes. Most of the area is classed as moist and semi hot. (A) C (fm) by the Koppen classification, or moist and semi hot, with most rain falling in the summer rainy season but rain and fog can be found at other times too, especially in the highest elevations.( The average annual rainfall is 920mm although this has varied significantly in recent years.( Temperatures vary widely depending on altitude. The high mountains areas are the coldest, experiencing freezing temperatures regularly, with the lower flatter lands having more tropical or arid land characteristics. The average annual temperature is 22C, with May as the hottest month, with temperatures rising as high as 43C. In January, there can be temperatures as low as -2C.( In the 2000s, areas of the state have experienced hard freezes on several occasions, with temperatures as low as -10C.()() These freezing temperatures are due to cold fronts coming from the north and west. These usually only produce fog and light rain, with stronger ones causing freezing temperatures.(() Freezing temperatures have caused emergency conditions requiring interventions by civil authorities and have also led to loss of pasture for cattle.(( During the rainy season, large storms can cause severe flooding along rivers such as the Moctezuma and Tancuiln. In 2010, flooding damaged crops in El Naranjo and El Lobo, with dozens of hecatares of corn damaged. The rugged geography makes roads vulnerable to landslides, with rocks up to 1.5 tons falling onto Highway 120.() Recent years of drought have stressed the trees of the area and have made them vulnerable to insects.(Wildlife includes pumas, bobcats, coyotes, foxes, armadillos, badgers, rabbits, deer, squirrels, roadrunners, various lizards, and a wide variety of birds including macaws and parrots.(The varied terrain has made for a number of natural attractions. The community of Ro Verdito has a waterfall located above the El Lobo-Agua Zarca road. The location has various natural pools of water and places to camp.( The Tancuiln River has canyons.( The community of Tangojo on the River is noted for the fishing of tilapia, carp and river shrimp called acamaya. There are also facilities for kayaking and rappelling.   The Santa Martha rest stop is on the Landa de Matamoros Xilitla highway at KM 230.5. It is a forested area with pines and cedars. The area has picnic tables.( La Joya del Hielo occupies a small depression high in the mountains. This makes its vegetation unique, especially with the abundant presence of magnolia trees. It is considered to be one of the nucleus areas of the biosphere reserve.( History Landa is derived from a Chichimeca expression lan-h, which means muddy place. de Matamoros was added to the name in 1919, by a state decree to honor insurgent Matamoros who was here during the War of Independence.( The coat of arms contains a number of symbols related to its history. The indigenous phrase (lan-h) and an image of the mission relate to its indigenous past and Spanish conquest. The name of Matamoros appears for historical reasons as well. Concentric circles signify the encounter of indigenous and Spanish cultures. The lifestyle of the area is represented by a maguey plant, an ear of corn, the sun, the mountains, a drum and a book. Leaves and fruits found in the upper and lower parts indicate the indigenous respect for nature as well symbols of greatness. To the left of the mission church, there is a representation of the native dance of San Francisco de Asis church in Tilaco. Landas identity as Mexican is represented by the national seal, the Mexican flag, and the flag of the Landa mission.(Landa de Matamoros is part of the heart of the Sierra Gorda. This region has been occupied for about 6000 years. In the Pre Classic and Classic periods, the Sierra Gorda had a number of small cities as the climate at that time was wetter than it is now. Most of the larger cities were south of the current municipalities due to mining activities and major trade routes, but there were cities and trade routes through here as well, connecting the area mostly with Huasteca areas to the east and other areas to the north.( While most of the pre-Hispanic history of the area is dominated by peoples culturally related to the Huastecas, the site of the town of Landa de Matamoros is thought to have been first occupied by a group of Purhpecha who migrated north from what is now Michoacn.( As the climate of the Sierra Gorda dried out in the early Post Classic period, cities were abandoned for simpler hunter gatherer communities and there were migrations of Chichimecas, mostly Pames and Jonaz from the north. Landa would become Pame territory.( The Pame would continue to dominate this area for the rest of the pre-Hispanic period, but small communities of Otomis and Huastecas would also be established as well. The Aztecs also made incursions here, which led to the formation of the Oxitilpa dominion, a commercially based political organization allied with the Aztecs. Aztec records indicate that the Sierra Gorda was a tributary area, but it is likely that the Aztecs only controls parts on the periphery up to the River. This route leads to the modern settlement of Landa de Matamoros. However, archeological evidence so far is related to the Pame.(The Spanish made incursions into the area early in the colonial period, but the Chichimeca, especially the Jonaz, put up fierce resistance to their intrusions. This would keep the Spanish from fully dominating the area for two hundred years. The Pames were considered less resistant and as early as the 16th century, Augustinians from Xilitla and Franciscans from Michoacn founded missions in the Landa area. However, these would not remain permanently.(( The Spanish would break Chichimeca resistance in the Sierra Gorda in the 1740s, with the expeditions of de Escandn, culminating in the of Media Luna. To solidify these military gains, Franciscans founded new missions in this and other areas of northern Quertaro, the heart of the Sierra Gorda. These missions were taken over by Serra starting in 1750, who decided to have elaborate mission complexes built in five locations, two of which are in the municipality, in Landa de Matamoros and in Tilaco. In addition to evangelization, the missions worked to group the semi nomadic Pames into permanent communities centered on churches.((A smallpox epidemic in 1762 caused the deaths of 5,300 and depopulated some of the mission communities. After the missions were handed over to regular clergy in 1771, the indigenous population of five communities abandoned their homes for the mountains because of abuses and inability to understand the new priests.(During the War of Independence, various insurgents such as Ignacio and Rafael Lpez Rayn, Mara Liceaga, Julin and Villagrn and Luis Herrera found refuge here. The most important person to do so was Matamoros, who was here from 1807 to 1808. During this time, he offered his services as priest at the Landa mission church.((  In 1825, Landa was part of the municipality of Jalpan according to the first state constitution. Until 1917, Landa was a subdelegation of the district/municipality of Jalpan de Serra. In this year, it was made a full delegation, and the community of Landa was recognized as a town. In 1941, the delegation was converted into a free municipality.(There was unrest here during the War, with some taking up arms.(Like the rest of the Sierra Gorda, economic development has lagged behind other parts of Quertaro and Mexico, in part to the end of mining in neighboring municipalities and in part to the ruggedness of the regions terrain. From the last decades of the 20th century to the present, the economic marginalization of the area has given the municipality one of the highest rates of emigration.() Most migrants go to the United States, and the money they send back has now become the major income for Landa and the rest of the Sierra Gorda.( However, the migration is dangerous. In March and April 2010, seventeen residents of the municipality disappeared while en route to the United States. Most are believed to have been kidnapped by armed men while their bus was in the state of Tamaulipas, taken to work in fields growing drugs.(( As of March 2011, the men have yet to be found, although four men were arrested in connection with the incident, for threatening the families of the victims.() The incident has provoked the municipal government to advise residents not to go the United States, especially not through routes controlled by drug traffickers.(Drug trafficking has been an issue within the municipality as well. In 2010, the Mexican Army identified a synthetic drug laboratories in the municipality.  The lab was making meth among other drugs and was the largest ever found in the state of Quertaro.() This military has also been involved in the break up of a kidnapping ring as well. Two military bases have been proposed for the municipality along with another in neighboring Arroyo Seco, to guard the Quertaro/Luis Potos against drug trafficking. One reason for the base is that there is a lack of police in the area because of its poverty.()EconomyThe municipality has one of the lowest average incomes in Mexico.()() From the 1960s to the 1990, the percentage of economically active people in the municipality declined from 33.5% to 21.2%. It rose slightly to 22.1% in 2000. Over twelve percent of the employment is working in the family without pay. Women make up less than seventeen percent of the paid workforce.( To improve nutrition in the impoverished area, amaranth has been promoted as an alternative grain to corn and wheat because of its exceptional nutritive qualities. This is a grain native to Mexico, but its use was prohibited and or discouraged by Spanish authorities because of it religious connections.()Just over 54% of the working population is dedicated to agriculture, livestock and forestry.( Agriculture is not a principal economic activity due to the lack of arable land. Most land is used for livestock and forestry. The agriculture that is practiced is traditional and in small plots. Around 3,400 hectares are farmed during the rainy season, principally in Landa, Encino Solo, Palo Verde, La Reforma, La Lagunita, Otates, Tres Lagunas, Acatitln de Zaragoza, Tilaco, and Valle de Guadalupe. Most crops consist of corn, beans, sorghum, peas and chickpeas and coffee. Fruit trees include orange, peach, papaya, lime, avocado, grapefruit, lemon, sapote, plum, apple and mango. There is also sugar cane and coffee grown.( The most important natural resource is forest area. These forests include pine, oak, oyamel, white cedar and trees. Some fine woods such as red cedar and walnut can also be found. Logging occurs on about 14390 hectares, or about seventeen percent of the municipalitys territory. Most are located near the communities of El Madroo, Tres Lagunas and Agua Zarca. Most forest lands are ejidos or otherwise communally owned, with the rest privately owned. There are sixty eight locations dedicated to lumber and over 500 dedicated to collecting other forest products. The declaration of the biosphere reserve has allowed for better control of illegal logging. There are some mineral deposits such as magnesium, silver and lead, but they have not been exploited due to the lack of geological studies. There is also a small petroleum deposit in Tres Lagunas.( About 63,700 hectares are dedicated to livestock such as cattle, pigs, sheep, goats, horses, various domestic fowl and bees. Most occurs in Landa, Agua Zarca, Otates, La Reforma, La Vuelta and Tres Lagunas because of the availability of natural and seeded pastures. Livestock raising has faced challenges due to recent climate changes in the municipality raising the cost of feeding the animals.(Over 18% of the working population is dedicated to mining, construction, industry and manufacturing. Industry is mostly limited to a number of handcrafts such as leather goods and ceramics and some food processing, especially related to corn. Some communities create handcrafts such as wool items, ceramics including jars and comals, palm mats, knitted items, copal incense and wood items such as toys and furniture.(Commerce and services provide over twenty one percent of the employment. The municipality has 195 commercial establishments mostly located in the larger communities. There are no municipal markets, but there are tianguis markets during the weeks in several locations especially the municipal seat, Tilaco, La Lagunita and Agua Zarca( La Lagunita holds a large tianguis on Saturday.( Most commerce is geared to local consumption and basic needs.  There is some tourism, mostly associated with the two mission churches in Landa and Tilaco. There is only one two-star hotel in the community of El Lobo, with fifteen rooms and a restaurant.(It is not known exactly how many people from Quertaro go to work in the United States, nor how many come at the end of the year to visit.( Landa has one of the highest emigration rates in Quertaro.( Most from Landa migrate to Texas, especially Houston.( The dollars that return here have a large impact in Landa and other municipalities of the Sierra Gorda region. It is estimated that between 50,000 and 100,000 USD per day comes into the Sierra Gorda region, or about 18 million per year based on estimates of money changed in the area. This quantity is more than the entire municipal budge of Landa and accounts for most of the money residents live on, dwarfing the amount made through the local economy of farming and forestry. The currency itself circulates here, accepted in a number of businesses.( In the community of Tres Lagunas, there are three hundred families with at least one member from each in the United States. All of its streets, including the entrance road are dirt. Many of the houses are now of brick or block, with satellite TV, paid for by remittance money, but there is no piped water.( Dollars sent back by migrants in the United States is not only received directly by families, it is also used to fund public works projects through organizations such as the Federacion de Clubes de Migrantes de la Sierra Gorda, which includes six groups from Landa de Matamoros. Much of this money is matched two for one by the Mexican federal government. The first community to benefit from this problem was La Lagunita, with an initial offering of USD5,000. Most works focus on paving, water systems, drainage and electricity.() This money is so important to Landa and other Sierra Gorda municipalities that there is an annual event dedicated to them each December in Jalpan de Serra, which Landa partially sponsors, called Da del Paisano.(() Archeology There are two archeological zones/former ceremonial sites in El Lobo and a cave area in the community of Neblinas. There are small indigenous temples in Potero del Llano, Agua Zarca, El Sabinito and La Campana, which contain stone and clay idols linked to the Pame, Huasteco and Jonaz cultures.( The La Campana site in the municipality has been sacked and destroyed, despite recent measures taken to protect local sites. The crime was reported by archeologists Mara Teresa Muoz Espinoza and Jos Carlos Castaeda Reyes, who state that this is the most important site of the area. The site belongs to the Huasteca culture and dated to about 600 CE. It is located between the communities of La Campana and Las nimas.  The site has also been damaged by landslides, possibly provoked by the illegal mining of white sand in the area. This is where the worst damage to the site is. The site measures thirty eight meters long and five meters in depth. Thefts include a complete burial with various ceramic objects. A large grinding stone was destroyed intentionally. The site was discovered about sixty years ago but there has been no budget to excavate it formally. However, there have been about 160 structured counted including platforms, plazas, patios and more. There is a push to cover and protect the area, especially that closest to where the sand mining occurs.()Fossils found in the area include those of marine life in the community of El Madroo and Pleistocene animals in the municipal seat, principally that of mastodons.( The Sierra Gorda region 100 million years ago was sea bed. The El Madroo fossil deposit is one of the most important of its kind in Mexico as it is the only one with such a wide diversity of species in excellent state of conservation. Many of the species found have been identified and include a large number of invertebrate species and species not before found in the region. However, research into the area has not been concluded.(Referencesde Matamorosde Matamorosde Matamorosru:--
5712931
Robinson_Hotel
 refnum  78000747()The Robinson Hotel is located in the former mining town of Julian, California, States. It was one of the first businesses in San Diego County to be owned and operated by African-Americans.HistoryAlbert Robinson and Margaret Tull Robinson started, in the 1890s, a business originally entitled the Robinson Restaurant and Bakery.  This business quickly became popular during the relatively brief gold rush that Julian experienced. Their hotel, which is still in operation under a different name, is the oldest continuing operating hotel in California. The original hotel was constructed in 1897, with the bakery-restaurant structure having been razed to make room for the hotel. During the construction process, Albert planted cedar and locust trees around the hotel, which survive to the present day.The hotel has stayed in business for over a hundred years and has repeatedly been expanded and improved, with air conditioning being a major new improvement added in the 21st Century. The building is currently known as the Julian Gold Rush Hotel. Albert was a former slave who came to Julian with his former slave owner. During the gold rush days of Julian, most of San Diego Countys African-Americans lived in remote Julian, rather than the city of San Diego.  Another influential black pioneer of the time, and a friend of the Robinsons, was Newton. Albert and Margaret met in Julian, Albert being employed at the time as a cook. They were married in the late 1880s. Albert died on June 10, 1915.  Margaret sold the hotel in 1921. The hotel is listed in the National Register of Historic Places.References* Julian City and Cuyamaca Country Charles R. LeMenager, 1992, Eagle Peak Publishing.  External links* The Julian Gold Rush Hotel* Julian Chamber of Commerce
5721786
America_Newton
America Newton (Dyer Newton) was one of the original American pioneers who helped launch the former mining town of California.  Newton was a former slave who provided laundry services in Julian during its rush days and beyond. She resided in Julian for more than 50 years. Newton arrived in Julian in 1872, having come from Missouri. America Newton owned an  homestead near Julian. A shop in Julian is named in her memory. She died of pneumonia in 1917.References* Julian City and Cuyamaca Country Charles R. LeMenager, 1992, Eagle Peak Publishing.External links* Julian Black Historical Society* Julian Chamber of Commerce* The Controversy over the Newton Burial Site
5730247
Baley
dateMay 2010Baley () is a town in Krai, Russia, located on the River (Amurs basin) some  east of Chita. Population: 14,000 (2005 est.); 14,797 (2002 Census).HistoryThe town was first founded as the gold mining settlement of Novotroytskoye, after alluvial gold was discovered in the area in the 19th century.Town status was granted in 1938, with the town receiving its present name.The Baleylag prison camp of the gulag was constructed here, to house prisoners used as slave labour for mining the Tasseyevskoye gold deposits discovered in the region in 1947.Economy and infrastructureThe towns economy remains reliant of gold mining, with numerous shafts, an open-cut mine and processing facilities.  Since 2004, exploitation of the gold deposits has been under the control of Canada company Gold.It is served by Airport.ReferencesExternal links*City of Baley*Baley Today()de:Baleieo:Balej(Russie)ko:io:Baleiit:Balejhe:no:Balejnn:Balejru:fi:Baleitl:Baleytg:war:Baleydiq:Baleyzh:
5735526
Xica_da_Silva
 followed by    Xica da Silva (released as Xica in the States) is a 1976 Brazilian film directed and written by Diegues. It stars Motta, Chagas and Wilker. It was chosen as the Brazilian submission for the Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the Academy Awards, but it failed to get a nomination. Plot summary The film is based on the novel Memrias do Distrito de Diamantina, written by Joo Felicio dos Santos (who has a small role in the film as a Catholic pastor). It is a romanticized retelling of the true story of da Silva, an 18th century African slave in the state of Gerais, who attracts the attention of Joo Fernandes de Oliveira, a Portuguese sent by Lisbon with the Crowns exclusive contract for mining diamonds, and eventually becomes his lover. He quickly asserts control, letting the intendant and other authorities know that hes onto their corruption scheme. Eventually Lisbon hears of Joos excesses and sends an inspector. Jos, a political radical, provides Xica refuge. Main cast* Zez Motta as Xica da Silva* Walmor Chagas as Joo Fernandes* Altair Lima as Intendent* Elke Maravilha as Hortncia* Stepan Nercessian as Jos* Arena as Sargeant* Wilker as The Count of Valadares* Marcos Vinicius as Teodoro* Joo Felicio dos Santos as pastor TV adaptation On 1996, the now defunct TV station Manchete successfully adapted the film plot to the telenovela format, directed by Walter Avancini, written by Walcyr Carrasco and starring Arajo as the title character. This telenovela marked the first time an Afro-Brazilian actress played the lead role on a TV show. On 2005, SBT re-aired Xica da Silva.External links**da Silvada Silva (filme)
5741938
Nevada_Highway_Patrol
 reference       Nevada Highway Patrol (NHP) is a division of the Department of Public Safety that is responsible for law enforcement across the entire state of Nevada.  The headquarters is located in Carson City with regional commands in Reno, Elko and Las Vegas.()The duties of the Patrol range from enforcing the laws on the highways to operating the States criminal history repository.HistoryIn 1908 the State Police was created to provide a state level law enforcement presence as a result of labor strikes in the mining communities. When Ford made ownership of the automobile accessible to the populace of America by mass producing the Model T Ford, the problem of enforcing the laws of the road soon followed. On June 23, 1923, the first Nevada State Highway Patrolman was hired by the Nevada Highway Department under the supervision of the of the Nevada State Police. This officer and the Inspector of the State Police would travel throughout the State collecting automobile registration fees and enforcing the laws of the highway. Nevada was one of the first western states to have an organized highway patrol function.()By 1934, the highway patrol force had grown to three officers still supervised by the Inspector of the State Police. They were given silver patrol cars with gold stars on the door, red lights and sirens, and told to patrol the roads. One officer was assigned to Las Vegas, Reno and Elko.This part of the Nevada State Police remained operational until the State Police were reorganized in 1943. At that time, the Nevada State Highway Patrol was absorbed into the State Police who continued highway law enforcement until 1949 when the Nevada Highway Patrol was organized.The 1949 Legislature created the Nevada Highway Patrol by consolidating the Nevada State Police, Inspectors from the Public Service Commission and several Inspectors from the Department of Taxation. On July 1, 1949, the Nevada Highway Patrol Division was created within the Nevada Public Service Commission. These officers were directed to act as field agents and inspectors in the enforcement of the State laws as they pertained to Nevada highways. But the history of law enforcement on Nevada highways goes back many years before the Nevada Highway Patrol was created.In 1957, the Legislature created the Department of Motor Vehicles and transferred the Nevada Highway Patrol to this new department as a division.In 1985, the name of the Department was changed to the of Motor Vehicles and Public Safety (DMV&PS) to reflect the law enforcement agencies that had been added.  At the same time, Fifty-two Field Enforcement Agents of the Motor Carrier Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles were transferred to the Nevada Highway Patrol and consolidated with existing Commercial Vehicle Safety Officers of the Nevada Highway Patrol to form the Commercial Enforcement Bureau within the NHP.In 2001, DMV&PS was split into separate departments and the Nevada Highway Patrol is now a division of the Department of Public Safety.In 2005, NHP opened a new center and operations center in Clark County.In 2007, DPS Northern Nevada Communications center moved from the Reno Northern Command Headquarters into the State Emergency Operations Center in Nevadas capitol city, Carson City. Commands *Headquarters  (City, Nevada)*Northern Command  (Nevada)*Central Command  (Nevada)*Southern Command  (Las Vegas, Nevada) DemographicsReference (http://www.ojp.usdoj.gov/bjs/pub/pdf/lemas00.pdf U.S. Department of Justice, Bureau of Justice Statistics, Law Enforcement Management and Administrative Statistics, 2000: Data for Individual State and Local Agencies with 100 or More Officers)*Male: 94%*Female: 6%*White: 89%*Hispanic: 5%*African-American/Black: 3%*Asian: 3% Flight operations The NHP flight operations unit consists of three fixed-wing aircraft.  The aircraft are predominantly used for speed enforcement, prisoner transport and personnel transport. The planes are also used for emergency blood delivery and to assist other law enforcement agencies. Fleet *  Cessna Skylane 182 RG based in Las Vegas*  Cessna Centurion 210 RG based in Carson City*  Cessna Cutlass 172 RG based in Elko See also * of law enforcement agencies in Nevada* S. Dickerson* Capitol PoliceReferencesExternal links *Nevada Highway Patrol
5746930
John_Otto_(park_ranger)
John Otto (December 30, 1870 - June 19, 1952) was the first park custodian at National Monument, and had been a key advocate for its creation and its later inclusion in the Park Service.A self-professed trailbuilder described as a benign but enthusiastic eccentric,() Otto arrived in Junction, Colorado in 1906. He spent most of his time exploring the nearby plateau and canyon wilderness. In 1907, Otto wrote, I came here last year and found these canyons, and they felt like the heart of the world to me. Im going to stay and promote this place, because it should be a national park.()Because of his efforts to promote and protect the area, others took notice, and by 1909 the local newspaper was lobbying to make the area a national park. On May 24, 1911 the area was designated National Monument. Otto was hired as the Monuments first custodian. Until the mid-1930s he lived in the park and drew a salary of $1 per month.According to Albright, Otto was a marvelous guide and knew every inch of his monument, which he tended like a personal kingdom.() Among his accomplishments was carving a steep stairway up the near-vertical ascent of Independence Monument, the largest such feature in the park, which after the parks designation he used to summit the monolith and raise an American flag.()() He was often dubbed The Trail Builder or The Hermit of Monument Park in newspaper and magazine stories, and was rarely seen without his two burros (named Foxie and Cookie) laden with camping equipment and provisions.(Born in MO, he married Beatrice Farnham on August 21, 1911 at Temple Rock in Canyon. They divorced in 1912. () Otto lived his final twenty years on a mining claim near California, where he was buried in a paupers grave. In 2002, the Colorado National Monument Association erected a gravestone carved using a sandstone rock resembling Independence Monument.( ) References 
5760723
Alabama_Civil_War_Confederate_units
 This is a list of Alabama Civil War Confederate UnitsInfantry Units*Alabama Conscripts (Echols Company) *Guards Lockharts Battalion (1st Regiment Alabama Infantry Reserves) *Mobile Infantry (Local Defense) *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry Loomis*Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry, Alabama Reserves *Battalion Alabama Infantry, Alabama Reserves *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry, Alabama Reserves *Battalion Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry (McClellans)*Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Battalion Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry (ONeals)*Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *and 58th Regiments (Consolidated) Alabama Infantry  *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry (originally designated as the 26th) *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama Infantry *Regiment Alabama InfantryCavalry*1st Regiment Alabama Cavalry *2nd Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  (Loves) *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (Roddys) *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (Russells) *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (Balls - Hatchs) *Confederate Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (10th Regiment -  Burtwells) *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  (Partisan Rangers) *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  (Partisan Rangers) *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  (Partisan Rangers) *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  (Milus E. Bushwhacker Johnstons Partisan Rangers)*Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (Partisan Rangers) *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (Partisan Rangers) *Regiment Alabama Cavalry  (Partisan Rangers) *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  (Alabama Reserves) *Alabama Cavalry  *(Harrells) Battalion Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  *Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama Cavalry  *Battalion Alabama CavalryArtillery units*Battalion Alabama Artillery *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery, Company A (McRaes Battery) *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery, Company B (Waters Battery) *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery, Company C *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery, Company D (Sengstaks Battery) *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery, Company E (Gages Battery) *Battalion Alabama Light Artillery, Company F (Lumsdens Battery) *Battalion Alabama Artillery *Alabama Light Artillery Company (Kolbs Battery) *Alabama Artillery Battery *Alabama Artillery Battery (Phelans) *Nelson Alabama Artillery Battery *Alabama Artillery Battery (Hurts) *Davis Alabama Artillery Battery *Alabama Artillery Battery (Clantons) *Alabama Artillery Battery (Semples-Goldthwaites) *Alabama True Blues Artillery Battery*Alabama Artillery Battery (Dents) *State Artillery Battery (Ketchums - Garritys) *Alabama Artillery Battery *Alabama Artillery Battery *Alabama Artillery Battery (Cruses)Misc* 1st Battalion, Cadets* 1st Conscripts* 1st Mobile Volunteers * 5th Battalion (Blounts), Volunteers * 5th Battalion, Volunteers* 18th Battalion, Volunteers* 55th Volunteers*Alabama Conscripts *Alabama Rebels *Alabama Recruits *Allens Company *Arringtons (Captain) Company A, City Troop (Mobile) *Barbieres Battalion, Cavalry *Barlows (Captain) Company, Cavalry *Battalion of Conscripts and Reserves *Bay Batteries *Belsers (Captain) Company, Reserves *Blighs (Captain) Company, Militia *Bowies (Captain) Company, Cavalry *Brooks (Captain) Company, Cavalry Reserves *Calhoun County Reserves *Callaways (Captain) Company, Cavalry *Camp of Instruction, Talladega, Alabama *Campbells (Captain) Company, Militia *Chisolms (Captain) Company *Clantons Battery, Light Artillery *Coosa County Reserves *Crawfords (Captain) Company *Darbys (Captain) Company, Auburn Home Guards, Volunteers *Echols (Lieutenant) Company of Conscripts *Eufaula Light Artillery *Faggs (Captain) Company, Lowndes Rangers, Volunteers *Falkners (Captain) Company, Cavalry (Chambers Cavalry) *Fayette County Reserves *Fire Battalion of Mobile *Forrests Cavalry *Freemans (Captain) Company, Prison Guard *Gachets Company, Cavalry *Gid Nelson Light Artillery *Goldsmiths (Captain) Independent Company, Volunteers *Goldthwaites Battery, Light Artillery *Gorffs (Captain) Company (Mobile Pulaski Rifles) *Graves Company, Cavalry *Gueringers (Captain) Company, Militia *Hardies Battalion, Cavalry Reserves *Hardys (Captain) Company (Eufaula Minutemen) *Herts (Captain) Company *Hilliards Legion *Holloways Company, Cavalry *Hunts (Captain) Company, Militia *Hurts Battery, Light Artillery *Kolbs Battery, Light Artillery *Lee, Jrs., (Captain) Company, Volunteers *Lees Battery, Light Artillery *Leighton Rangers *Lenoirs (Captain) Independent Company, Cavalry *Lewis Battalion, Cavalry *Locketts (Captain) Company, City Guards *Logans Company, Mounted Reserves *Meadors (Captain) Company, Volunteers *Miscellaneous, Alabama *Mobile City Troop *Montgomery Guards *Morelands Regiment, Cavalry *Morris (Captain) Company (Mounted Men) *Moses (Captain) Squadron, Cavalry *Murphys Battalion, Cavalry *Odens, John (Captain) Company, Mounted Infantry *Orrs (Captain) Company, Morgan Defenders *Palmers (Captain) Company, State Reserves *Phelans Company, Light Artillery *Rabbys (Captain) Coast Guard Company No. 1, Volunteers *Randolph County Reserves *Rankins (Captain) Company, Reserves *Readys Battalion, Reserves *Reeds Supporting Force, 2d Congressional District *Rives (Captain) Supporting Force, 9th Congressional District *Roddeys Escort, Cavalry *Seawells (Captain) Battery (Mohawk Artillery) *Shelby County Reserves *State Artillery *Stewarts (Lieutenant) Detachment, Local Defense *Stuarts Battalion, Cavalry *Talladega County Reserves *Tarrants Battery, Light Artillery *Toomers (Captain) Company, Local Defense and Special Service (Chunchula Guards) *Wards (Captain) Battery, Light Artillery *Wests (Captain) Company, Militia *Youngs (Captain) Company, Nitre and Mining Corps *Youngs Company, Cavalry (State Reserves)Partisan Rangers* 13th Battalion, Partisan Rangers* 15th (First) Battalion, Partisan Rangers* 51st Partisan Rangers * 53rd Partisan Rangers* 56th Partisan RangersMilitia* 2nd Volunteer Militia* 3rd Volunteer Militia* 4th Volunteer Militia* 48th Militia* 89th Militia * 94th Militia * 95th MilitiaReserves * 3rd Alabama Reserves* 4th Reserves * 3rd Battalion Reserves  See also*of American Civil War Regiments by State*Confederate Units by State*in the American Civil War*of Alabama Union Civil War regimentsSources*Dyer, Frederick Henry. A Compendium of the War of the Rebellion, Des Moines: Dyer Publishing Co. (1908).External links*Consolidated Alabama Civil War Regiments*National Park Service Civil War Soldiers and Sailors Website*The Civil War Archive, Union Regimental Index: Alabama
5766807
Happy_Camp,_California
footnotes  Happy Camp is a place (CDP) in Siskiyou County, California in the States. The population was 1,190 at the 2010 census.The town of Happy Camp The Heart of the Klamath is located on State Route 96, about  west of Interstate 5 and  northeast of Willow Creek.  The town of Oregon is accessible from Happy Camp (which is nearly  away).  The shortest route to Oregon, over the Grey Back pass, is a seasonal summer road and is not cleared or maintained in snowy conditions.  Check with the Forest Service located in town on SR 96,() for road closure information.Take the virtual tour of the State of Jefferson Scenic Byway along the Klamath River and up Grayback Road.Time linePrior to 1851 - The area now occupied by Happy Camp is the ancestral homeland of the Karuk tribe. Karuk means upriver people. Their cousins, the Yurok, are the downriver people. There was a Karuk village on the banks of Indian Creek near the Klamath River.  1851 - European Americans began to settle in the area, then known as Murderers Bar because of culturalclashes and claim jumping.  Later that year, the areas name was changed when a group of about thirty miners arrived to seek gold in the Klamath River Valley. According to Vera Tolemans history, published by the Siskiyou County Historical Society, At a time of celebrating their survival of the hardships of the trip up the treacherous Klamath and of having found a spot where the pickings seemed so promising, they named it Happy Camp. They made their way up the Klamath River in the late spring or early summer from the Salmon River, southwest of Happy Camp, working the Klamaths gravel bars as they came.1856 - By this year Henry Doolittle owned a home on the east bank of Indian Creek, a hotel, the American House, and a general merchandise business. The American House is probably the original name of the Cuddihy Hotel, which still exists as of 2002 on the corner of 2nd Avenue and Indian Creek Road.1857 - James and Heil Camp and John Titus bought the buildings at Ferry Point, downriver, and started operating the ferry there. Later they moved to Happy Camp where they built the Camp Mercantile store, which still exists as of 2002.1862 - Henry Doolittle appointed to be postmaster in Happy Camp and served in that office until 1870.1865 - By this year the Camp Mercantile store had been built at the corner of Bridge and Main (now 2nd and Indian Creek Rd.) by James Camp, his brother, Heil Camp, and John Titus. They had purchased the lot from Henry Doolittle, whose American House hotel is still right across the street.1866 - Henry Doolittle appointed to be Justice of the Peace and served in that office until 1870.1872 - March - Henry Doolittle sold out his mining companies to the Happy Camp Hydraulic Mining Company. This sale included water rights on Indian Creek, Elk Creek, Grider Creek, and Perkins Creekthe Keystone Ditch, the Empire Ditch, the Eureka Ditch, and the Hornback Ditch together with all dams belonging to said ditchesall gravel benches, and mining claims and mining ground covered by said ditches and creeks, together with all flumes, tunnels, improvements, pipesa sawmill located in Happy Camp, with its lot and barn and adjoining lot, flume and dam belonging to said sawmill, two yoke of oxen, the butcher shop, corral and barn, also dwelling house and lot. Henry Doolittle left town after this sale and went to Washington state, according to his great-grandson, Richard Ramsey.1875 - Staples Sawmill - 1/2 mile downriver on south side of Klamath River. Bought by James Camp Co.1877 - Happy Camp Hydraulic Mining Company sold to Horace Gasquet. This included .1880 - Happy Camp Hydraulic Mining Company claims patented by Horace Gasquet, owner. This included Schoolhouse Flat (northeast of town) and the mine southwest of town (now at the Happy Camp Airport). The census for 1880 shows Happy Camp population 597 including 250 Chinese and 97 Karuks.1883 - James Camp, Heil Camp, John Titus built a bridge over Indian Creek using steel and wood. The long irons were brought into Happy Camp by pack train.1884 - Howard Gasquet sold Happy Camp Hydraulic Mining Company lands plus the Ferguson and Frazier patent (39.93 acres) to an eastern gentleman, excepting a strip of land on the east bank of Indian Creek. Bridge over Indian Creek built by James and Heil Camp and John Titus in 1883 sold to Del Norte County.1885 - Happy Camp Hydraulic Mining Company purchased by Siskiyou Mining Company, a New York based firm. They operated the mine for ten years.1890 - John Titus sold his interests to James Camp and moved to Fruitvale, California. Soon afterward James Camp gave up his 20 year job as postmaster in Happy Camp and sold his business interests to Horace Gasquet. Camp moved to Fort Jones where he had other business interests.(Happy Camp Timeline)ClimateGeographyHappy Camp sits on the River and a nexus of creeks including: Elk Creek; Little Grider Creek; Indian Creek; Doolittle Creek; Ikes Creek; Deer Lick Creek and Cade Creek.Take the virtual tour of the State of Jefferson Scenic Byway along the Klamath River.According to the States Census Bureau, the CDP covers an area of 12.3 square miles (32.0 km), 12.1 square miles (31.4 km) of it is land and 0.2 square miles (0.6 km) of it (1.94%) is water.The town of Happy Camp is also known as the Gateway to the Marbles.  There are many trailheads for this Wilderness Area within ten miles (16 km) of the town.  Check with the Forest Service for trail information.  The Marble Mountains cover thousands of acres, and contain almost a hundred lakes.  Among the most interesting lakes are Spirit Lake, which contains a luminescent chemical and has been seen to glow in the dark; Ukonom Lake, which is very large and beautiful even though the area is recovering from fire damage; and the Green and Blue Granite Lakes, where trout swim in the cold and clear waters. Deer, bear, elk, and mountain lion are common in the Wilderness Area.Outdoor ActivitiesWith the town situated at above  in elevation and located at the merging of the River and Indian Creek, camping is one of the biggest summer tourism draws to the community. Commercial campsites are available. Many public campgrounds can be found along State Highway 96, with many more located in remote and beautiful places like the nearby Marble Mountain Wilderness Area, Kelly Lake, Dillon Creek, and Greyback. Mining in Happy Camp is not generally a recreational activity, although many people here make a living mining for gold. Available game include deer, bear, elk, quail, turkey, and mountain lion. Contact the California Department of Fish and Game for more information. The Klamath River and surrounding area, including the creeks are famous for their salmon.The wet, rainy autumns, winters, and springs provide ideal conditions for mushrooms to grow. These are harvested by individual local mushroom hunters, who receive anywhere from $7$50 per pound for their efforts.River rafting and kayaking is a popular activity, and there are several outfitters in the region who will launch at Happy Camp.Hills, canyons and dense treecover can and will scatter GPS signals,() so coverage may be spotty in many places around town.Family Resource CenterThe Camp Family Resource Center (HCFRC/FRC) is a non-profit organization providing family-oriented services in Happy Camp, California.()Karuk TribeThe Karuk Tribe is headquartered in Happy Camp.United States Forest ServiceThe US Forest Service maintains an office in town. Happy Camp is the administration site for the Happy Camp/Oak Knoll Ranger Districts of the Klamath National Forest.(DemographicsThe United States Census() reported that Happy Camp had a population of 1,190. The density was 96.4 people per square mile (37.2/km). The racial makeup of Happy Camp was 814 (68.4%) White, 2 (0.2%) African American, 277 (23.3%) Native American, 7 (0.6%) Asian, 1 (0.1%) Pacific Islander, 18 (1.5%) from other races, and 71 (6.0%) from two or more races.  Hispanic or Latino of any race were 95 persons (8.0%). The Census reported that 1,190 people (100% of the population) lived in households, 0 (0%) lived in non-institutionalized group quarters, and 0 (0%) were institutionalized.  There were 525 households, out of which 129 (24.6%) had children under the age of 18 living in them, 208 (39.6%) were opposite-sex married couples living together, 63 (12.0%) had a female householder with no husband present, 26 (5.0%) had a male householder with no wife present.  There were 63 (12.0%) unmarried opposite-sex partnerships, and 5 (1.0%) same-sex married couples or partnerships. 175 households (33.3%) were made up of individuals and 67 (12.8%) had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.27.  There were 297 families (56.6% of all households); the average family size was 2.84.The population was spread out with 238 people (20.0%) under the age of 18, 98 people (8.2%) aged 18 to 24, 232 people (19.5%) aged 25 to 44, 428 people (36.0%) aged 45 to 64, and 194 people (16.3%) who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 47.3 years. For every 100 females there were 107.0 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 110.2 males.There were 646 housing units at an average density of 52.3 per square mile (20.2/km), of which 299 (57.0%) were owner-occupied, and 226 (43.0%) were occupied by renters. The homeowner vacancy rate was 3.4%; the rental vacancy rate was 8.0%.  677 people (56.9% of the population) lived in owner-occupied housing units and 513 people (43.1%) lived in rental housing units.Education* Camp Elementary School* Camp High School* High Continuation School* of the Siskiyous - Happy CampPoliticsKlamath Controversy: Gold prospectors, conservation groups, the Department of Fish & Game, the Forest Service, and the Karuk, Hoopa and Yurok tribes are at odds with each other over what constitutes fair and ethical use of the river. Issues range from rights, to species, to American civil rights.()Happy Camp is located within the State of Jefferson, a proposed U.S. State and call for secession from Oregon and California.In the state legislature Happy Camp is located in the 4th Senate District, represented by Republican LaMalfa, and in the 2nd Assembly District, represented by Republican Nielsen. Federally, Happy Camp is located in 2nd congressional district, which has a Cook PVI of R +13() and is represented by Republican Herger.ReferencesExternal links* * Happy Camp Chamber of Commerce* Happy Camp NewsCampCamp
5780913
At_the_Earths_Core_(novel)
At the Earths Core is a 1914 fiction novel by Rice Burroughs, the first in his series about the fictional earth land of Pellucidar. It first appeared as a four-part serial in Weekly from April 425, 1914. It was first published in book form in hardcover by A. C. McClurg in July, 1922.()Plot summaryThe author relates how, traveling in the Sahara desert, he has encountered a remarkable vehicle and its pilot, Innes, a man with a remarkable story to tell.David is a mining heir who finances the experimental iron mole, an excavating vehicle designed by his elderly inventor friend Abner Perry. In a test run, they discover the vehicle cannot be turned, and it burrows 500 miles into the Earths crust, emerging into the unknown interior world of Pellucidar. In Burroughs concept, the Earth is a hollow shell with Pellucidar as the internal surface of that shell.Pellucidar is inhabited by prehistoric creatures of all geological eras, and dominated by the Mahars, a species of flying reptile both intelligent and civilized, but which enslaves and preys on the local stone-age humans. Innes and Perry are captured by the Mahars ape-like Sagoth servants and taken with other human captives to the chief Mahar city of Phutra. Among their fellow captives are the brave Ghak, the Hairy One, from the country of Sari, the shifty Hooja the Sly One and the lovely Dian the Beautiful of Amoz.David, attracted to Dian, defends her against the unwanted attentions of Hooja, but due to his ignorance of local customs she assumes he wants her as a slave, not a friend or lover, and subsequently snubs him. Only later, after Hooja slips their captors in a dark tunnel and forces Dian to leave with him, does David learn from Ghak the cause of the misunderstanding.left|thumb|a later printing of At the Earths CoreIn Phutra the captives become slaves, and the two surface worlders learn more of Pellucidar and Mahar society. The Mahars are all female, reproducing parthogenetically by means of a closely-guarded Great Secret contained in a Mahar book. David learns that they also feast on selected human captives in a secret ritual. In a disturbance, David manages to escape Phutra, becomes lost, and experiences a number of adventures before sneaking back into the city. Rejoining Abner, he finds the latter did not even realize he was gone, and the two discover that time in Pellucidar, in the absence of objective means to measure it, is a subjective thing, experienced by different people at different rates.Obsessed with righting the wrong he has unwittingly done Dian, David escapes again and eventually finds and wins her by defeating the malevolent Jubal the Ugly One, another unwanted suitor. David makes amends, and he and Dian wed.Later, along with Ghak and other allies, David and Abner lead a revolt of humankind against the Mahars. Their foes are hampered by the loss of the Great Secret, which David has stolen and hidden. To further the struggle David returns to the Iron Mole, in which he and Dian propose to travel back to the surface world to procure outer world technology. Only after it is underway does he discover that Hooja has substituted a drugged Mahar for Dian.  The creature attacks David but is overcome, and the return to the surface world proceeds successfully.Back in the world we know David meets the author, who after hearing his tale and seeing his prehistoric captive, helps him resupply and prepare the mole for the return to Pellucidar.Critical receptionGalaxy reviewer Floyd C. Gale, discussing the 1962 paperback edition, praised the novel; he said that Burroughss concepts are intriguing and his combat scenes gripping. Gale faulted the novels style, however, noting that the reader must wade at least twenty-five pages into the book before he can cease to be annoyed by the authors stilted and florid style.(Galaxys 5 Star Shelf, Science Fiction, June 1963, p.136)Film adaptationsThe novel was filmed as At the Earths Core (1976), directed by Kevin Connor and starring McClure as David Innes and Cushing as Abner Perry.The 2008 movie Journey to Middle Earth also shares several similarities with the events and locations of the novel, although the film was intended as a loose adaptation of to the Center of the Earth by Verne.LegacyOther authors have been inspired by Burroughs depiction of the strange subterranean world, most notably Lovecraft whose the Mountains of Madness was heavily influenced by At the Earths Core, particularly in the name of the Things slave race, the Shoggoths.(William Fulwiler, E.R.B. and H.P.L., Black Forbidden Things, p. 64.) Another and more direct homage to Burroughs concept is Carters Zanthodon series, beginning with his novel to the Underground World.Prolific manga artist Ishinomori also loosely adapted the book for the final story arc of the original 009 manga.CopyrightThe copyright for this story has expired in the United States, and thus now resides in the domain there.  The text is available via Gutenberg.References*External links*ERBzine.com Illustrated Bibliography: At the Earths Core* The Official Pellucidar Site from Edgar Rice Burroughs, Inc. - Tarzana, California*The Complete Novel Online from Literature.Org** (alternate edition)*Edgar Rice Burroughs Summary Project Page for At the Earths Core*Librivox Audio Bookcur de la Terrethe Earths Core
5787066
The_Ship_(Star_Trek:_Deep_Space_Nine)
List of Star Trek: Deep Space Nine episodes__NOTOC__The Ship is an episode of Trek: Deep Space Nine, the second episode of the fifth season.  It has an average fan rating of 4.2/5 on the official Star Trek website. The demise of the titular JemHadar vessel occurs exactly one season later, in the second episode of season six.Quick Overview:  Sisko must keep the JemHadar from retaking a JemHadar fighter which has crashed.PlotWhile conducting a planetary survey, Sisko and Dax are discussing a mining operation. They feel that, while being far from the supply lines, it is still a good location.  Meanwhile OBrien and his subordinate Muiz, nicknamed Qiqe, are also involved in the survey; even though they tease one another, they seem to have a good working relationship. A ship then crashes on the planet surface. Sisko and Dax use the runabout to beam over to the crash site.The away team discovers the ship to be a Dominion Warship, which has landed upside down and is partially buried. Using a hatch, they enter the ship and find that the crew is dead. Dax discovers that the crew has been dead for several hours - since before the ship crash landed. OBrien theorizes that the crew must have died due to a failure of the inertial dampers, causing the crew to be crushed to death instantly. Sisko is determined to get the vessel back to Starfleet so it can be studied, but with the runabouts tractor beam insufficient to tow the vessel back to DS9, he sends for the Defiant.Back on DS9 Odo has arrested Quark and a co-conspirator, none other than  Dr. Bashir. Odo takes the two to Siskos office, where Major Kira is waiting for them, and learns that Quark had ordered a shipment of Rigelian Fleaspiders. The Fleaspiders were for Bashir for his extraction of the venom to relieve Kiras pregnancy woes. But as usual, Quark took the opportunity to acquire more profit. He also smuggled Rigelian Liquid Crystals with the Fleaspider shipment. Kira leaves to take the Defiant to Sisko.Back on the planet, Worf lets Sisko know that they have buried the bodies of the 42 JemHadar soldiers and one Vorta. Hoya alerts Sisko that another warship has come out of warp; it destroys the runabout. Several JemHadar soldiers then beam to the surface and attack. The away team retreats to the warship, and Muiz is shot. But the JemHadar do not follow the away team into the ship. Inside, OBrien tends to Muizs injury. Sisko and the others then begin to form a plan. They search the ship, and find it spartan, with very little to provide crew comfort. They do find two headsets (meant for the Vorta supervisor and the JemHadar First), with eyepieces that provide a function similar to a viewscreen aboard Starfleet ships. They are then contacted over the ships communication system by Kilana, the Vorta in command of the other warship. She offers to meet Sisko, each to be escorted by one guard.Sisko agrees to meet her and she tries to be likeable. But she will not allow Sisko to take the vessel, and does not recognize his claim of salvage rights. She offers to take Sisko and his people back to the Federation safely; Sisko refuses. While they are discussing the ship, a JemHadar soldier beams into the damaged warship. OBrien and Dax find a suspicious device, and the JemHadar deshrouds and attacks them with a knife. Dax is knocked out, and OBrien is about to be stabbed when the JemHadar is shot by a staggering Muiz.Sisko and Kilana return to their ships, but things look bad for Muiz. They discover that the JemHadar weapon has had an anticoagulant effect on his wound. Muiz begins to suspect that he will not live, which causes an argument between Worf and OBrien. Worf believes that Muiz should be told he is going to die, and allowed to prepare himself. OBrien believes that Muizs only chance is to keep fighting. Sisko is then contacted again by Kilana and offers to meet her alone and without a guard. Sisko agrees to meet with Kilana, who acknowledges that there is something aboard the ship that she wants. But the two do not trust one another; Sisko refuses to allow her on the ship, and Kilana refuses to tell him what she wants.  Kilana realizes that their negotiations have reached an impasse and beams back to her ship. Soon after, the ship begins to shake from an orbital bombardment. But Sisko realizes that the attack is not directed at the warship, as they could easily destroy the ship with one hit, but is instead meant to psychologically rattle the away team. The crew realizes that what Kilana is looking for is very valuable, and they search for what she could be seeking. However, Muiz is not doing well; his condition worsens, and he begins to hallucinate. The crew begins to get tense and irritated with one another. OBrien and Worf have a brief physical altercation, and Dax responds with sarcasm. Sisko knows that this will not help them, and orders them to pull themselves together and orders Muiz to stay alive.After ten hours, the bombardment continues, while OBrien has managed to restore main power and helm control. If they can bring the main engines online, they may be able to lift off the planet and escape. OBrien does his best to bring the engines back to working order, but when they try to take off, an overload damages the power circuits and their condition worsens. Muiz has also died, causing silence among the crew. As Dax tries to console Sisko, they notice a drip of liquid fall on the floor (which is actually the ceiling). They look up and realize that the dripping is coming from a Founder disguised as a bulkhead. It is no longer able to hold its shape, and is dying from injuries it sustained from the accident that killed the crew. As it dies, it cries out loud enough for Kilana and the JemHadar to hear.Kilana then beams aboard the wrecked ship by herself. She informs the away team that the JemHadar soldiers killed themselves for allowing one of their gods to die. She lets Sisko know that her offer was genuine, she would have allowed Sisko and his crew to leave with the damaged warship. Sisko realizes that Muiz, the runabout crew, and the JemHadar would not have died had he and Kilana trusted each other. He allows her to take a sample of the powdery remains of the Founder. The Defiant arrives shortly after, and tows the warship back to DS9.Sisko mourns the death of Muiz, Hoya, and the others. Dax tells him that while their deaths were tragic, they knew the risks when they joined Starfleet. And even though the warship cost Sisko the lives of five people, it will help to save thousands of others. Meanwhile, OBrien is holding a vigil over Muizs casket. Worf comes in and tells him he is performing the AkVoh ritual, a Klingon practice for keeping the dead safe from predators as they make their journey to Sto-Vo-Kor. He offers to stay with OBrien to protect Muiz. OBrien responds by saying that hes sure Quique would have liked that.See also*A Time to Stand &ndash; reappearance of the captured ship*Rocks and Shoals &ndash; destruction of the captured shipExternal links****
5791422
Mount_Meager
 last_eruption  410 BC  200 years ago(Mount Meager, originally known as Meager Mountain, is a volcano in the Corridor of southwestern Columbia, Canada. Part of the Cascade Volcanic Arc of western America, its summit is  above level, and is capped by several eroded volcanic edifices. This includes mounds of viscous lava, columns of volcanic rock and overlapping piles of lava flows. Hydrothermal exploration is present at Mount Meager and it is one of the several geothermal sites in British Columbia.Mount Meager is responsible for the largest volcanic eruption in Canada in the past 10,000 years. About 2,350 years ago, an eruption formed a crater on its northeastern flank and sent avalanches of hot ash, rock fragments and gases down the northern flank of the volcano, creating a formation in the River valley. Evidence for more recent volcanic activity has been documented at the volcano, such as springs and earthquakes. Mount Meager has also been the source for several large landslides in the past, including a massive flow in 2010 that swepted down Creek and the Lillooet River.The Volcanic Belt has a long history of eruptions and poses a threat to the surrounding region. Any volcanic hazardranging from landslides to eruptionscould pose a significant risk to humans and wildlife. Even though Mount Meager has not erupted for over 2,000 years, it could again produce a major eruption; if this were to happen, relief efforts would probably be quickly organized. Teams such as the Volcanic Event Notification Plan (IVENP) are prepared to notify people threatened by volcanic eruptions.Geography and geologyRegional settingthumb|left|altMap of the Cascadia subduction zone and location of nearby volcanoes along coastal United States and Canada.|Area of the Cascadia subduction zone, including the Cascade Volcanic Arc (red triangles)Volcanism in the Cascade Volcanic Arc is caused by subduction of the de Fuca Plate under the American Plate at the Cascadia subduction zone.() This is a  long zone running  off the Northwest from California to southwestern British Columbia. The plates move at a relative rate of over  per year at an oblique angle to the subduction zone. Because of the very large fault area, the Cascadia subduction zone can produce large earthquakes of magnitude 7.0 or greater. The interface between the Juan de Fuca and North American plates remains locked for periods of roughly 500 years. During these periods, stress builds up on the interface between the plates and causes uplift of the North American margin. When the plate finally slips, the 500 years of stored energy are released in a massive earthquake.(Unlike most subduction zones worldwide, there is no deep trench present along the margin in Cascadia.() The reason is that the mouth of the River empties directly into the subduction zone and deposits silt at the bottom of the Ocean, burying the oceanic trench. Massive floods from prehistoric Lake Missoula during the Pleistocene also deposited large amounts of sediment into the trench.() However, in common with other subduction zones, the outer margin is slowly being compressed, similar to a giant spring.() When the stored energy is suddenly released by slippage across the fault at irregular intervals, the Cascadia subduction zone can create very large earthquakes, such as the magnitude 9.0 Cascadia earthquake on January 26, 1700.() However, earthquakes along the Cascadia subduction zone are fewer than expected and there is evidence of a decline in volcanic activity over the past few million years. The probable explanation lies in the rate of convergence between the Juan de Fuca and North American plates. These two tectonic plates currently converge  to  per year. This is only about half the rate of convergence from seven million years ago.(Local settingMount Meager is part of the Garibaldi Volcanic Belt, an extension of the Cascade Volcanic Arc, which extends from the Watts Point volcano in the south to the Caldera in the north.()() This belt includes cones, calderas, stratovolcanoes and volcanoes that have been active in the Holocene period (10,000 years ago to present).()()()() The latest explosive eruption in the Garibaldi Volcanic Belt occurred at a crater on the northeastern flank of Mount Meager, which forms a clearly-defined depression.(( At least eight volcanic vents constitute Meager, which erupted mafic, intermediate and felsic magma.( Streams and glaciers have played a significant role in dissecting the massif and its upper slopes are covered by snow and ice.( Numerous feeder dikes to older units are exposed by deep erosion.( Pillar, a vertical tower of brecciated lava, represented an erosional remnant of Meager until its collapse in June 2005.( More than 10 streams drain meltwater from Mount Meager, including Capricorn Creek, Job Creek, No Good Creek, Angel Creek, Devastation Creek, Canyon Creek and Affliction Creek.(The geomorphology of Mount Meager is similar to Peak, another Cascade Arc volcano, located in the state of Washington.() It consists of at least four overlapping stratovolcanoes that become progressively younger from south to north.( As a result, Meager can be classified as a compound/complex volcano, which consists of two or more vents.() With a total volume of , Mount Meager is a long-lived feature, tracing its history back to 2,200,000 years ago.(( This indicates that it is relatively old compared to most volcanoes in the Cascade Arc. In the Range, the oldest volcanoes are generally no more than a million years old.() This includes Rainier (500,000 years),() Peak (27,000 years),() Mount Jefferson (680,000 years),() St. Helens (50,000 years)() and many more.( However, portions of Mount Meager formed in the past million years.( The volcano is made of rocks ranging from rhyodacite to basalt. Rhyodacite forms a series of eroded volcanic plugs, which represent the highest peaks of Meager. Their flanks are covered by their eruptive products and are the surface expressions of intrusions. As a result, they provide a unique opportunity to study the relationships between chambers and their lavas.(A number of summits constitute the Mount Meager massif. The highest and northernmost is Peak with an elevation of .()( Mount Meager itself is  in elevation.( Mountain west of Mount Meager proper rises with an elevation of . Job, , is situated just west of Capricorn Mountain.(( Peak with an elevation of  is south of Capricorn Mountain and Mount Meager proper.( Peak, also known as The Devastator, has an elevation of  and is the lowest and southernmost summit of Mount Meager.((Climate and vegetationMount Meager is situated in the Mountains, a  long range extending from Vancouver to the Panhandle.(() It is about  wide, cut by fjords created by glacial erosion. Because the Coast Mountains are just east of the Pacific Ocean, they have a profound effect on British Columbias climate by forcing moisture-laden air off the ocean. This drops heavy rainfalls on the western slopes where lush forests exist. The precipitation is among the heaviest in North America.(Valleys surrounding Mount Meager contain forests. The area also has wetland habitats, plants of the cottonwood-willow-thimbleberry family and glaucous willowherbs. Wildlife such as wolves, wolverine, moose, raptors, deer, goats and waterfowl inhabit the area, as well as grizzly and black bears.()Human historyNamingThe name Meager Mountain was adopted on May 6, 1924 as labelled on the 1923 British Columbia map 2D. In 1966, the volcano was renamed to Mount Meager. According to a letter written in March 1983, the local name, Cathedral, was duplicated elsewhere, so the mountain was renamed Meager after the creek of that name which lies to the south of it. Meager Creek is in turn named after J.B. Meager, who was an owner of timber licences on the creek.() Despite its official name, Mount Meager is sometimes mistakenly spelled Mount Meagre or Mount Meagher.()Meagers subsidiary peak names were submitted by Canadian mountaineer Neal M. Carter, who was a member of the Columbia Mountaineering Club. Devastator Peak was officially named on August 3, 1977 in association with Devastation Glacier.() Plinth Peak was officially named on September 6, 1951 as identified in Carters 1932 sketch map and article Explorations in the Lillooet River Watershed.() Mount Job and Pylon Peak were both officially named on January 17, 1957 as labelled on Carters 1954 sketch map of the Lillooet River.()() Capricorn Mountain was originally identified as Mount Capricorn in the 1932 Alpine Journal, Vol XXI. According to Carters 1932 Canadian Alpine Journal, Vol XXI, the name chosen for the 8440-foot mountain was Mt. Capricorn, a variation of the all-too-common appellation Goat Mountain, applied by Bert Perkins to the stream which drains the Capricorn glacier at its base. Subsequently, the peak was renamed to Capricorn Mountain on June 22, 1967.()OccupationMount Meager has been investigated as a potential hydrothermal energy resource. At least 16 geothermal sites have been identified in British Columbia, the Mount Meager area being one of the five areas most capable for commercial development. Others include the Hot Springs near the community of Terrace, Cayley near the community of Squamish, Edziza on the Highland and the Lillooet Fault Zone between Lake and the community of Lillooet. At Meager Creek, the potential for commercial development of a 100-200 megawatt station is possible whereas the potential for a 200 megawatt power station at Pebble Creek is very good.() Because Meager Creek and Pebble Creek offer the greatest potential for commercial development, the Mount Meager area is the most promising site for geothermal power development in British Columbia.((Volcanic historyMount Meager and the nearby Elaho Valley volcanic complex collectively have erupted 54 times in the past 2,600,000 years.( Effusive and explosive eruptions have occurred thoughout Meagers 2,200,000 year eruptive history.()()( Four primary eruptive periods in the history of Mount Meager have been identified, with individual eruptions separated by thousands of years.(( Large northwest-southeast trending structures paralleling Lake and the Valley may control volcanic activity at Mount Meager or at least create zones of crustal weakness that are exploited by rising magma batches.(First record of activityDuring the first eruptive period 2,200,000 to 1,900,000 years ago, intermediate to felsic rocks were erupted at the southern end of the massif.(() Basal breccia, which may be an exhumed vent, underlies andesite and tuffs, flows, lava domes and breccia of Devastator Peak.( It has a maximum thickness of  and overlies a  high ridge of bedrock that formed between 251,000,000 and 65,500,000 years ago of the Mesozoic era.(At the southwestern end of Meager, dacite with sparse phenocrysts of quartz, plagioclase and hornblende, represents a  thick remnant of subhorizontal lava flows.(The Devastator and Pylon assemblage eruptive periodsThe seconed eruptive period between 1,900,000 and 500,000 years ago produced rhyodacite tuff, breccia, lavas and domes of The Devastator Assemblage.(( This  thick geological assemblage is located on the south and west flanks of Pylon Peak and Devastator Peak. Its western portion consists of roughly layered tephra while its eastern end represents the lava flows and subvolcanic intrusions of a partly preserved vent. Here, The Devastator Assemblage is massive and steeply truncates basal breccia from the first eruptive period.(Between 1,000,000 and 500,000 years ago, a thick sequence of andesite lava flows were erupted from the volcanic plug of Devastator Peak, creating the Pylon Assemblage.(( With a maximum thickness of over , the Pylon Assemblage forms the largest rock unit comprising Mount Meager.(( The lava flows are normally layered, separated by a thin layer of lapilli tuff and reddened breccia. A concentration of subvolcanic intrusions and coarse volcanic breccia clasts over  in length suggest that Devastator Peak is a major vent.(Formation of the Plinth, Job, Capricorn and Mosaic assemblagesThe forth and final eruptive period 150,000 to less than 3,000 years ago produced rhyodacite lava flows, domes, breccias and subvolcanic intrusions of the Plinth, Job and Capricorn assemblages.(( Around Mount Job, porphyritic hornblende, biotite and quartz rhyodacite lava flows of the Job Assemblage were erupted. They are prominently layered and locally columnar jointed. On the east side of Affliction Glacier, they overlie porphyritic andesite lava flows of the Pylon Assemblage. Later, rhyodacite lava flows of the Capricorn Assembage were erupted and flowed over biotite rhyodacite of the Job Assemblage. The upper  of Capricorn Mountain and Mount Job are formed by these lava flows.(Another sequence of rhyodacite lava flows were subsequently erupted and form the Plinth Assemblage. Mount Meager proper, a massive lava dome or volcanic plug, consists of steeply inclined flow layering and was the southern source of Plinth Assemblage lava flows and breccias. Plinth Peak was also formed during the Plinth Assemblage eruptive stage and is mostly composed of prominent columnar or partly jointed lava flows. Its north ridge and flat-topped summit contain three areas of steep flow layering and subhorizontally oriented columnar jointing. These areas are possibly the remains of volcanic plugs or lava domes that were the northern source of Plinth Assemplage lava flows.( The Mosaic Assemblage, a sparsely porphyritic plagioclase-augite-olivine basalt and trachybasalt formation, also formed during the forth eruptive period 140,000 to less than 90,000 years ago. It is the remains of scoriaceous lava flows, breccias, bombs and lavas.(() The best known and most documented eruption of Mount Meager is a large explosive eruption that occurred 410 BC  200 (about 2400 BP) years ago.( This eruption, which likely reached 5 on the Explosivity Index (VEI), was similar to the eruption of Mount St. Helens.()() It sent a massive Plinian column at least  high into the atmosphere. Prevailing winds carried ash from this explosion eastwards to as far as Alberta. Nearby areas were devastated by heavy fall when parts of the Plinian column collapsed. Later, a series of flows were erupted and travelled  from their source. After this happened, a lava flow was erupted that repeatedly collapsed on Meagers steep flanks, creating a thick welded breccia deposit that blocked the Lillooet River. This created a lake just upstream and later collapsed to produce a massive flood. Large boulders were carried downstream for over , but the destructive floodwaters continued further. After this took place, a small dacite lava flow was erupted, which cooled into well preserved columnar joints.( The entire eruption cycle was erupted from a vent on the northeastern flank of Plinth Peak, which forms a breached volcanic crater.(() This is the latest known eruption of Mount Meager, as well as the largest known Holocene explosive eruption in Canada.() However, it is unknown when this eruption ended.(In 1977, J. A. Westgate suggested that a smaller eruption may have occurred at Mount Meager after the 2400 BP eruption, sending tephra to the southeast. A tephra deposit overlying the River Ash at Otter Creek shows strong genetic relationships with the Bridge River Ash, differing only by its absence of biotite. In earlier publications, this tephra is classified as part of the Bridge River Ash. However, it has been dated to be about 2,000 years old, indicating that this tephra is a few hundred years younger than the Bridge River Ash. Apparent absence of biotite and occurrence well to the south of the Bridge River Ash likewise favour a separate identity.() Large volume, fine grained, debris flows north of the volcano might have been caused by volcanic activity. If this is correct, the knowledge of eruptions at Mount Meager in the past 10,000 years is insufficient.(Recent activityTwo small hot spring clusters are found at Mount Meager, indicating magmatic heat is still present.( These two clusters of hot springs, known as the Meager Creek Hot Springs and Pebble Creek Hot Springs, are most likely related to recent volcanic activity at Mount Meager.(( Meager Creek Hot Springs, the largest in British Columbia, remain free of snow for most of the year.()() The springs at Mount Meager might be evidence of a shallow magma chamber beneath the surface.()Between 1970 and 2005, over 20 small earthquakes were recorded at the volcano. The magnitude of these events were generally no higher than 2.0 on the magnitude scale and they originated  to less than  below the surface.() Other volcanoes in the Garibaldi Volcanic Belt with recorded seismicity include Garibaldi, Cayley and Silverthrone Caldera.() Seismic data suggest that these volcanoes still contain active magma chambers, indicating that some Garibaldi Belt volcanoes are probably active, with significant potential hazards.()( The seismic activity corresponds with some of Canadas recently formed volcanoes and with persistent volcanoes that have had major explosive activity throughout their history, such as Mount Garibaldi, Mount Cayley and Mount Meager.(Threats and preparednessEruptionsBecause Mount Meager is capable of producing highly explosive eruptions, it is an overall dangerous volcano. Many populated areas throughout southern British Columbia and Alberta are threatened by Mount Meager. Pemberton, a community some  downstream from Meager, is also significantly threatened by the volcano.( Because of these concerns, the Survey of Canada is planning to create maps and emergency plans for Mount Meager, as well as Mount Cayley to the south.( If the volcano were to erupt again violently, it would have large-scale effects on the Lillooet River fishery. Another significant eruption would also have massive effects on nearby mining and logging activity.( In addition, Mount Meager is situated in the immediate proximity of a major air traffic route.() Volcanic ash reduces visibility and can cause jet engine failure, as well as damage to other aircraft systems.()Souther, a leading authority on geothermal resources and volcanism in the Canadian Cordillera, has stated at present the volcanoes of the Garibaldi Belt are quiet, presumed dead but still not completely cold. But the flare-up of Meager Mountain 2,500 years ago raises the question, Could it happen again? Was the explosive eruption of Meager Mountain the last gasp of the Garibaldi Volcanic Belt or only the most recent event in its on-going life? The short answer is nobody really knows for sure. So just in case I sometimes do a quick check of the old hot-spots when I get off the Peak Chair.()Even though very few eruptions in Canada have been witnessed by people, Canada is geologically an area of intense volcanic activity. According to the Geologic Hazards 91 Workshop, priority should be given to eruption impact studies of the two recently active volcanic centres closest to urban areas, Mount Baker and Mount Meager. The former case will require a combined US-Canada-Washington State-B.C. effort.() In addition, Mount Meager is not monitored closely enough by the Geological Survey of Canada to ascertain how active its magma system is.() If it were to erupt, relief efforts could be orchestrated. The Interagency Volcanic Event Notification Plan (IVENP) was created to outline the notification procedure of some of the main agencies that would be involved in response to an erupting volcano in Canada, an eruption close to the  United States border or any eruption that will have effects in Canada.()Although Mount Meager is a potentially active volcano, as of 2003 there was no evidence of an imminent eruption. Many shallow earthquakes normally occur before a volcano erupts. As magma rises to the surface, it will probably create much more vigour and heat at the regional hot springs, as well as the formation of new springs or fumaroles. These signs generally occur well in advance of a potential eruption, although the possibility of an eruption occurring in the near future is low.()LandslidesMount Meager has been the source for many large landslides in the past 8,000 years. These have flowed down the Lillooet River valley to areas that have become populated in the past 100 years and are now experiencing rapid urban growth. For example, the town of Pemberton has doubled in size since 2003. In addition, it has been argued by scientists that Mount Meager is the most unstable mountain massif in Canada.( It may also be the most active landslide area in Canada.() Because Mount Meager is capable of producing large landslides, Meager Creek valley is probably the most dangerous valley in the Cordillera. Debris flows, mainly from Mount Meager, have filled the valley to a depth of .(Volcano-associated debris flows, known as lahars, are one of the most dangerous hazards associated with volcanoes. They can occur both during an eruption and when a volcano is not erupting. The water that creates lahars can come from melting snow and ice, intense rainfall or the breakout of a summit lake. Large lahars are a potential hazard to many communities downstream from glaciated volcanoes.() In addition, Pemberton is vulnerable to lahars from Mount Meager.( Lahars are also a major hazard at Mount Rainier, a younger but heavily glaciated stratovolcano southeast of Seattle in the central Cascade Volcanic Arc.(()( More than 25 landslides have occurred at Mount Meager in the past 8,000 years.(PrehistoricHistoric2010 landslideOn August 6, 2010, a massive lahar cascaded down from Capricorn Glacier with a speed of  per second.() With a volume of , it is the second largest landslide in Canadian history, exceeded by the Slide, which removed  of rock from Johnson Peak.()( The 2010 landslide at Mount Meager was  wide and  long, creating a dam across Meager Creek and the Lillooet River. This resulted in the creation of a lake just upstream. Fears of the dam collapsing and flooding the Lillooet River valley ended a day after the landslide when part of the dam ruptured and slowly released water. An evacuation alert was rescinded and nearly 1,500 residents were allowed to return to their homes on the weekend after the landslide occurred. No injuries were reported from this landslide.(See also*of volcanoes in Canada*of Cascade volcanoes*of Western CanadaNotes(ReferencesExternal links*************MeagerMeagerMeager
5795523
Joda
Joda is a city in the district (also known as Keonjhar) district of the coastal state of India, Orissa. The municipality looks after the local administration of the place.Demographics Indian census,() the population of Joda has been enumerated to be, 38671. Males constitute 52% of the population while females account for 48% of the population. In Joda, 16 percent of the population is less than six years of age. The average literacy rate of Joda is 54%, which is much lower than the national average literacy rate. Out of it, the male literacy rate is 64% while in Joda the female literacy rate is 43%. EconomyJodas economy is mostly based on large-scale Steel producers, such as Steel, Jindal Steel and SAIL.This region has some of the richest iron deposits in India, and as a result of this many steel plants such as TISCO (Renamed Steel Ltd) and Rourkela Steel Plant have been constructed near the Joda region. Starting in 2000, this region has seen unprecedented industrialization. Although this industrialization has enriched many citizens living in Joda, it has also caused the living conditions to deteriorate steadily. Many public facilities such as hospitals, roads and schools are in need of repair, though it is possible that this will be alleviated by the recently created railway line between Barbil (a town 8 km away from Joda) and Kolkata. Daily train started between Banspani and Puri (via Keonjhar, Cuttuck, Bhubaneswar city). Townships are well structured sorounded by many gardens. Luxery hotels and restourants available in the city. Joda is a hub for many big industries related to steel manufacturing such as Essel Mining And Industries Ltd. of Birla Group, steel, Jindal Steel, Champion Filters (Sponge Iron & Mining) and many more. At present a number of Sponge Iron Plants have come up in its periphery due to cheap availability of raw material and labour.Tata Steel has a Ferro Alloys Plant at Joda and number of mines of Iron & Manganese in the Joda namely Joda Est Iron Mine, Khondbond Iron Mine, etc.PollutionAs Joda is a hub of Steel Industries, a drastic amount of Industrialization has degraded the flora and fauna of the town. The rivers and lakes are polluted by the effluents released from these industries. The highly trafficked route from Joda to Keonjhar has very good transporting communication and the roads are wider and in good condition.EducationJoda has high number of education institutes. It has various schools parting ICSE based education as well as the Orissa State Board Education. ()Referenceseducation saraswati sisu bidya mandirbn:bpy:it:Jodapt:Jodavi:Joda
5797961
Cumbrian_toponymy
Cumbrian toponymy refers to the study of place names in Cumbria, a county in West England, and as a result of the spread of the ancient language, further parts of England and the Southern Uplands of Scotland.The of Cumbria is marked by a long and complex history of human settlement. Geographically, Cumbria is situated near the centrepoint of the Isles. The contrasting landscapes between the mountains and the fertile coastal areas and the rich variety of mineral resources available in the county have made it a desirable area for habitation since the Paleolithic, and various ethnic groups have been drawn to the area, leaving their linguistic mark since the Age.Linguistic influencesBrythonicthumb|General distribution of Brythonic elementsSince at least the Iron Age, the inhabitants of Cumbria would have spoken Brythonic Celtic, which is related to modern Welsh, Cornish and Breton.  Evidence of this language is mostly visible in topographical features such as rivers (Kent, Eden, Ehen, Levens) and mountains (Blencathra, Helvellyn,  Coniston Old Man).  In the first millennium AD the Brythonic  spoken in north west England and southern Scotland developed into a separate strain called Cumbric, which included some influences from Latin picked up during the Roman occupation of Britain.  It is likely that most place names with Brythonic influences have survived from this time (Carlisle, Penrith, Penruddock)British influenced place names exist throughout the whole county, but are particularly common around the river valleys of the District and around the coastal plains of the Firth.Common Brythonic elements(Based on forms given by A.D Mills in Oxford Dictionary of British Place Names (2003))**blain (Welsh blaen) - summit  blen-**cair (Welsh caer) - fort**creic, *carrek (W. creic, carreg) - rock  crag**din (W. din) - fort**penn (W. pen) - hill, headOld Englishthumb|General distribution of Old English elementsAngles from Deira and Bernicia (later Northumbria) would have gradually filtered into Cumbria since the 5th century, but the area retained a distinctly British identity until at least the 8th century.  Settlement by the English began in the north, with settlers following the line of Wall and traversing Pass then settling the Valley before making their way along the north coast.  Some time later they would have begun to move into the Kent Valley, Cartmel and Furness, gradually moving further north along the west coast.  Surviving place names have been taken to show that the Anglo-Saxons stayed out of the mountainous central region and remained in the lowlands,(Armstrong, A. M., Mawer, A., Stenton, F. M. and Dickens, B. (1952) The Place-Names of Cumberland. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.) but after the Celtic kingdom of Rheged was annexed to English Northumbria sometime before 730 AD, the Celtic language of Cumbric was slowly replaced by English.(Jackson, K. H. (1953). Language and history in early Britain: A chronological survey of the Brittonic languages, first to twelfth century A.D., Edinburgh: University of Edinburgh Press.)  As a result, Old English elements can be found throughout the county, but mostly in the names of towns and villages (Keswick, Workington, Barrow-in-Furness).  Very few rivers or mountains contain Old English elements (Eamont, Stainmore), but many of the lakes contain the element mere, meaning lake.  Common Old English elements(*hm - homestead, village, manor, estate*-inga- - called after...*mere, mr(e) - pond, lake  mere*tn - farmstead, enclosure, village*wc - settlement, farm (from Latin vicus, often found near Roman roads)  -wick, -wichOld Norsethumb|General distribution of Old Norse elementsThe Norse appear to have arrived in Cumbria in about 925 AD and left a huge impression upon the toponymy of Cumbria.  Originally from Norway, it is generally accepted that they would have come here via their colonies in Iceland, Ireland and the of Man, perhaps bringing with them a touch of Gaelic influence.  It seems they would have arrived around the south west of the county and penetrated into the uplands of the central region where the Norse influence is dominant.  Many mountains, rivers and valleys have Norse names, as attested by the abundance of the elements fell, -ay and dale (Mickledore, Scafell, Rothay, Duddon, Langsleddale, Allerdale).  Many town and villages also contain Norse elements (Whitehaven, Ravenglass, Silloth, Ulverston, Ambleside)Common Old Norse elements(* - river*bekkr - stream  beck*dalr - valley  dale*fors - waterfall  force/foss*fjallr - mountain (usually a large, flat mountain)  fell*gil - ravine  gill, ghyll*haugr - hill  howe*holmr - island  holme*intaka - intake*pic - peak  pike*str - shieling  side, seat*tjorn - small lake  tarn*veit - clearing  thwaite*tn - farmThere are also a number of Danish influenced place names (Allonby, Thursby, Ousby, Milnthorpe), but the majority are situated along the Eden Valley and the north coast of the county, suggesting that they might have come across Stainmore around the 9th century AD.Common Danish elements*by - home (may be Old Norse, but more often Danish)*orp - secondary settlement  thorpeGoidelic Celtic and Irish influenceThere are several places throughout Cumbria which exhibit Gaelic influences.  Some names contain actual Goidelic elements (Rathmoss, Knock, Kinn, Glencoyne), whilst others show evidence of Irish settlement in other ways (Kirksanton, Kirkbride, Patterdale, Ireleth, Ireby). Several Gaelic Saints are recalled in Cumbrian place names, including St. Bega, St. Brigid, and St. Sanctan.The influence of the early Celtic Church in Northumbria and Cumbria was considerable. From St. Columba (Columcille) and the founding of Iona in Scotland in the late 6th century and the onslaught of the Vikings in late 8th century, the Celtic monastic system continued to spread, despite the limitations of the of Whitby in 664, which proscribed the Celtic dates for the observation of Easter. St. Oswald and his brother Oswiu, schooled in Iona and the Celtic tradition, helped to found monastic establishments such as Lindisfarne, Gilling, Tynemouth and Hartlepool after Northumbria became one of the dominant powers in England in the 7th century. The Celtic Christian monasteries and schools, being monastic rather than episcopal, were most often founded by men and women living ascetic lives. Their patrons were the warlords or petty kings of the time. Intrepid monks, such as Aidan, travelled widely and though there were Anglo-Saxons among them such as St. Hilda, St. Cuthbert and Cdmon, they were trained by way of the Celtic monastic tradition. So it is no surprise to find a number of Goidelic (i.e. Gaelic) place names in Cumbria.NB: the Norse element erg, meaning shieling comes from the Goidelic airidh and would have been picked up during the Norse occupation in Ireland (Sizergh, Cleator)Anglo-Norman and Middle EnglishAt the time of the Norman conquest in 1066, it is likely that a mixture of Norse and Old English would have been spoken throughout most of Cumbria, which persisted until the spread of English after the 12th century.  The Book of 1086 lists only a few places in the south of the region, as at this time most of northern and central Cumbria was part of Scotland, but with several battles over the following centuries the whole area became part of England.  The influence of Anglo-Norman is usually confined to manorial names and residences and often include a personal name to distinguish between two places belonging to different lords (Egremont, Beaumont, Maulds Meaburn, Crosby Garret, Ponsonby, Grange).  Although it is often difficult to distinguish between a Middle English name and an earlier one, some places do seem to contain elements (Tod Ghyll, Brocklebank, Ladyholme, Cam Spout, Monk Coniston, Newlands, Sweden Bridge)Common Anglo-Norman and Middle English elements*grange - farm (usually belonging to a monastery)*great - large (denoting the larger of two places)*ground - (denoting land belonging to a person, divided from monastic lands after the of the Monasteries in 1536)*little - (denoting the smaller of two places)*monk - (referring to land belonging to a monastery, usually Furness Abbey)*mont - hillModern namesSeveral places in Cumbria have been renamed in more recent times, (Belle Island, Maryport, Longtown, Sprinkling Tarn) Examples  Abbreviations used in the following descriptions OE  EnglishON  NorseDa  DanishBr  Brythonic CelticGo  Goidelic CelticIr  IrishSc  ScottishNF  Anglo-Norman Areas *Allerdale  valley of Ellen*Copeland  bargained land, bought land from ON kaupa land*Cumbria  land of the Cymry (the Brythonic name for the British people of the area, related to Welsh Cymru, from a Brittonic *kombrogi meaning fellow countrymen).*Cumberland  land of the Cymry from the OE Cumbra land*Furness  further promontory from OE fuor and ON nes, the oldest form of the name is Fuernessa (c1150)*Grizedale Forest  valley with pigs from ON gris dalr*Morecambe Bay crooked estuary from Br *mori- & *kambo-.(Rivett, A.L.F. and Smith, C. (1979) The Place-names of Roman Britain)  The name was recorded in Ptolemys Geographica c.150AD as Morikambe, apparently referring to the Lune Estuary.  It was subsequently lost then revived in the 19th century as both the name for the bay and the new Lancashire seaside resort at Poulton-le-Sands.*Solway Firth  Muddy ford estuary from ON sol vath fjrr - or from the Celtic tribal name Selgovae*Westmorland  land of the people living west of the moors from OE west mr inga land.  The name presumably dates from the time when Westmorland was part of Northumbria and ruled from the east.Rivers*Bleng  dark river from ON blaengir, bl*Brathay  broad river from ON breir *Calder  rocky, fast flowing river from Br *kaleto *dubro*Caldew  cold river from OE cald a*Cocker  crooked river from Br *kukr*Crake  possibly stoney river from Br *kraki stones*Dacre  trickling stream from Br *dakru tear*Derwent  oaken valley from Br *derwentio*Duddon  uncertain.  Possilby Duddas valley from an OE personal name and denu or an unknown Br name containing *dubo, dark.*Eamont  meeting of the rivers from OE a (ge)mot*Eden  Uncertain.  Mills suggests water from a Celtic source, but gives no cognate.*Eea  simply means river from ON  or OE a*Ehen  probably cold river from a Br word related to Welsh iain, cold*Esk  water from Br *isca*Gilpin  named for the Gilpin family*Greta  rocky river from ON grjt *Irt  possibly fresh from Br *ir*Kent  probably from Br *cunetio meaning sacred one*Leven  smooth-flowing river from a Br word related to Welsh llyfn, smooth*Liza  shining river from ON ljs *Lowther  foaming river from ON laur *Lune  healthy, pure from Br Alna (cf Ialonus)*Lyvennet  abounding in elm trees probably from a Br word related to Welsh llwyf, elm (cf Derwent)*Mite  probably meaning drizzling from Br meigh (to urinate, to drizzle), ON miga or OE migan*Rawthey  red river from ON rau *Rothay  trout river from ON raui *Sprint  gushing from ON spretta*Wampool  possibly OE, signifying Wdens pool*Waver  restless from OE wfre (cf wave)*Winster  the left-hand river from ON vinstri The Lakes*Lake  Bastuns clearing from an OE personal name Beabstan, or an NF nickname Bastun and ON veit*Water  either broad water from ON breir vatn or brothers water from ON brirs vatn (there are legends of two brothers drowning in this lake)*Buttermere  lake by dairy pastures from OE butere mere*Water  named after the village, which means kings farmstead from ON konigs tun*Water  lake of the crooked river, linking the name with the River Cocker which flows through it.  Related to Br *crumbaco*Derwentwater  named after the River Derwent*Water  little dark one from a Br word *dubaco*Water  swan lake from ON eltr vatn*Water  named after the valley in which it is situated*Grasmere  lake in pasture or grassy lake from OE grs mere*Haweswater  Hafrs lake or he-goats lake  from the ON hafs vatn*Hayeswater  Eithrs lake from an ON Eiths vatn*Loweswater  leafy lake from ON lauf saer, ON vatn or OE wter was added later*Water  named after the valley of Rydal; formerly called Routhmere, linking the lake with the River Rothay*Hows  probably hill tarn from ON tjrn haugr*Thirlmere  lake with a gap from OE thyrel mere*Ullswater  uncertain.  Possibly named after a Norse chief Ulf or a local Saxon lord named Ulphus; or from the Norse god Ullr*Water  Wasdale Water. The name literally means water water from ON vatn and OE wter*Windermere  Vinandrs lake from ON personal name Vinandr and OE mereMountains, Fells and Hills*Fell  birch hill from ON bjirk haugr*Combe  dark-crested mountain from OE blc camb, not to be confused with Br combe meaning valley.*Blencathra  chair-shaped bare hill or Devils Peak from Cumbric *blein *cadeir or *blein *cuthrol*Cat Bells  den of the wild cat from OE catt and ME belde*Cam  ridge with wild cats path  from ON katts stigr kambr or OE catt stig camb*Pike cf causeway*Coniston Old Man  named after the town at its foot, the Old Man comes from Br maen meaning stone*Pike  dollywaggons were sled-like barrows used to transport stone and minerals down the sides of steep mountains when mining was common in the Lake District.  Pike means peak from ON pk*Harter Fell  deer hill from ON hjartar haugr*Helvellyn  Coates suggests a Cumbric *hal velyn - Yellow Moorland*Street  named after the Roman road which passed along it, a literal translation of the Latin via alta; the summit of this hill is named*Melbreak Cumbric *moil br or possibly Gaelic maol breac both meaning speckled hill*Hill after locals used the flat area for fairs in the 18th and 19th centuries*Sunday Crag  Saint Sunday is the local name for Dominic, though how he is connected to the mountain is unknown.  Crag means rock from the Br carreg*Pike*Skiddaw - a difficult name. Perhaps Cumbric *sgwow(Welsh sgwyddau) meaning shoulders from the shape. Both English shoulder and Gaelic guileann are used in mountain names.*Stainmore  stoney moor  from OE stn mrValleys*Borrowdale  valley with a fort from ON borgar dalr*Dunnerdale  valley of the River Duddon*Ennerdale  valley of the River Ehen*Langdale  long valley from ON lang dalr*Lonsdale  valley of the River Lune*Mardale  valley with a lake from ON marr dalr*Patterdale  Patricks valley, possibly named after St Patrick or, more likely, a later Norse-Irish settler*Sleddale  valley with flat land from ON sletta dalr*Wasdale  valley of water from ON vatns dalrTowns and villages*Aspatria  Patricks Ash from ON asc and the personal name*Barrow-in-Furness  headland island from Br barr and ON ey*Blennerhasset   Hay farm on a hill from the Cumbric *blein steep faced slope plus ON haysaetr*Bootle  huts, shelter from ON bul*Bowness  promontory shaped like a bow from ON bogi nes*Cark  rock from Br carreg*Carlisle  fort of the God Lugus from Br *Luguwalion -> Lat Luguvalium -> OE Luel -> Cumbric Cair Luel (Welsh - Caer Liwelydd)(*Cockermouth  mouth of the River Cocker*Dalton-in-Furness  farm in a valley from ON dalr tun*Frizington  farm/settlement of the Friesen people from OE Fris, inga and tun*Grange-over-Sands  outlying farm belonging to a monastery from the ME grange.  -over-Sands was probably added in the 19th century when the town prospered as a holiday resort overlooking Morecambe Bay. The term over-sands may also refer to the ancient act of traversing morcambe bay sands as a means of shortening the travel distance in the area.*Hawkshead  uncertain.  The hawks- might either mean hawk or be the ON personal name Haukr and the -head may mean head from OE heofod or summer farm, shieling from ON saetr*Kendal  valley of the River Kent from ON Kent dalr*Keswick  cheese farm from OE cse wicON vik landing place (i.e. village)*Kirkby  village with a church from ON kirk by*Maryport  named after the wife of Senhouse who developed the town into a port.  It was originally called Ellenfoot as it stood at the foot of the River Ellen but was changed in 1756 as the town developed.*Millom  mills from OE millen*Milnthorpe  village with mills from OE millen and Da orp*Threlkeld  thralls well from ON rl kelda*Ulpha  wolf hill from ON ulfr haugr*Ulverston  Ulfrs farmstead from ON Ulfrs tun (ulfr is also the ON word for wolf)*Whitehaven  white harbour from ON hvit hafn*Workington  farm/settlement of Weorcs people from OE Weorc, inga and tun()Islands*Belle Isle, Windermere  beautiful isle from Fr belle:: originally named Langholme, ON long island, it was renamed in 1781 by its new owner Isabella Curwen*Chapel Island, Morecambe Bay  named for the chapel built here in the 14th century by monks from nearby Conishead Priory to serve the needs of travellers and fishermen on the sands of Morecambe Bay.*Foulney Island, Morecambe Bay  island of birds from ON fuglena and ON ey:: Foulney is now a bird sanctuary and site of special scientific interest*Ladyholme, Windermere  island of Our Lady. ME, using ON holmr:: Marys hermitage was here, mentioned 1272*Lords Island, Derwentwater  probably named after the Earls of Derwentwater.*Piel Island, Morecambe Bay  named after Castle.::The island was originally called Foudrey or Fotheray, possibly from ON fouder ey meaning fodder island, and the castle was called the Pile Peel of Fotherey.*Rampsholme, Derwentwater probably Hrafns island from ON Hrafns holmr or wild garlic island with the OE hramsa.*Roa Island, Morecambe Bay  Red Island from ON raur:: the area is rich in red haematite*St. Herberts Island, Derwentwater  named after the 7th century saint who was a hermit on this island.:: the island became a place of pilgrimage by 1374*Walney, Irish Sea  Isle of the British from ON valna ey:: the Old English name for Walney was Wagneia, island of quicksands. In the Book it is called Houganai or island of Hougun.  Hougun, from the Norse word haugr meaning hill or mound, is also the name given to Furness in Domesday. See also *Cumbria*District*language*of Cumbria*placenames*The Brittonic Language in the Old North References (* Place Names of Lake District
5805690
Par_Beliya
Par Beliya () is a town under Neturia police station ()in district in the Indian state of Bengal.GeographyThe area forms the lowest step of the Nagpur Plateau. The general scenario is undulating land with scattered hills.(Houlton, Sir John, Bihar, the Heart of India, 1949, p. 170, Orient Longmans Ltd.)It is located south of River.Demographics India census(), Par Beliya had a population of 6036. Males constitute 53% of the population and females 47%. Par Beliya has an average literacy rate of 59%, lower than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 69%, and female literacy is 48%. In Par Beliya, 14% of the population is under 6 years of age.EconomyIt is an important coal mining area of Eastern Coalfields Ltd., a subsidiary of India Limited. ( Eastern Coalfields ) This area of Purlia district is linked with Dishergarh in subdivision with a bridge across the River. http://wikimapia.org/168651/ReferencesBeliyaBeliyaBeliya
5810305
Edward_John_Dunn
Edward John Dunn (1 November 1844  20 April 1937) was an Australian geologist, winner of the 1905 Medal.File:Silex Griquatown.2009.0.197 fond .jpg|thumb|250|Left|Biface PaleolithicFormer collection of Edward John Dunn - Museum of ToulouseEarly lifeDunn was born at Bedminster near Bristol, England, the son of Edward Herbert Dunn and his wife Betsy, ne Robinson. The family emigrated to South Wales in 1849, initially living near New South Wales then in Victoria from 1856. Dunn was educated at the Beechworth Church of England school and later by a tutor. Dunn was a collector of rocks and minerals from boyhood.Geological careerDunn entered the Beechworth land survey office and had experience in surveying. In 1864 Dunn joined the geological survey under Richard Cecil Selwyn and was trained in geological work by Heinrich Friedrich Ulrich. He remained with the survey until it was abolished in 1869 and in the same year qualified as a mining surveyor.In 1871 Dunn returned to England, via Africa, where he was government geologist for the Colony reporting on mines. He prepared the first geological map of South Africa and had a part in the discovery of dimonds. In 1872 Dunn travelled through Bushmanland accompanied by 15 troopers of the Northern Border police. He was able to gather much information about the Bushmen which he embodied in his work on The Bushman, which, however, was not published until nearly 60 years later. In 1873 he went to London, studied at the school of mines, Jermyn Street, and obtained his certificate for assaying. In 1883 he prophesied that the Transvaal would become an infinitely richer gold-bearing country than any yet discovered.Dunn returned to Victoria in 1886 and went into private practice. As a result of one of his reports the coalfield at Victoria, was developed. Dunn was appointed director of the geological survey of Victoria in 1904, and in 1905 was awarded the Murchison Medal by the Society of London. Dunn applied the portion of the fund allotted to him with the medal towards the cost of publishing his monograph on Pebbles which appeared in 1911. Dunn was elected President of the Society of Victoria in 1906. Dunn retired from the Survey of Victoria in 1912, but kept up his interest in his subject through an energetic old age.Late lifeIn 1929 at the age of 84, Dunn published a comprehensive work on the Geology of Gold; his book on The Bushman, based on his own experiences in South Africa, came out two years later. Dunn died on 20 April 1937. He married in 1875 Elizabeth Julie Perchard who survived him with a son and two daughters. A list of his publications can be found in In Memory of Edward John Dunn, Melbourne, 1937. His collection of Bushmen objects was given to the Pitt Rivers museum at Oxford, his australites and pebbles went to the British Museum, and his collection of Victorian stones to the mines department museum, Melbourne.References*A. W. Beasley, Dunn, Edward John (1844 - 1937), Dictionary of Biography, Volume 8, MUP, 1981, pp 372373. Retrieved on 5 October 2008**Dunn, Edward John (1844 - 1937) Bright Sparcs, of Melbourne. Retrieved on 5 October 2008
5816815
Little_Susitna_River
 watershed            at the Palmer gaugeLittle Susitna River heads at Glacier on Peak, in Mountains at , flows SW to Inlet,  W of Alaska Inlet Low.()HistoryLocal name published in 1898 by USC&GS.Location(1334) Little Susitna River,  West of MacKenzie,is said to be navigable for craft and skiffs at water for about .()(1335) Caution:the depths offshore and in the approach to Little Susitna River are subject to drastic and continual change.(The Little Susitna River is a river in Alaska. It originates in Pass, at , in the Mountains which form the northern boundary of the Valley. It flows a few dozen miles to the Inlet. It contains a variety of hydrology ranging from flat water near the inlet to class 5 water in Pass. It is bridged by Road in Pass, Parks Road, Road, Parks Highway, and Road. It flooded in 1972 and again in August 2006, causing minor damage to homes and infrastructure. Popular activities along the river include camping, fishing, wildlife viewing and photography, and hunting. Access thumb | left | 400px | Little Susitna RiverThe river begins in Pass, a state recreation area that was originally opened by hard rock mining.  This area still has active gold mines and is also open for recreational mining.  Much of the land between Pass and the Parks Highway bridge is privately owned, while most of the land below the Parks Highway Bridge is owned by the state.  The Parks Highway crosses the river at RM 69.5 and parallels the river for about a mile (1.6 km). 42 river miles down stream there is the Little Susitna Public Use Facility, which offers camping and boating access approximately  south of Wasilla. This campground/boat launch lies within the Flats State Game Refuge on the pristine Little Susitna River.and i craped my pants Fishing The Alaska of Fish and Game operates a weir to count salmon and salmon in river.  The Little Susitna River weir is located about one-half mile upstream of the Parks Highway bridge. Salmon fishing is closed upstream of the Parks Highway, so the weir counts indicate the number of fish getting past the sport fishery. The Little Susitna River provides a multitude of sport angling opportunities. salmon, salmon, salmon, salmon, and salmon are available, as well as some Varden and trout. Several other less targeted species such as grayling, burbot, round whitefish and pike also call the Little Susitna River home.ReferencesExternal links*****of Alaska riversSusitna River
5828710
Moss_Valley,_Wrexham
    The Moss Valley (, ) is an area and country park in Britain. It is in the county borough of Wrexham, in north Wales. The area is also informally known as The Moss and The Aggey amongst locals. It is most well known for its extensive mining history. (- WCBC: Moss Valley Country Park)HistoryThomas TelfordIn 1796, a feeder reservoir lake was constructed in the Valley for an extension of the Canal under Telford. The canal would have eventually served as an extension from Basin. This plan was abandoned in 1798. Remnants of the canal are still visible in nearby Gwersyllt, and a street in the village is named Heol Camlas (Welsh: Canal Way). Telfords lake is not the lake that is currently present in the valley(Local Timeline @ Coedpoeth Minerahistory.com).CollieriesThroughout the 19th Century and early 20th Century, the Moss Valley was the home to the Westminster Colliery in its northern end, and Gatewen Colliery at the southern end. The coal was distributed both locally and nationally through major railway links, much of which was built specifically for the distribution of goods. The collierys railways were linked to neighbouring Western Railway lines. This originally was the Wheatsheaf Branch which ran from the Wheatsheaf Junction of the Chester line, then up a worked incline up Gwersyllt Hill, and then through the 220ft Summerhill Tunnel to Westminster Colliery. The line then continued through the other side of the valley through the 400ft Brymbo Tunnel, up a second worked incline to Steelworks. The western portal of the Summerhill Tunnel is still visible as of 2008, although its eastern portal and both portals of the Brymbo tunnel have been buried. (Forgotten Relics - Summerhill and Brymbo Tunnels) In 1862 the GWR Ffrwd Branch from the Croesnewydd Junction was opened to transport railway traffic over a much more normal terrain between the Chester line and Brymbo, replacing the Brymbo half of the Wheatsheaf Branch. A Moss Branch was later created from the Ffrwd Branch, making the Wheatsheaf Branch, its brake inclines and two tunnels defunct by 1908. ( The Central Railway Brymbo Branch also ran through the valley, and the Moss Valley station is still visible.Much of the local working force relied on these collieries for both income and fuel. Westminster Colliery closed in February 1925, but the remnants of the industry were not removed until the early 1970s. It closed mainly due to water leakage, but this was the beginning of a declining industry.(With reference to The North Wales Coalfield by Ithel Kelly, 1990.)Recent historyIn the early 1970s, the area was reclaimed as a park. The finished area was to include two lakes (one north boating lake complete with boat storage, and one south smaller lake which includes an island at the centre), a childrens playground, public toilets, a golf club, facilities for fishing and various benches and picnic tables. Through the 80s and 90s the area was heavily vandalised, leading to the loss of boating and public toilet facilities.However, in the early 21st Century, the area was donated grants for restoration. Both lakes were cleaned, and fishing was restricted to private permit holders only. Paths were given new surfaces, information signs and benches were erected, and bridges were repaired. The north former-boating lake was re-targeted towards conservation, and water plants were added to the water. Many species of fish, and ducks can now be found in the lakes, a sure sign of an improvement.  Many of the former railway trackbeds were transformed into nature walks, and steps were installed on banks. Gates and fences were erected to prevent the use of motor vehicles in the lake areas. However, both the toilets and former boat-house remain empty. Throughout 2005 and 2006, the original playground was dismantled and eventually replaced in 2007 (pictured below).The area is now an official park, and attracts many visitors including those interested in its industrial history and its wildlife amongst its waters and woodlands. It highly successful golf club still provides to its newer course, just over the road from the original one (now a free pitch and putt 9-hole course).PhotographsImage:Mossvalley playground.jpg|Playground areaImage:Mossvalley carpark.jpg|Fishing LakeImage:Mossvalley sign.jpg|Entrance sign to the Moss ValleyNotes and referencesExternal links*Wrexham CBC- Official Site*Welsh Golf Clubs- About the Moss Valley Golf Club*Information Site*photos of Moss Valley and surrounding area on geograph*Welsh Coal Mines - check out the local pits histories
5838705
Stakeholder_analysis
Stakeholder analysis in resolution, management, and administration, is the process of identifying the individuals or groups that are likely to affect or be affected by a proposed action, and sorting them according to their impact on the action and the impact the action will have on them. This information is used to assess how the interests of those stakeholders should be addressed in a project plan, policy, program, or other action. Stakeholder analysis is a key part of management. Overview Stakeholder analysis is a term that refers to the action of analyzing the attitudes of stakeholders towards something (most frequently a project). It is frequently used during the preparation phase of a project to assess the attitudes of the stakeholders regarding the potential changes. Stakeholder analysis can be done once or on a regular basis to track changes in stakeholder attitudes over time. A stakeholder is any person or organization, who can be positively or negatively impacted by, or cause an impact on the actions of a company, government, or organization. Types of stakeholders are:* Primary stakeholders : are those ultimately affected, either positively or negatively by an organizations actions.* Secondary stakeholders : are the intermediaries, that is, persons or organizations who are indirectly affected by an organizations actions.* Key stakeholders : (who can also belong to the first two groups) have significant influence upon or importance within an organization.Therefore, stakeholder analysis has the goal of developing cooperation between the stakeholder and the team and, ultimately, assuring successful outcomes for the project. Stakeholder analysis is performed when there is a need to clarify the consequences of envisaged changes, or at the start of new projects and in connection with organizational changes generally. It is important to identify all stakeholders for the purpose of identifying their success criteria and turning these into quality goals. Methods of Stakeholder MappingThe following list identifies some of the best known and most commonly used methods for stakeholder mapping:* (Mitchell, Agle et al. 1997) proposed a classification of stakeholders based on power to influence, the legitimacy of each stakeholders relationship with the organisation, and the urgency of the stakeholders claim on the organization. The results of this classification may assess the fundamental question of which groups are stakeholders deserving or requiring managers attention, and which are not? This is salience - the degree to which managers give priority to competing stakeholder claims (Mitchell, Agle et al., 1997:854)* (Fletcher, Guthrie et al. 2003) defined a process for mapping stakeholder expectations based on value hierarchies and Key Performance Areas (KPA),* (Cameron, Crawley et al. 2010) defined a process for ranking stakeholders based on needs and the relative importance of stakeholders to others in the network.* (Savage, Nix et al. 1991) offer a way to classify stakeholders according to potential for threat and potential for cooperation.* (Turner, Kristoffer and Thurloway, 2002) have developed a process of identification, assessment of awareness, support, influence leading to strategies for communication and assessing stakeholder satisfaction, and who is aware or ignorant and whether their attitude is supportive or opposing. Mapping techniques include the following sub-set of results from a Web search of analysis techniques being used by aid agencies, governments or consultant groups:* Influence-interest grid (Imperial College London)* Power-impact grid (Office of Government Commerce UK 2003)* Mendelows Power-interest grid (Aubrey L. Mendelow, Kent State University, Ohio 1991)* Three-dimensional grouping of power, interest and attitude (Murray-Webster and Simon 2005)* The Stakeholder Circle (Bourne 2007)The first step in building any stakeholder map is to develop a categorised list of the members of the stakeholder community. Once the list is reasonably complete it is then possible to assign priorities in some way, and then to translate the highest priority stakeholders into a table or a picture. The potential list of stakeholders for any project will always exceed both the time available for analysis and the capability of the mapping tool to sensibly display the results, the challenge is to focus on the right stakeholders who are currently important and to use the tool to visualise this critical sub-set of the total community.The most common presentation styles use a matrix to represent two dimensions of interest with frequently a third dimension shown by the colour or size of the symbol representing the individual stakeholders.Some of the commonly used dimensions include:* Power (high, medium, low)* Support (positive, neutral, negative)* Influence (high or low)* Need (strong, medium, weak) Other Forms of Stakeholder Analysis In Sweden, there is a data collected about stakeholders as maps  tabular, graphical or pictorial has been adopted by researchers and consultants from the earliest studies. The key element of an effective mapping process is as far as possible to replace subjectivity with objective measures and to make the assessment process transparent. This transparency will allow the basis of any assessment to be clearly understood by others and will facilitate review and updating as appropriate.  We would suggest there are three basic approaches used to help visualize, map and understand stakeholders.The approach with the highest profile in general business is the customer relationship management or CRM approach. This approach requires substantial data sets to be gathered about a key segment of the business stakeholder community (typically customers) followed by the use of data mining techniques allow trends and opportunities to be identified, graphed and communicated.  These reports inform management decision making and help the business prosper.  CRM works effectively in situations where the business is relatively stable and there are a large class of stakeholders interacting with the business in a reasonably common way. A second approach that cannot be ignored is the extensive body of work focusing on influence networks. This research focuses on the importance of  relationships through the study of influence networks, social networks, social capital, viewing projects as temporary knowledge organizations (TKOs) and more recently the idea of CRPR (Complex Responsive Processes of Relating)(Weaver 2007).  All of these theories emphasize the critical importance of the relationships between different stakeholders both within and around the project team. The strength and effectiveness of the internal relationships enable the project team to function effectively and allows the team (or the project) to interact and influence its surrounding stakeholder community. The difficulty in using these strands of research lies in building the influence/relationship maps; the work is difficult, time consuming and invasive requiring extensive interviews with the stakeholders.  Consequently whilst an appreciation of these ideas is critical for effective stakeholder management, the opportunities to undertake a detailed analysis of a particular stakeholder community are very limited and typically only occur as part of an academic research assignment. The need for a practical, usable approach to visualizing many different stakeholder communities has led to the development of a range of listing and mapping techniques by academics, consultants and businesses over the years. These approaches trade the richness of data available under the CRM approach for a holistic view of the whole stakeholder community and largely ignore the complex network of relationships considered in CRPR and the other network theories outlined above for a simpler consideration of importance in some form. Obviously the importance of a stakeholder is directly associated with his or her ability to influence the project through their network of relationships; the difference in the analysis is in the way this is assessed. All of the mapping techniques discussed above use a qualitative perception of a stakeholders importance rather than a quantitative analysis of the influence networks and relationships surrounding the stakeholder to determine an absolute value for that persons importance.A more recent form of Stakeholder Analysis can be seen in Task Method. An approach which seeks to blend three disciplines: theory, analysis and research. Benefits Stakeholder analysis helps with the identification of the following(What Is Stakeholder Analysis?, S. Babou, 2008):* Stakeholders interests* Mechanisms to influence other stakeholders* Potential risks* Key people to be informed about the project during the execution phase* Negative stakeholders as well as their adverse effects on the project References ( Further reading * Fletcher, A., et al. (2003). Mapping stakeholder perceptions for a third sector organization. in: Journal of Intellectual Capital 4(4): 505  527.* Mitchell, R. K., B. R. Agle, and D.J. Wood. (1997). Toward a Theory of Stakeholder Identification and Salience: Defining the Principle of Who and What really Counts. in: Academy of Management Review 22(4): 853 - 888.* Savage, G. T., T. W. Nix, Whitehead and Blair. (1991). Strategies for assessing and managing organizational stakeholders. In: Academy of Management Executive 5(2): 61  75.* Cameron, B.G., T. Seher, E.F. Crawley (2010). Goals for space exploration based on stakeholder network value considerations. in: Acta Astronautica doi:10.1016/j.actaastro.2010.11.003.* Turner, J. R., V. Kristoffer, et al., Eds. (2002). The Project Manager as Change Agent. London, McGraw-Hill Publishing Co.* Weaver, P. (2007). A Simple View of Complexity in Project Management. Proceedings of the 4th World Project Management Week. Singapore.* Hemmati, M., Dodds F., Enayti, J.,McHarry J. (2002) Multistakeholder Procesess on Governance and Sustainability. London Earthscan* Mendelow, A. (1991) Stakeholder Mapping, Proceedings of the 2nd International Conference on Information Systems, Cambridge, MA (Cited in Scholes,1998).de:Projektumfeldanalysea stakeholders
5849932
Weisgerber
Weisgerber is a surname that may refer to:* Weisgerber, a German politician and Member of the European Parliament for Bavaria* Weisgerber, a German professor of mining archaeology* Weisgerber, a Canadian politician and businessman* James Vernon Weisgerber,   Archbishop of Winnipeg* Weisgerber, a Lorraine-born German linguist specializing in Celtic linguistics*de:Weisgerberfr:Weisgerber
5854757
The_American_Adventure_Theme_Park
coordinatesThe American Adventure (at one time briefly known as American Adventure World) was a park located in the Midlands region of England; quite close to both Nottingham and Derby on the edge of Ilkeston in the county of Derbyshire. The park for many years had a number of large white-knuckle attractions, but in 2005 was re-themed as a family park aimed at the under-14 market. In January 2007 the owners announced that it would not reopen for the new season, and the rides would be sold off.HistoryThe American Adventure, built on an area of Country Park which had been subject to seam and opencast mining, was originally opened in June 1987 with an West and Cowboys vs. Native Americans theme. A theme park called Britannia Park had been opened on the site in 1985 but closed soon after due to a lack of visitors. In June 1987 the American Adventure opened heralded as Britains Major New Theme Park. Initial attractions at the American Adventure included the two-drop flume, the runaway mine train, the Buffalo coaster, a ship, and a wheel.1989 saw the opening of the Missile roller coaster, a Vekoma Boomerang coaster which was at the time voted the number one roller coaster in the UK. Shortly before this there was the Canadian themed addition of the Rocky Mountain Rapids. In 1993 the log-flume was extended to have a third drop and was renamed from Cherokee Falls to Nightmare Niagara. The extra drop made it the tallest log-flume in the UK throughout its operational life (this record has now reverted to Leap at Park). In 1995 the Iron Wolf roller coaster (now located in a Polish theme park and is known as the tic tac tornado)(RCDB.com) was installed, which broke away from the American theming of the park and was instead themed around the ITV gameshow Gladiators.From 1996 onwards the park began to decline and in 1997 then owners the Granada group decided to pull out of owning the park. It was sold to a company called Ventureworld which was headed by Broome, a former Towers developer. During the reign of Broome as owner of the park the only noticeable change was the addition of minor or upcharge attractions, and the slow decline of many of the parks attractions.left|thumb|American Adventure in 1991Ventureworld immediately renamed the park American Adventure World, with the intention of dropping the American theming and ultimately renaming the park Adventure World. Various logos produced over the next few seasons would use the American Adventure World name, but with the prominence of the first and last words varying wildly. By the end of the parks life, the title had reverted to The American Adventure.In 1999 Broome announced he was stepping down and the THG Group, who also own Pontins and Tower bought the park. After 1999 many of the smaller rides disappeared from the park and it slowly fell into decline. The old main entrance to the park had to be closed due to subsidence, and the new entrance was nowhere near as attractive as the old one. It was also in this season that it was re-named The American Adventure.2005 saw the closing down of three major rides for which the park was famous, including Nightmare Niagara and The Missile. At the time it was also believed that the Rocky Mountain Rapids was also ending its life. The two water rides were supposedly closed due to structural instability and water pollution problems, whilst the Missile was not deemed to fit in with the parks new family label and had also experienced heavy disrepair. Missile was relocated to Hills as Wipeout and was scheduled to open on 1 May 2007 (delays meant the ride didnt open until the middle of the season). At the start of the season, the pirate ship ride called the Yankee Clipper was closed with the intention of it being re-opened later in the season. However, due to refurbishment taking longer than planned it did not open until the following season.2006 was the final year the theme park operated. There were some signs of investment and heavy emphasis on the new family image. New rides included the Mini Mine Rush, a kids rollercoaster, now re-located at Land, a new motorbike attraction in the building previously used for the log flume station, as well as the re-opening of the newly refurbished Rocky Mountain Rapids and Yankee Clipper rides.Closurethumb|left|July 2009The American Adventure announced on Thursday 4 January 2007 that the park would not be re-opening for the 2007 season. Derbyshire County Council was reviewing options for the sites future.(NEWS.BBC.co.uk)Part of the park has been leased, while the rest is being controlled by Derbyshire County Council. The park has been given the name Shipley Lakeside and is now up for sale.The park is now being demolished to make way for development.The futureDCC have stated that they will allow minimal development on the site.The land was for sale on the Derbyshire County Council Website, under the name Shipley Lakeside (Former American Adventure). The land is no longer for sale and three potential buyers are now being lined up by the DCC.(Ilkestonadvertiser.co.uk)Plans have been put forward for a retail and office park to be built on the site (June 2011)ReferencesExternal links**The American Adventure Fansite, theamericanadventure.info*Article by William Squires documenting the parks history, s104638357.websitehome.co.uk*Article on Britannia Park Including Pictures of Original Promotional leaflets, heanorhistory.org.uk*Picasa Web Album: American Adventure - Gone But Not Forgotten by Gareth Williams, picasaweb.google.co.uk*A photostream on Flickr detailing a 2005 visit to the now-closed park, flickr.comAdventure Theme Park
5863809
Clinton_Wolf
 AFLTablesRef  C/Clinton_Wolf.htmlClinton Wolf (born 18 December 1968) is an Aboriginal leader and former rules footballer.Football careerWolf was recruited from the Football Club in the Australian Football League to the inaugural squad of the Football Club in the Football League.  He only played four matches for Fremantle in the AFL season before retiring due to recurring knee injuries.Working lifeAs a lawyer, Wolf was the Executive Director of the Yamatji Land and Sea Council title representative body from 1998 to 2001.(Ritter, David (2004); Dont Call Me Baby Ten Years of the Yamatji Marlpa Land and Sea Council Native Title Representative Bodyl; Indigenous Law Bulletin)  He is currently Chief Executive Officer of the Western Desert Land Aboriginal Corporation.(Bain, Di; Uranium mining tensions resurface; 29 July 2007)He is, as of 2011, chairperson of the Western Australian Aboriginal Lands Trust.()External links*References
5873386
Forum_for_Fact-finding_Documentation_and_Advocacy
The Forum for Fact-finding Documentation and Advocacy (FFDA) is an Indian rights monitoring organization founded in 1995 that fights to promote and protect human rights in India by working with the victims of human rights violations and their organizations. It educates the victims and their communities, and facilitates and builds the capacity of organizations of victims to take collective action on their own. It addresses the issues of displacement and forced eviction, violence against women and children, exploitation, torture, abuse and discrimination against Dalits (untouchable and low caste poor), and attacks on minorities and indigenous communities. Based on learning and work experiences, FFDA integrated democracy monitoring into its core activity as the basic path to rights for the above mentioned target group; participating in decision making and asking for accountability and governance of the state in particular. It focuses on having a right to:*Social and political participation*A sustainable livelihood*Education, particularly access for girls and tribal children*Life and security*IdentityFFDA investigates, reports on, and campaigns against human rights abuses. Tribal and Dalit people, especially women and children, are its priority. FFDA is led by Subash Chandra Mohapatra. Aims and beliefsFFDA dreams of a humane society where there will be freedom, justice, peace, and inherent dignity for all people. In India, FFDAs goal is a just social and humane order without class and caste-dominated economic, social, cultural, civil, and political structures.FFDAs goals are:# Promotion, protection, and respect for human rights in the fight against political, institutional, and social oppression in India.# Promotion and strengthening of the peoples organizations.# Protection of human rights of deprived communities, especially indigenous tribes, women, children, Dalits and other victims of human rights violations.# Human rights institution building.# Promotion and protection of democracy as the basic part of accountability and transparency of the state.SuccessesPrevention of child marriagesmarriages persist in rural India, although prohibited by Indian legislation since 1929. Such traditional marriages continue to be organised in massive numbers, principally in the poorest of families. Today, 33% of girls in India are married before they reach the age of 15. Another third are already married by 18, the legal age limit for marriage. It is a traditional ritual that affects primarily girls: apart from the fact that they are not physically equipped to give birth, forcing a child between the ages of 11 and 15 to marry condemns her to a life of illiteracy, economic dependency and psychological and physical incapacity. In 2003, FFDA filed a public interest litigation before Supreme Court of India seeking a ban on child marriages in India. The appex court directed to enact a new preventative law.()Anti-rape victoryIn 1994 in the Indian state of Orissa, after a political party rally, 150 party members raped 56 Dalit and tribal women working in the local stone-crushing industry. Mr Mohapatra, then working as a journalist for a leading national newspaper, helped the women get medical statements from reluctant doctors and pressed police to register the rapes and go after the rapists. Mohapatra exposed the rapist politicians in the newspaper, and as a result the state government fell.Tribal people fight for land rightsIn 2000, 26 families got their land back (225 acres). 47 other land cases are pending.In 2001, a steel company funded by the Monetary Fund displaced 3000 tribal people from their land. 250 people were then employed by the company. The tribal women went to the forest to collect leaves and roots to eat. Foresters and police forced the women to leave. When the women protested, the police and foresters kidnapped, raped and beat them in a government office. FFDA is helping the women to publicise the atrocities and take legal action.Organising against genetically modified food and environmental destructionFFDA is exposing how modified (GM) food makes people ill. In 1999, 30,000 people died in a cyclone in Orissa. International and Relief Services gave GM bulgur wheat to survivors. After six months, thousands of people became ill from the wheat. FFDA picketed CARE International offices. After a long battle, the Indian government in the last week of February 2003 banned the GM food supplies by overseas organizations.FFDA publicises the consequences of the mining industrys destruction of the hills in Orissa.First lesbian marriage in IndiaMr Mohapatra, the team leader of FFDA, provided legal expertise for and was a witness at the first official lesbian marriage anywhere in India of two young tribal women in Chhattisgarh.External links* FFDAs websiteReferences
5883647
Sebastin_Ramrez_de_Fuenleal
Sebastin Ramrez de Fuenleal (b. ca. 1490, de Haro, Cuenca, Spain, d. January 22, 1547, Valladolid, Spain) was bishop of Domingo and president of the Audiencia of Santo Domingo 1528 to 1531. He was also president of the second Audiencia of Spain (January 10, 1531 to April 16, 1535). Later he was a member of the of the Indies.Early lifeRamrez de Fuenleal was born in Cuenca, to a family of the hidalgo class. He entered the of Valladolid at the age of 16, where he received a degree in canon law. In 1520 he became inquisitor of Seville. He was later a member of the Royal Chancery of Granada.Bishop of Santo DomingoHe was named bishop of Santo Domingo and president of its Audiencia, occupying these positions from 1528 to 1531. In Hispaniola he punished mistreatment of the Indians, reorganized the treasury, and faced the rebellion of Enriquillo in Bahoruco. He built schools, established villages and constructed public works. He paid particular attention to mining, and to the rights of the Indians.At this time the slave trade to Hispaniola and Cuba was just beginning, in order to supply labor for the mines and for sugar production. Bishop Ramrez did not oppose this slave trade, which was considered necessary at the time. He did oppose monopolies in the slave trade that led to inflated prices.President of the Audiencia of MexicoThe second Audiencia of New Spain was named in a royal decree dated January 12, 1530. It included Bishop Ramrez de Fuenleal as president and de Salmern, de Maldonado, Ceinos and de Quiroga as oidores (judges). These individuals had been nominated by the of Badajoz, who was also president of the Chancery of Valladolid. In contrast to the members of the first Audiencia, all of these men were honest, honorable and capable. All were licentiates. The nominated oidores were located in various parts of Spain at the time; Ramrez de Fuenleal was in Santo Domingo. The king directed that whoever among them arrived first in New Spain should begin immediately to govern.Corts was returning to New Spain from Spain at about this time. He had just successfully defended his previous actions before the king, and was newly created Marqus del Valle de Oaxaca and reappointed captain general of the colony. He stopped in Santo Domingo on his way, to become acquainted with Ramrez de Fuenleal. Corts continued on to New Spain, arriving at Veracruz on July 15, 1530. Bishop Ramrez de Fuenleal and Licenciado Quiroga arrived in City in early October. They took time to find lodgings and rest before they taking over the government.They began to exercise government functions on January 10, 1531. Bishop Ramrez carried with him a letter of strong reprimand for Mexico City Bishop de Zumrraga and instructions to begin juicios de residencia against the members of the first Audiencia (Beltrn de Guzmn, Ortiz de Matienzo and Delgadillo), as well as Corts and Hernndez de Proao. These investigations took place in due time.The second Audiencia improved the road from Veracruz to Mexico City, and along the way founded the city of de los Angeles as a resting-place for travelers (April 16, 1531). It imported horses and cattle from Spain, took steps to import a printing press, founded the Imperial College of Santiago Tlatelolco for higher learning for young Indigenous men, renewed exploration, and continued work on the cathedral of Mexico City. Bishop Ramrez was among those who encouraged the Franciscan missionaries in Mexico to investigate and document the pre-Columbian cultures of the Aztec Empire. He was a defender of the human rights of the Indigenous population. He proposed the substitution of payment in kind and encomiendas to replace the payment of tributes then imposed on the Indians. He ordered the construction of an aqueduct to supply Mexico City. He pacified the country and organized the laws, paving the way for the arrival of the first viceroy, de Mendoza, in 1535.The year 1532 was a tumultuous one in New Spain. For one thing, the institution of slavery became subject to governmental regulation. The enslavement of Indians was prohibited. Also, the Audiencia brought back verdicts on the juicios de residencia of Corts, the oidores of the first Audiencia, and others. Corts and Bishop Zumrraga were acquitted; Ortiz de Matienzo and Delgadillo were convicted, but not sentenced. On April 25, 1532, Emperor Charles V signed a degree raising Oaxaca to the rank of a city.Meantime the calumnies spread by the enemies of Bishop Zumrraga and the partisans of the first Audiencia had shaken the confidence of the Spanish Court. Zumrraga was ordered to return to Spain to defend himself before the Council of the Indies. He  set sail in May 1532. Zumrraga, however, had little difficulty vindicating his good name, and was formally consecrated bishop at Valladolid on April 27, 1533. He returned to New Spain in October 1534.On April 15, 1535, Corts began an expedition to explore the coasts of Sinaloa, Sonora and California. On this expedition he is credited with discovering the of Corts.Later careerOn August 25, 1535, news was received in Mexico City of the expected arrival of Antonio de Mendoza, the first viceroy of New Spain. He took over governmental functions from the Audiencia on November 14, 1535, the day of his arrival. Ramrez de Fuenleal, ill, returned to Spain in 1537 to recover his health. He was successively bishop of Tuy, Len (1540) and Cuenca (1542). From 1540 he was president of the Chancery of Valladolid and a member of the Council of the Indies. He had some involvement in the Laws of 1542, serving as editor.He died on January 22, 1547 in Valladolid, Spain. At the time of his death he was president of the Chancery of Valladolid and of Cuenca. He was interred in the Dominican convent of La Santa Cruz, in the town of Villaescusa de Haro, where he had been born.See also*of Viceroys of New SpainReferences* D. Sebastin Ramrez de Fuenleal, Mundicra No. 8, Christmas 1998.* Garca Puron, Manuel, Mxico y sus gobernantes, v. 1. Mexico City: Joaqun Porrua, 1984.* Orozco Linares, Fernando, Gobernantes de Mxico. Mexico City: Panorama Editorial, 1985, ISBN 968-38-0260-5.External links* Short biography on MSN EncartaRamrez de Fuenleal 
5892756
VFA-94
aircraft_fighter HornetStrike Fighter Squadron 94 (VFA-94), also known as the Mighty Shrikes, are a States Navy Hornet fighter squadron stationed at Air Station Lemoore. Currently a land-based Unit Deployment Program squadron, they deploy with no tail code assigned.  Their radio callsign is Hobo.Insignia and nicknameThe original squadron was known as the Tough Kitties and had a cartoon cat insignia.  When the second squadron was formed and deployed aboard Hornet (CVA-12) during its world cruise in 1954, it also used a cartoon cat insignia. There is no record of this insignia being officially approved for use by the squadron.  The squadrons first official insignia was approved by CNO on 21 November 1955, and consisted of a yellow and black tiger paw with lightning bolts on a blue background.  A new insignia was approved on 21 April 1959 consisting of a dark blue stylized aircraft with above an atom symbol on a blue background.  A modification to this insignia was approved on 16 May 1967, replacing the atom symbol by a stylized bird design. The stylized bird was orange and the other colors from the previous design stayed the same. Nicknamed the Mighty Shrikes, the squadron was named after a small carnivorous bird of prey, the Shrike. It engages in aerial combat to strike its prey in the air and on the ground, and then impales its victim on a sharp thorn.HistoryTwo distinct US Navy squadrons have held the designation VA-94.  The first served in World War II and was disestablished in the late 40s.  The second of those squadrons later became VFA-94, the main subject of this article.  Officially, the US Navy does not recognize a direct lineage of newly formed squadrons with disestablished squadrons.(http://www.history.navy.mil/faqs/faq6-1.htm).  Often however, the new squadron will assume the nickname, insignia, and traditions of the earlier squadrons.  That appears to have happened in this case, as (for a short time) the new squadron used a cat insignia similar to the earlier one.1940sThe first VA-94 was established on July 1, 1943, as Bombing Squadron NINETY NINE (VB-99), an experimental squadron for the new Helldiver. VB-99 was initially equipped with the Douglas SBD-5 Dauntless.  On October 15, 1943, the squadron was redesignated Bombing Squadron TWENTY (VB-20), and on November 15, 1943 the squadron started to receive its first SB2C-1C Helldivers.  From August 16 through November 23, 1944, VB-20 flew the Helldiver from  for the first of two World War II Pacific Theater combat cruises.   The squadrons first combat action occurred on August 31, 1944 and involved an attack on the Islands.  In September 1944, VB-20 participated in pre-invasion strikes on Islands and provided air support for landings on Island.  In October 1944, the squadron participated in air strikes against Okinawa, Formosa and Luzon.  On October 24, 1944, VB-20 participated in the for Leyte Gulf.  Squadron SB2Cs flew sorties against Japanese surface force in the Sea, these attacks contributed to the sinking of the Musashi, one of the two largest battleships in the world.  On October 25, 1944, VB-20 aircraft were part of the Fast Carrier Task Force that attacked the Japanese carrier force in the Battle of Cape Engao. Four Japanese carriers were sunk during this engagement.   From November 23, 1944 through February 2, 1945, VB-20 embarked aboard , for the second of two World War II combat cruises. Squadron Helldivers struck Japanese positions in Ormoc Bay, Leyte, Luzon, Formosa, Kong, the China Sea and Okinawa. On November 15, 1946, VB-20 was redesignated Attack Squadron NINE A (VA-9A). On August 12, 1948, they were re-designated Attack Squadron NINETY FOUR (VA-94), and in October 1948 they received the new AD-2 Douglas Skyraider.  On November 30, 1949, VA-94 was disestablished.1950sA new squadron, Fighter Squadron 94 was established at Alameda, California on March 26, 1952.  The Mighty Shrikes began flying the Corsair, but quickly transitioned to jet aircraft.  Over the next eight years, the squadron received and flew numerous fighter aircraft before becoming an attack squadron.  In Sep 1953, the squadron received the Panther.   In Jan 1955 the Shrikes moved to Moffett Field and received the Fury in Feb 1955.  In Nov 1955, they transitioned to the Cougar.  They again flew various models of the FJ-3 Fury from Jun 1957 until 1959. The Mighty Shrikes were redesignated as Light Attack Squadron VA-94 on Aug 1, 1958(Current Navy Aviation Squadron Lineages DEPARTMENT OF THE NAVY -- NAVAL HISTORICAL CENTER, January 6, 1998) and moved back to NAS Alameda on 20 Aug 1958.  In Jan 1959, they transitioned to the aircraft they would fly (in various models) for the next twelve years, the Skyhawk. 1960sOn 08 Mar 1962, VA-94 moved to NAS Lemoore, California.  As the War escalated, the Mighty Shrikes completed seven consecutive combat deployments to Asia, commencing with a cruise aboard  in 1964. On 1 Dec 1964, the squadron flew its first sorties in support of Yankee Team Operations, armed escort for photo-reconnaissance missions over Laos.  On 7 Feb 1965 following a Cong attack against American advisors in Vietnam, the President Johnson ordered a reprisal strike againstNorth Vietnam, named Flaming Dart I. The squadrons target was concealed by heavy weather and the mission was aborted.  On 11 Feb, the squadron participated in Flaming Dart II, retaliatory strikes against the Chanh Hoa military barracks near Dong Hoi, North Vietnam.  In Mar 1965, the squadron participated in Rolling Thunder strikes against targets in Vietnam.In Oct 1965, as part of Air Wing 9, the squadron moved to NAS Norfolk to join  on her first combat cruise. The squadron was assigned to Air Wing 5 in 1966 and completed four combat deployments aboard  and . 1970sIn February 1971, the squadron transitioned to the Ling-Temco-Vought Corsair II and was assigned to Air Wing 15 / . On 9 May 1972, the squadron participated in Operation Pocket Money, the mining of Haiphong harbor.The first mine was dropped at 08:59 to coincide with President Nixons public announcement of the mining.  All mines were set with 72-hour arming delays, thus permitting merchant ships time for departure or a change in destination consistent with the Presidents public warning. It was the beginning of a mining campaign that planted over 11,000 MK36 type destructor and 108 special Mk 52-2 mines over the next eight months. It is considered to have played a significant role in bringing about an eventual peace arrangement, particularly since it so hampered the enemys ability to continue receiving war supplies.In MayJun 1972, VA-94 participated in operation I, heavy air strikes against targets in North Vietnam.In 1973, the squadron deployed on its first peacetime cruise in a decade, again with Carrier Air Wing 15 aboard USS Coral Sea.On 29 Apr 1975, squadron aircraft provided air cover for Frequent Wind, the evacuation ofAmerican citizens from Saigon that terminated United States military involvement in Vietnam.  On 15 May 1975, Shrike aircraft, along with other elements from CVW-15 launched air strikes against the Cambodian mainland after the capture of the  by Cambodian gunboats.  From May 1979 to January 1980, the squadron deployed aboard  to the Western Pacific and Oceans, including 63 days of operations in the Sea during the Iran Hostage Crisis.1980sThe squadrons next deployment aboard USS Kitty Hawk was completed in 1981.In 1986, aboard USS Enterprise, VA-94 made history as part of the first nuclear aircraft carrier to transit the Canal. The Shrikes cruised the Mediterranean for three months, supporting operations against Libya.In FebMay 1988, the Mighty Shrikes flew air support for Operation Earnest Will, escorting reflagged Kuwaiti oil tankers in the Persian Gulf.  In April 1988, the squadron struck the naval forces of Iran as part of Praying Mantis, the first major U.S. naval battle since War II. Squadron aircraft delivered direct hits on the Iranian frigate Sahand.In Dec 1989, the squadron participated in Operation Classic Resolve, providing support for the Philippine government during a coup attempt.1990sIn June 1990, the Mighty Shrikes received their first Hornet and was redesignated Strike Fighter Squadron NINE FOUR (VFA-94) on Jan 1, 1991.( In May 1991, they deployed aboard  to the Gulf in support of Nations sanctions following the war in Iraq. The Mighty Shrikes also participated in Fiery Vigil, evacuating thousands of homeless people from the Philippines after the Pinatubo eruption.  They subsequently received the Meritorious Unit Commendation for their contribution to the disaster relief efforts.On 15 June 1993, the squadron deployed aboard Abraham Lincoln flying missions over southern Iraq in support of Southern Watch.  In October 1993, Abraham Lincoln left the Persian Gulf for Somalia to provide force protection for U.S. and other United Nations forces aiding in the humanitarian relief effort. The Mighty Shrikes were key participants in Vigilant Sentinel during their 1995 deployment, again aboard the USS Abraham Lincoln CVN-72.  The Shrikes next deployed aboard Kitty Hawk on 10 October 1996 to the Persian Gulf in support of Operation Southern Watch. On 13 May 1997, the Mighty Shrikes deployed aboard , and again on 10 November 1998 to the Persian Gulf in support of Desert Fox.2000sFollowing the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, the Mighty Shrikes led the first missions of Enduring Freedom on October 7, 2001.  In the months that followed, VFA-94 and Air Wing Eleven participated in precision strikes against key Taliban locations in Afghanistan.  The squadron amassed 664 combat sorties and expended 550,000 pounds of ordnance on targets in Afghanistan. The squadron returned home on 19 January 2002.The squadron deployed again on 3 March 2003 for an eight-month combat deployment aboard Nimitz (CVN-68) with CVW-11 in support of Iraqi Freedom.  On 7 May 2005, the squadron again deployed aboard Nimitz to the Persian Gulf in support of Operation Iraqi Freedom.In Oct 2006, the Mighty Shrikes successfully completed the Strike Fighter Advanced Readiness Program, in preparation for the squadrons transition to an expeditionary role.  In January 2007, VFA-94 joined their sister squadron VFA-97 as one of only two F/A-18 squadrons to deploy overseas as part of the Unit Deployment Program(UDP).  Strike Fighter Squadron 94 departed Naval Air Station Lemoore, CA on its first expeditionary evolution to Iwakuni, Japan. The squadron traversed nearly  of open ocean, totaling almost 18 flight hours per jet. During the deployment, VFA-94 participated in Operation Eagle, the first ever U.S. Navy expeditionary deployment to Korea, and Operation Cobra Gold in Thailand. The squadron received numerous accolades for success in number of sorties completed and overall mission accomplishment.In July 2008, VFA-94 completed their second UDP deployment to Japan in support of the Global War on Terror and Pacific Operations. The Mighty Shrikes participated in Exercises Talon Vision at Clark AFB, Philippines; Wolmi-Do Fury at Kadena AFB, Okinawa; and Exercise Lava Viper at Hickam AFB, Hawaii. The Shrikes returned home in February 2009 after completing this successful 7 month deployment. The squadron has been awarded two Joint Meritorious Unit Awards, five Navy Unit Commendations, five Meritorious Unit Commendations, five Battle Efficiency Awards, two Navy Expeditionary Medals, three Armed Forces Expeditionary Medals, and Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal and a Global War on Terrorism Service Medal.External links* VFA-94s Official Webpage* http://www.skyhawk.org/3e/va94/va94.htmReferences(See also*aviation*US Navy carrier air operations*of military aircraft of the United States (naval) / of US Naval aircraft*States Naval Aviator*aviation*of United States Navy aircraft squadrons*of Inactive United States Navy aircraft squadrons
5898859
T._J._Tarsney
Thomas J. Tarsney (1846 &ndash; 1902?) was a Populist politician and author in Colorado in the late 19th century.Early life and political careerTarsney was born in Ohio, but later moved to Colorado.With Governor H. Waite and Lieutenant Governor Carney, Tarsney was one of the organizers of the Populist party in Colorado. He was a strong advocate for the coinage of both gold and silver, and was outraged by what he perceived as the distortions practiced by advocates of the standard in the of 1876.Tarsney was elected general of the Colorado state militia in April 1893 for a two-year term.Cripple Creek StrikeDuring the Creek miners strike of 1894, Governor Waite, a 67-year-old Populist, dispatched 300 troops to the Cripple Creek are on March 18 under the command of Adjutant General Tarsney after the local sheriff had declared that the region was in chaos. Tarsney found the area tense but quiet. Calderwood, president of the local affiliate of the Federation of Miners, assured Tarsney that union members would peacefully surrender for arrest, if that is what Tarsney wished. In his report to the governor, Tarsney described the situation::Early in the day General Brooks and myself were asked to a conference with the officials of the county and the businessmen of Cripple Creek, whom we met to the number of perhaps 30 at the Palace Hotel. They represented to us the terrible conditions existing in the city and the adjacent mining camps, representing that there was no safety for life or property in either, and declaring that the civil authorities were unable to preserve the peace; that the roads and trails were guarded by armed men, openly defying the officers of the law. The sheriff of the county, Mr. M.F. Bowers, was present, and declared his inability to serve the processes of the courts. A careful inquiry into these affairs by General Brooks and myself disclosed the fact that no person in the county had been charged with the commission of any offence in regard to the existing labor troubles, and that no warrant or other process of court had ever issued, and that neither the sheriff nor his deputies had been resisted in any way, nor had Sheriff Bowers ever been, nor had he ever sought to go to Bull Hill, where it was alleged the trouble existed. After this conference I told Sheriff Bowers that the troops were there at his solicitation, but only in aid of the civil authority in the service of process; that on his own showing no process had issued from the courts, the military was not subject to his order, and that the facts in the case would at once be made known to the governor. (Biennial Report of the Adjutant General, 1894.)Convinced that the sheriff had wildly exaggerated the extent of the chaos in the region, Tarsney recommended that the troops be pulled out. Waite concurred. The state militia left Cripple Creek on March 20.But when the strike persisted, the sheriffin collusion with mine ownersrecruited a force of 1,300 hooligans to become deputies and break the strike. Although the mine owners and union had reached an agreement ending the strike, the deputies remained in Cripple Creek. Governor Waite ordered the force of deputies disbanded, but the sheriff told Tarsney he was no longer able to control the private army he had created. On June 5, the deputies moved into the local town of Altman, cutting telegraph and telephone wires and imprisoning a number of reporters. Aware that the paramilitary force might get out of hand, Waite had already dispatched the state militia, under the command of General E.J. Brooks and Adjuntant General Tarsney, to Cripple Creek.The Colorado state troops arrived in the Cripple Creek region early on the morning of June 6, but more violence had already broken out. The sheriff began to argue with Brooks and Tarsney about what course of action to take. But when the deputies attempted to charge the miners, soldiers of the state militia quickly intercepted them and stopped their advance.The sheriffs force committed more violence in the town of Cripple Creek. But by nightfall, Brooks had seized the town and corralled all the deputies. After consulting with Tarsney, Gen. Brooks threatened to declare martial law and keep his troops in the region for another 30 days. Meeting with Tarsney, the mine owners capitulated and disbanded their private army. Gen. Brooks dispatched the deputies via rail to Colorado Springs, where they began dispersing on June 11.Tarsney became widely hated in Colorado for the role he played in protecting the miners union. On August 16, 1894, he was staying in the Alamo Hotel in Springs. A group of men kidnapped him and took him several miles north of the city.  They stripped him, tarred and feathered him, and left him to find his own way back to civilization.Published works by T.J. Tarsney* An Appeal to Reason: A Plea for Gold and SilverNot One, But Both... Durango, CO: Hutt & Casey, 1897.References* Biennial Report of the Adjutant General, Colorado, 1893-1894. Denver: Office of the Adjutant General, 1894.* Francis Carney. Denver Post. May 5, 1902.* Holbrook, Stewart. The Rocky Mountain Revolution. New York: Henry Holt and Company, 1956. * Rastall, Benjamin McKie. The labor history of the Cripple Creek district; a study in industrial evolution. Bulletin of the University of Wisconsin. No. 198. February 1908. Cornell Library Historical Monographs* Suggs, Jr., George G. Colorados War on Militant Unionism: James H. Peabody and the Western Federation of Miners. 2nd ed. Norman, OK: University of Oklahoma Press, 1991. ISBN 0-8061-2396-6
5913656
Maria_Clara_Lobregat
Roman CatholicismMara Clara Rafols Lorenzo Lobregat (April 26, 1921January 2, 2004) was a Filipina politician from City, where she served as its first woman mayor and also a representative to the Congress. Early lifeLobregat or  was born April 26, 1921 in Zamboanga City, the second of five children of Pablo Lorenzo, who was a mayor of City from 1939 until 1940, a representative to the first Assembly, and a delegate to the Philippine Constitutional Convention, and Luisa Rafols of City. Lobregat grew up in the cities of Zamboanga, Cebu, and Manila. She spoke Chavacano, Cebuano, English, Tagalog, and her native Spanish.Political lifeLobregat was present in Palace on October 12, 1936 when President L. Quezon created and established the chartered city of Zamboanga through the Philippine Commonwealth.Personal lifeHer son, L. Lobregat, became representative to the former lone district of Zamboanga City in 1998 and later the Mayor of City in 2004 until the present.CareerBefore 1971, Lobregat, mother of six, was president of the Coconut Producers Federation (COCOFED).Throughout her political career, Lobregat lost in only one election  in 1984 for the lone seat at the Batasang Pambansa. Allied with the Marcoses, she lost to Mayor Climaco who did not assume his post as assemblyman.With Marcos gone and the then opposition-turned-administration splitting into factions, Lobregat easily won as representative of the Lone District of City in the 1987 legislative elections and was reelected in 1992 and 1995. She ran and won the mayoralty in 1998, was reelected in 2001 and was set to file her certificate of candidacy for a third term on January 5 this year. Her son Celso, is had occupied the congressional seat she held from 1987 to 1998. Her nephew, Luis Lorenzo, Jr., is Agriculture Secretary.Lobregats net worth as of end of 2002, was P27.8 million, making her the richest Mindanao city mayor.In her Statement of Assets, Liabilities and Net Worth (SALN) as of end of 2002, Lobregat listed 18 companies where she has shareholdings and listed as number 19, other enterprises (resort and others) where she also has shareholdings.Lobregats business interests included banking, real estate, flower growing, mining, resort and resort development, recreation, petroleum, etc.Lobregat, always seen in public wearing kimona and patadyong, was among three female representatives who figured prominently in the protest actions against the creation of the Southern Philippines Council for Peace and Development (SPCPD) in 1996. She, along with then South Cotabato representatives Luwalhati Antonino and Daisy Fuentes, were referred to by the media as Tres Marias.Lobregat was a harsh critic of Moro National Liberation Front chair Nur Misuari, insisted that the controversial coconut levy funds were private funds; campaigned against the inclusion of her city in the Autonomous Region in Muslim Mindanao in the 1989 and 2001 plebiscite; ordered the Filipino deportees from Sabah in 2002 to be screened before entering her city, opposed the transfer of the regional seat from Zamboanga City to Pagadian City and was an avid supporter of the joint US-RP military exercise, Balikatan.Lobregat was educated at the Pilar College in Zamboanga City, Maryknoll and St. Scholastica in Manila and is the recipient of an  honoris causa -- Doctor of Humanities from the Ateneo de Davao University in 1979, Doctor in Business Administration from the Aquinas University in 1980, and Doctor in Educational Administration, Western Mindanao State University.DeathShe died of cardiac arrest at 11:30 p.m. January 2, 2004 at the Medical Center. Her remains were brought in the Zamboanga Metropolitan Cathedral. Her remains were finally rested at the Manila Memorial Park. She was succeeded by Vice-Mayor Basilio A. Fabian as Zamboanga City Mayor. Her son, Celso L. Lobregat was elected City Mayor in the 2004 local elections.Clara LobregatClara LobregatClara Lobregat
5924500
Churulia
Churulia () is a village under Jamuria block(Villages in Bardhaman District) station of Asansol subdivion in district of the state of Bengal, India.HistoryIt is the birthplace of Bengali poet Nazrul Islam, and the resting place of his wife Pramila Devi. Many of the manuscripts, medallions and other belongings of the poet are preserved at Nazrul Academy in the village. Nearby, there is a college bearing the poets name. A weeklong festival is held every year to celebrate the poets birth anniversary. It is attended by leading cultural and literary figures from both India and Bangladesh. Nazrul Academy was established in 1958.(The Statesman 8 February 2007) It is believed that there was a fort at Churulia in olden days. It fell to Sher Khan, the Afghan chieftain in the 16th century.(Chattopadhyay, Akkori, Bardhaman Jelar Itihas O Lok Sanskriti (History and Folk lore of Bardhaman District.),  , Vol I, p 181, Radical Impression. ISBN 81-85459-36-3) A mound in the village is believed to contain the ruins of the fort. During the Muslim rule a mosque was built at Churulia. It is a good example of Islamic architecture.(Chattopadhyay, Akkori, p 249)GeographyChurulia is located at .(Falling Rain Genomics, Inc - Churulia) It has an average elevation of 94 metres (311 feet).Churulia is located on the south bank of River, about 15 km from AsansolThe Asansol-Durgapur region is composed of undulating latterite region. This area lies between two mighty rivers  the Damodar and the Ajay. They flow almost parallel to each other in the region  the average distance between the two rivers is around 30 km. For ages the area was heavily forested and infested with plunderers and marauders. The discovery of coal led to industrialisation of the area and most of the forests have been cleared.(Chattopadhyay, Akkori, pp 14-15)EconomyChurulia is in the heart of coal mining territory,(Chattopadhyay, Akkori, p 48)TransportThere are two minibus routes serving Churulia  one from Churulia to Asansol via Kalla and Domahani, and other from Churulia (Ajay Ghat) to Chittaranjan via Asansol and Chandrachur.( Minbus Permit Register)External links*  Satellite viewReferences
5930745
Environment_Protection_and_Biodiversity_Conservation_Act_1999
The Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 (EPBC Act) is an Act of the of Australia that provides a framework for protection of the Australian environment, including its biodiversity and its natural and culturally significant places. Enacted on 17 July 2000, it established a range of processes to help protect and promote the recovery of threatened species and ecological communities, and preserve significant places from decline.The EPBC Act established the use of Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Regulations, which have provided for the issuing of approvals and permits for a range of activities on Commonwealth land and land affecting the Commonwealth. For example, commercial picking of wildflowers is regulated under the EPBC Act, and cannot be undertaken without an appropriate permit. Failure to comply with the Act can result in penalties including remediation of damage, court injunctions, and criminal and civil penalties.  The Act is administered by the Department of Sustainability, Environment, Water, Population and Communities.The Act identifies seven matters of national environmental significance:* World Heritage properties* National heritage places including overseas places of historic significance * Wetlands of international importance (Ramsar wetlands)* species and ecological communities* Migratory species* Commonwealth marine areas* Nuclear actions (including mining & building of waste repositories ())Lists of threatened species are drawn up under the act, for instance fauna of Australia, and these lists are the primary reference to threatened species in Australia.TreatiesAs an Act of the Commonwealth (federal) Parliament, it relies for its Constitutional validity upon the legislative powers of the Parliament granted by the Australian Constitution, which does not expressly refer to the environment. As such, key provisions of the EPBC Act are largely based on the following treaties:()*Heritage Convention - The Convention for the Protection of the World Cultural and Natural Heritage 1975;*the Convention - The Convention on Wetlands of International Importance especially as Waterfowl Habitat 1975;*The on Biological Diversity 1992;*JAMBA - Migratory Bird Agreement;*CAMBA - Migratory Bird Agreement;*Convention - Convention on the Conservation of Migratory Species of Wild Animals;*CITES - The Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora 1976.2007 reviewA review of the Act and actions taken under the act released by the National Audit Office (ANAO) in March 2007, the audit is entitled The Conservation and Protection of National Threatened Species and Ecological Communities. The audit widely criticised the Department of the Environment and Water Resources for inaction with respect to the EPBC; key findings of the audit include:*that the Department has failed to keep the list of threatened species sufficiently up to date and has failed to prepare recovery plans*that there are still inconsistencies between the federal and state and territory lists of threatened species*that due to partial or incorrect information there is a risk incorrect decisions regarding conservation may be made*that the department has been denied funds necessary to meet their obligations under the act by the Government on four occasions. The Hawke Report On 31 October 2008 the Minister for the Environment, Heritage and the Arts commissioned an independent review of the Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999 (EPBC Act), the Australian Governments central piece of environmental legislation. Section 522A of the EPBC Act requires it to be reviewed every 10 years from its commencement.(http://www.environment.gov.au/epbc/review/index.html) The review was undertaken by Dr Hawke.The aim of the report is to review the performance of the Act and, consistent with the objective of protecting the environment and biological diversity and maintain ecological processes, to recommend reforms that: *promote the sustainability of Australias economic development *reduce and simplify the regulatory burden *ensure activities under the Act represent the most efficient and *effective ways of achieving desired environmental outcomes *are based on an effective federal arrangement.(http://www.environment.gov.au/epbc/review/publications/final-report.html)The Final Report was delivered to the Minister on 30 October 2009 and publicly released on 21 December 2009.(http://www.environment.gov.au/epbc/review/index.html)  Related acts *Species Protection Act 1993*Wildlife Protection Act 1998*Heritage Trust of Australia Act 1997, which established the Heritage Trust, providing funding State acts *Species Protection Act 1995 (TSP Act), Tasmania*Conservation Act 1950, Australia *and Fauna Guarantee Act (1988) (FFG Act), Victoria*Parks and Wildlife Act 1972, Australia*Species Conservation Act 1995, South Wales (TSC Act)*Conservation Act 1980, Capital Territory *Conservation Act, Queensland *Parks and Wildlife Conservation Act 2000 (TPWCA), Territory*Assessment Act, TerritorySee also*fauna of Australia*Convention*and New Zealand Environment Conservation Council (ANZECC) (1991 to 2001)*Hotspots program*Heritage TrustNotesReferences**ANAO Audit Report No.31 200607. The Conservation and Protection of National Threatened Species and Ecological Communities*Audit slams slow Environment Department, The Age, March 29, 2007External links*EPBC Act list* The Act is available at http://www.austlii.edu.au/au/legis/cth/consol_act/epabca1999588/* The Hawke Report is available at: http://www.environment.gov.au/epbc/review/publications/final-report.htmlProtection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999
5941555
German_submarine_U-227
{|Ship notes{|Ship notes|}German submarine U-227 was a Type VIIC U-boat of the German Kriegsmarine built for service in the Battle of the Atlantic, which was cursed with repeated bad luck during her brief service life. Her commander was Kapitnleutnant Jrgen Kuntze, an officer with just five months U-boat experience at the time of his promotion.ConstructionU-227 was built during 1941 and 1942 by the Germaniawerft shipyards in the fleet base of Kiel, and was completed in August 1942, in preparation for operations over the coming winter. During the initial working-up period disaster struck one month into the program, when U-227 ran onto a Air Force mine dropped by aircraft into Danzig Bay. The crippled boat survived without any serious injuries, but only just managed to limp into port still afloat. The mining of coastal waters was a new tactic for the RAF, but one which would reap dividends amongst the port-based German Navy. The repairs on the boat following this disaster meant that she was not completed until the following April, when Kuntze, having worked his crew hard, embarked on his only war patrol.War patrolThe U-227 lasted a mere six days on her first operational patrol, when she was ordered to proceed with all haste for the North Ocean to interdict Canadian convoys. Passing in the large gap between the Islands and Iceland, U-227 was spotted despite bad weather by a Hampden bomber of No. 455 Squadron, Royal Australian Air Force, which swooped low onto the submarine and dropped a bomb right onto it. U-227 went into an uncontrolled dive following the attack and never resurfaced, presumably hitting the sea floor hundreds of feet below, where she still lies with all 49 of her crew.See also* of German U-boatsReferences* Sharpe, Peter, U-Boat Fact File, Midland Publishing, Great Britain: 1998. ISBN 1-85780-072-9.* U-boat.net webpage for U-227 
5949975
William_M._Berlin
William Markle Berlin (March 29, 1880  October 14, 1962) was a Democratic member of the House of  Representatives from Pennsylvania.William M. Berlin was born on a farm near Pennsylvania.  He graduated from Laird Institute at Pennsylvania, in 1896, and moved to Pennsylvania, in 1916.  He was engaged as an automobile distributor, in the wholesale oil and gas business, and in coal mining.  He was chairman of the Democratic County Committee in 1916.  Berlin was elected as a Democrat to the Seventy-third and Seventy-fourth Congresses.  He was an unsuccessful candidate for renomination in 1936.  After his time in Congress, he served as clerk of the court of County, Pennsylvania, from 1937 to 1941.  He resumed the mining of coal in Pennsylvania and Virginia in 1941.  He was a delegate to the Democratic National Convention in Chicago, and an unsuccessful candidate for the Republican congressional nomination in 1950.  He served as assistant librarian of the States House of Representatives from February 1, 1957, until 1961 when promoted to librarian, and served in that capacity until his death in Greensburg, Pennsylvania.Sources**The Political Graveyard
5967149
U.S._Route_52_in_West_Virginia
next_route53Route 52 skirts the western fringes of the state of Virginia. It runs from the Virginia state line near Bluefield, where it is concurrent with Interstate 77, in a general northwest and north direction to Interstate 64 at Kenova. There it turns east, overlapping Interstate 64 for five miles (8 km) before splitting off onto the West Huntington Expressway into Ohio via the Huntington Bridge. Despite having an even number, US 52 is signed north&ndash;south in West Virginia.Most of the route is being upgraded to a high-speed four-lane highway, however, not to standards. It has been designated as part of the 73 and 74 corridors. From Interstate 77 south of Bluefield to near Williamson, the new highway has been referenced to as the King Coal Highway; from Williamson north to Kenova, it is the Tolsia Highway.West Huntington ExpresswayThe West Huntington Expressway is a controlled access elevated highway that crosses the west end of Huntington WV.  It was constructed in 1965 and originally signed as Virginia Route 94. The first segment to open was a stub from 64 to Jefferson Avenue in West Huntington in the fall of 1965. This included a bridge over a CSX railroad mainline. In the early 1970s, the expressway was extended northward across what is now the Joe Rahall II Bridge across the River to Highway 52/State Route 7 in Ohio.Tolls were collected at the River bridge until the mid 1980s. The expressway has four lanes from 64 to the Highway 60 interchange, where it drops to two lanes for the remainder of the highway, which includes the River bridge. The expressway was renumbered U.S. Route 52 in 1979 when that federal highway was re-routed out of downtown Huntington to a new alignment on I-64 west to the Tolsia Highway south of Kenova.Tolsia HighwayThe Tolsia Highway is defined as running from 64 at Kenova to G (119) north of Williamson.(Mitchem, Mike, and David B. Akers. King Coal Highway, I-73/74 Authority. Gilbert: West Virginia Department of Highways, n.d.) Portions of the  highway have been completed.In 1998, US 52 south of the 64 interchange in Kenova was upgraded to four-lane highway standards to the Tri-State Airport Access Road. In 2001, the four-lane highway was extended southward approximately two miles to a stub interchange with Virginia Route 75, removing a steep downgrade with a large sweeping curve.Also in 1998, the Prichard, West Virginia bypass was opened to traffic with one interchange and one at-grade intersection. This four-mile (6 km) bypass includes very large rock cuts and a long and winding grade down a hill. In 2001, the four-lane highway was extended northward for one mile (1.6 km), removing some grades and curves along US 52. The extension was completed in 2002 at a cost of $9,613,889.26. New signage was installed in late 2002 to replace orange construction signs that date to the construction of the bypass.Before the eastern bypass was built, US 52 inside Prichard involved two alignments. U.S. 52 originally took the path of Virginia Route 152, approximately  east of the current alignment. In the mid 1960s, state funding was secured to upgrade most of county route 1, which ran along the Big Sandy River and Fork River. The upgraded county route 1 was renumbered as US 52 in 1979. A western bypass of Prichard was constructed in the mid 1970s and partially abandoned in 1999, when the new four-lane alignment east of the community was constructed.In 2001, the Crum segment of the Tolsia Highway opened to traffic. The highway begins just north of Crum, touching down at an incomplete diamond interchange with US 52 and heads eastward towards county route 2. It has at-grade intersections with county route 52-47 and county route 52-31 along with a side road at the eastern terminus that takes traffic to county route 2. There are stubs for future bridges and ramps. Signage along this segment is minimal, with only a handful of arrows to designate the route. While the highway was built to four-lane standards, it is only striped for two.In late 2002, Senator C. Byrd received $20 million in funds to jump-start construction on the northern half of the King Coal Highway. The money would be used to speed up construction on the  link between Huntington and Prichard, serving several industrial parks and relieving two-lane US 52 of coal-truck congestion.In 2003, survey and design of five miles (8 km) of four-lane US 52 upgrades from Prichard north to Cyrus were completed. This includes an interchange and five bridge structures. Estimated cost of construction is $90 million.Total design work for 2003-2004 on the Tolsia Highway totals over . Future projects The unfunded six-year transportation plans, released by the West Virginia Department of Transportation in 2005, has listed the Tolsia Highway as under several contracts.() The six-year priority plans also list several Tolsia Highway projects with funding estimates and details.(Sheet1. West Virginia Department of Transportation. 1 Nov. 2006)* Upgrade US 52 to four-lanes from the WV 75 incomplete-diamond interchange south of Kenova to Sharps Branch Road in Cyrus. This  upgrade would cost $57 million. It is listed as 36th in priority.* Upgrade the Tolsia Highway to four-lanes from Sharps Branch Road in Cyrus to Prichard. This  upgrade would cost $83.8 million and is 39th in priority.* Widen the Hubbardstown to Tabors Creek Road segment of US 52, with preliminary engineering and right-of-way beginning in 2008, with construction starting in 2009. The  four-lane highway would cost $43.75 million and is ranked 58th in priority.* Upgrade the Tolsia Highway from Tabors Creek Road to Fort Gay on a new  alignment at a cost of $36 million. It is ranked 52nd.* The Fort Gay to Saltpetre Road at Saltpetre segment of US 52, with preliminary engineering beginning in 2008, is slated for construction to begin in 2010. This  four-lane upgrade would cost $22.7 million. It is ranked 51st.* Upgrade the Saltpetre Road at Saltpetre to Glenhayes along a new  alignment at a cost of $37.1 million. It is ranked 60th.* Complete the Tolsia Highway from Glenhayes to Drag Creek two miles (3 km) north of WV 152 along a new  alignment. This is estimated to cost $62.4 million and is ranked 64th.* Upgrade the Drag Creek to Crum at Jennie Creek Road alignment along US 52. The  segment would cost $57.4 million and is ranked 65th.* Upgrade the Crum segment at Jennie Creek Road to Stepptown along a new  alignment at a cost of $51.3 million. It is ranked 56th in priority.* Construct the Kermit bypass from Stepptown to Lower Burning Creek along a new  alignment. The estimated cost is $58.3 million, with construction phases ranging from 2006 to 2007. It is ranked 68th.* Construct the Kermit to Parsley Branch segment, with preliminary engineering set to begin in 2010 with right-of-way acquision beginning in 2011. It is a  upgrade with an estimated cost of $65 million. It is ranked 77th.* Upgrade the Tolsia Highway from Parsley Branch to Naugatuck along a new  alignment at a cost of $65 million. It is ranked 74th. This would involve a WV 65 interchange.* Upgrade US 52 from Naugatuck to Miller Creek along a new  four-lane alignment at an estimated cost of $53.9 million. It is ranked 83rd. This completes the Tolsia Highway to G.Williamson BypassU.S. 52 enters Kentucky twice along the West Virginia bypass, preventing the blasting of several hillsides in Virginia. It was completed in 1996 as part of the G (Route 119) project. The speed limit in West Virginia is  but abruptly drops to  in Kentucky.The Tolsia Highway is expected to meet the King Coal Highway at Virginia Route 65 and Corridor G (US 119).Delbarton ConnectorThe Delbarton Connector is part of the King Coal Highway, and will act as a four-lane expressway connecting US 119/US 52/G north of Williamson to the King Coal at Delbarton.( Right-of-way acquision will commence in 2007, with construction beginning in 2008.( It is also referred to as the Williamson Connector.King Coal HighwayThe King Coal Highway is defined to run from Virginia Route 65 and G (119) near Belo, West Virginia to 77 at its US 52 interchange near Bluefield.(King Coal Highway. West Virginia. Department of Transportation. Executive Summary. N.p.: West Virginia Department of Transportation, n.d.) Interstate 66, Expressway (121) and the Shawnee Expressway will connect to the King Coal Highway.The travel time, currently over 120 minutes from Williamson to Bluefield, will be reduced to 87 minutes.( South of Ikes Fork, a two hour trip to Bluefield will be reduced to 44 minutes.Interchanges and intersections proposed for the King Coal Highway include:(* Mingo County: ** Near Head of Isaban** Near Taylorville, West Virginia** Near Twisted Gun Gap, West Virginia** Near Delbarton** Near Sharon Heights* Logan County:** Horsepen Mountain at Mountain View* McDowell County:** Johnny Cake Mountain** Sandy Huff** Davy** Welch at Indian Ridge** Carswell Hollow near Kimball** Burke Mountain near Keystone** Near Crumpler** Near the head of Long Pole** Near the head of Isaban* Wyoming County:** Indian Ridge near Steeles** Near Fanrock and Bailysville at Davy Mountain on Indian Ridge** Near Head of North Springs** Head of Burke Mountain near Herndon* Mercer County:** Near Crystal** Near McComas** Near Sandlick** Virginia Route 20 near Littlesburgh Road** Near Rock** Near Godfrey** Virginia Route 123 - Airport Road** John Nash BoulevardImage:King Coal Highway and Coalfields Expressway volleyball interchange Construction..jpg|right|300px|thumb|A former strip mining site being converted for the Coal Highway and Expressway diamond interchange. Taken in 2004, construction is not expected on the actual interchange itself for years. Construction began in 1999 on the diamond interchange on Indian Ridge near Welch that will facilitate traffic between the King Coal Highway (US 52, 73/74) and the Expressway (121). Initial site work was completed in 2003, with grading evident; this required the filling in of a large valley. It will also be the site of a new state prison along with future industrial development.Work has progressed on the four-lane upgrading of US 52 in Mercer County just east of Bluefield. On November 24, a contract totalling $2,057,914 was let to move approximately  of dirt and to grade and drain .22 miles from the recently completed $27 million interchange with Q (460) east of Bluefield to 19 just north of James P. Bailey Lake. Six buildings will be demolished. This is the first of several projects that will extend the King Coal Highway to Virginia Route 123 (Airport Road) north of Bluefield. Extending this project east, another contract was awarded December 15 and totals $1,371,251. The contract calls for more than  of excavation to grade and drain .18 mile of the King Coal Highway from county route 25 just north of the 460 interchange to south of the old Turnpike. 36 buildings will be demolished. A future contract will include a bridge over 19 which will cost $15 million.(DOH Awards King Coal Highway Contract. 18 December 2003. West Virginia Department of Transportation. 24 December 2003 http://www.wvkingcoal.com/press/121803.html.)(Contract Allows More King Coal Highway Construction. 20 December 2003. Bluefield Daily Telegram. 24 December 2003 http://www.zwire.com/site/news.cfm?newsid10691556&BRD2088&PAG461&dept_id387653&rfi8.)Work is set to begin on a  stretch of roadway in Raleigh county at a cost of $12.2 million. This includes paving, guardrail installation, pavement marking, and signing operations for this segment.Design work is being commenced on a  segment of the King Coal Highway from Horsepen Mountain to Isaban and from the Mercer County Interchange to Virginia Route 123/Airport Road. The work being done on a  section of highway near Horsepen Mountain is being done by mining companies that will save taxpayers over $20 million.The total cost for both the Tolsia and King Coal Highways will be over $2 billion. References 
5976463
Pararealgar
Pararealgar is an arsenic mineral with the chemical formula As4S4( also represented as AsS.( It forms gradually from realgar under exposure to light.  Its name derives from the fact that its elemental composition is identical to realgar, As4S4. It is soft with a hardness of 1 - 1.5, is yellow orange in colour, and its monoclinic prismatic crystals are very brittle, easily crumbling to powder.It is one of the sulfides of arsenic and is one of two isomers of As4S4. It forms upon exposure of the symmetrical isomer to light.  Its name derives from the fact that its elemental composition is identical to realgar, As4S4.Structure220px|thumb|left|The two isomers of As4S4.Both isomers of As4S4 are molecular, in contrast to the other main sulfide of arsenic, orpiment (As2S3), which is polymeric.  In pararealgar, there are kinds of As centres (and three kinds of S centres).  The molecule has Cs symmetry.  In realgar, the four As (and four S) centres are equivalent and the molecule has D2d symmetry.(Paola Bonazzi, Silvio Menchetti, Giovanni Pratesi The crystal structure of pararealgar, As4S4 American Mineralogist, 1995, vol.80  400.) An analogous pair of isomers is also recognized for the corresponding sulfides P4S4.()OccurrencePararealgar occurs as an alteration product of realgar in stibnite-bearing quartz veins typically as a result of exposure to light. It occurs associated with realgar, stibnite, tetrahedrite, arsenopyrite, duranusite, native arsenic, arsenolite, sulfur, lepidocrocite and pyrite.(It was first described in 1980 for an occurrence in the Grey Rock Mine, Truax Creek, Bridge River area, Lillooet Mining Division, Columbia, Canada.( It has since been reported from a variety of locations worldwide.References(it:Pararealgar
5984632
San_Pedro_Pochutla
footnotes                San Pedro Pochutla is a city and municipality located in the south of Oaxaca state, Mexico next to the Pacific Ocean.It is an important commercial, transportation and administrative hub for the Pochutla District in the east of the Costa Region.()()  Pochutla is located at the junction of coastal Highway 200 and Highway 175 to Oaxaca, with 175 functioning as the towns main thoroughfare.() Its name means place of kapok trees (Ceiba pentandra)()  and most of the city is built on a lakebed which was drained during the colonial period.()  The municipality is best known as being the home of the oceanside communities of ngel and Zipolite.(HistoryThe Pochutla area was settled by Zapotec tribes from Amatln, Miahuatln and Cuatlan in the 8th century.  The settlement now known as Pochutla was founded around the same time as nearby Loxicha, Cozoaltepec and others. The area was part of the dominion of Tututepec.(At the time of the Spanish conquest, the Spanish town of Pochutla was founded by Pedro Molina, Isidro Salinas, Julio Diaz and others, initially with the name of Huehuetan. The locals were converted to Christianity and the first church was founded just south of the modern town and called San Pedro Huehuetn Laguna. Much of the modern city is built on what was a lakebed. Because of illnesses such as malaria and fever, this lake was drained. Later in the colonial period, the name was changed to Pochutla due to the number of kapok trees in the area.(According to tradition and archeological evidence located in the hills of Viga, Espino and El Cometa, there were arms hidden here by pirates, who were called Pichilinges.(In 1833, Conservative rebels led by General Canalizo fled through here as they were pursued by government troops. Their last battle was at the nearby Soledad Ranch in which they were destroyed by federal forces, forcing the remaining soldiers to scatter.(Conservative rebels continued to be active in this region until the 1860s with Jos Eustaquio Manzano and Apolonio Manzano leading the rebel cause, reinvigorated due to the passage of the Reform Laws. In 1858 and 1859, federal forces were dispatched here to subdue the rebels who had taken to guerrilla warfare. The last battle between the Manzano brothers and federal troops took place in 1860, with the brothers captured and taken to the state capital in 1861.(The municipality has a petroleum reserve called Aragn, five km from the community of Puerto Angel. The deposit was going to be exploited by an English company, who brought over equipment in 1937, but expropriation of oil in 1938 by President Crdenas brought this to a halt. It has yet to be tapped.(Until late in the 20th century, much of the population of the area lived on subsistence farming, with the only work available during the harvest season on the coffee plantations. In the 1970, the state government expropriated most of the coastal land from Zipolite to Zapotengo and made it ejido or communal land with the aim of development.(During the 2006 teachers strike in the state of Oaxaca, groups supporting and opposing the strike clashed here on the main road, Highway 175. The highway was blocked by those supporting the strike to prevent those opposing it from realizing their March for Education.  The highway was blocked with busses and cars preventing those bound for the state capital from leaving.() Other recent strikes include those by taxi drivers and others in transportation who have blocked roads resulting in monetary losses for the municipality. The dispute centered on concessions for passenger transportation between Pochutla and beach communities such as Zipolite. Actions by strikers have included the blockage of roads including coastal Highway 200.()()The cityThe city is the commercial, transportation and administrative center for the area. It contains banks, supermarkets and specialty stores that serve the coastal and isolated mountain communities of the Madre de Oaxaca which generally lack these things.((( The city is on the crossroads of Highway 175, which connects Oaxaca city with Puerto Angel and coastal Highway 200 that connects communities such as Puerto Angel, Puerto Escondido, Oaxaca, Huatulco and Salina Cruz.(()  It is a transportation hub filled with buses, taxis and dust. Taxis called colectivos (collectives) go to the areas beaches as well as pickup trucks fitted to carry passengers. There are two bus stations with first and second class busses to Oaxaca city, City and Huatulco.() It is not a tourist attraction but it serves tourists as a place for banking services and supplies not available in the beach communities as well as a transfer point for buses.(In the evening, the main road through town has a variety of street food.( The parish church was begun in 1840 but was not finished until 1957. The municipal palace was built in 1873.(  The center, especially the main plaza and the municipal palace, has recently been renovated and a new amphitheatre has been built to host cultural and sporting events.( The patron saints day is 29 June in which people celebrate with masks, and fireworks, some set in frames called castles.(Pochutla gained the title of city in March 2003.(It is the seat of the Pochutla District, and is also the head of the Parish of Pochutla which oversees 39 other communities.(The municipalityAs municipal seat, the city of San Pedro Pochutla is the governing authority over 238 other named communities,()  with a total area of 421km2.( This municipality has a total population of 38,798 of with 12,117 live in the city proper.(  The most important communities other than the seat include Puerto Angel and Zipolite, both of which are oceanside communities. Zipolite is a popular tourist attraction and Puerto Angel was a coffee export port whose economy now is based on tourism and fishing. Other beaches include La Mina, where waves crash noisily against rocks and Zapotengo with has miles of coconut groves next to the sand. There is also a fresh water spring in San Jos Chacalapa.(( The municipality borders Candelaria Loxicha, Pluma Hidalgo, Santa Mara Huatulco, Cozoaltepec and Santo Domingo with the Pacific Ocean to the south.(The climate here is hot and humid due to its proximity to the ocean with a rainy season in the summer.(( Average temperatures vary between 30 and 38C. The south of the municipality is oceanfront and the north is formed by mountains of the Sierra Madre de Oaxaca.( Various rivers pass through here on their way to the Pacific Ocean even more arroyos filling during the summer rainy season. Most of the rain falls in the mountains areas of the municipality rather than on the coast. Principal elevations include Vigia and Espino from which the main river flows. Despite the drainage of the principle lake, malaria is still a concern here.( Vegetation is of the tropical and sub-tropical types and include a number of valuable tropical wood trees such as huanacastle, mahogany, cedar and coulteri, which are primarily used to make furniture.  Common wildlife includes iguanas, deer, wild boar, armadillos, rabbits, raccoons and numerous birds native to the area.( Coastal species include black coral, turtles sea bass, sharks and crabs, with bass, mojarra and shrimp found in the rivers.(The principle cultivated crop here is coffee, which provides most of the employment of the rural population. This is raised in the mountain areas. Second is the raising of coconuts and products based on it such as coconut oil.  Another important crop is mangos.( Other crops grown include corn, sesame seed, peanuts, limes, plums, bananas, watermelons and other melons.( About 50% of the total population is dedicated to commerce, especially that related to tourism. About 22% is dedicated to mining, petroleum, and industry.( A number of traditions are maintained, mostly in the rural areas. In rural communities, various dialects of the language are still spoken.( Crafts include figures carved from coconuts, in the regional penitentiary are made necklaces and figures from black coral, wood and other materials. Traditional dress until recently consisted of loose fitting white pants and shirts made of lightweight canvas but this has mostly given way to modern clothing especially in the city. However, older women can still be seen in canvas blouses, rebozos, sandals and wearing long braids. Local specialties include iguana tamales and venison in yellow or red mole.( Traditional music includes songs called sones  and chilenas. Local sones include titles such as El Perro, El Arriero, El Borracho, El Zopilote, El Toro and El Panadero. Dance garb for women includes long, wide skirts and blouses in various bright colors adorned with ribbons and with the blouses embroidered with flowers. Accessories include rebozos, sandals and palm-leaf hats. The men wear white pants and shirts with sandals and palm-leaf hats. Most of the dances have themes relating to flirting and falling in love.( )  A dance called the Kirio is performed at weddings.(In Puerto Angel, the del Mar (University of the Sea) was founded in 1991 by Heladio Ramirez Lopez, governor of the state of Oaxaca.() ReferencesPedro PochutlaPedro Pochutla (komunumo)Pedro Pochutlaru:--
5992813
Mountaintop_mining
#REDIRECT removal mining
5999252
Nathan_Leroy_Strong
For the Welsh rugby player see Strong (rugby)Nathan Leroy Strong (November 12, 1859  December 14, 1939) was a Republican member of the House of Representatives from Pennsylvania.Nathan L. Strong was born in Troy (now Summerville), County, Pennsylvania.  He worked as a telegraph operator and railroad agent from 1877 to 1894.  He studied law, was admitted to the bar in 1891 and commenced practice in Pennsylvania, in 1893.  He served as district attorney of Jefferson County from 1895 to 1900.  He was engaged in the development of mineral lands in Jefferson and Armstrong Counties from 1901 to 1916, and served a president of the Mining Company.  He was also engaged in banking.Strong was elected as a Republican to the Sixty-fifth and to the eight succeeding Congresses.  He was an unsuccessful candidate for reelection in 1934.  After he left Congress, he resumed his former business activities, and died in Brookville.  Interment in Brookville Cemetery. Sources**The Political Graveyard
6007567
Robert_Gayre
George Robert Gayre of Gayre and Nigg (6 August 1907(St. Martins Press Staff (2001). Who Was Who 1996-2000 Volume X: A Companion to WHOS WHO -- Containing the Biographies of Those Who Died During the Period 1996-2000. Palgrave Macmillan, ISBN 9780312293666. Some sources give 1905 as birth year.)  February 10, 1996) was a Scottish anthropologist who founded Quarterly. An expert on heraldry, he also founded The Armorial, and produced many books on this subject.(Billig, Michael. Gayre, George Robert (19071996). Oxford Dictionary of National Biography. first published Sept 2004, 680 words)Education and military serviceBorn in Dublin and an Anglican, he earned an MA from of Edinburgh, then studied at College, Oxford.Gayre served with the British Expeditionary Force in France in 1939, as a Lieutenant-Colonel in the Artillery(Mankind Quarterly: The editors.) afterwards becoming Educational Adviser to the Allied Military Government of Italy, based in Palermo, where he fought for the exclusion of left-wing text-books and communist influence from the Italian education system. He was thereafter Director of Education to the Allied Control Commission for Italy, based in Naples; and Chief of Education and Religious Affairs, German Planning Unit, Headquarters Allied Expeditionary Force.(Gayre of Gayre & Nigg, Robert, A Case for Monarchy, Edinburgh, 1962: vii - ix) After the war he spent a considerable amount of time in India where he was instrumental in the establishment of the Italo-Indian Institute.(Gayre of Gayre & Nigg, Robert, A Case for Monarchy, Edinburgh, 1962: x)HeraldryBoth Gayre and Sir Innes of Learney were authors of books on heraldry. As Chief of Gayre, Gayre appended of Gayre and Nigg becoming Grand Almoner, and Hereditary Commander of Lochore, of the of St. Lazarus of Jerusalem.(Gayre of Gayre & Nigg, Robert, with Dunn, John, The Armorial Who is Who, 5th edition, Edinburgh, 1978:135)His 1959 book Heraldic Standards and Other Ensigns: Their development and history is considered an important work on the subject, and he contributed on the topic to Britannica.Mankind Quarterly and publications on raceGayre was editor of Mankind Quarterly from 1960 to 1978, and was honorary editor-in-chief thereafter.(Gayre, Robert, summary and photo of him on: Race and Nazi Racism and the Latters Impact on Anthropology. The Mankind Quarterly, Vol. XVIII, No. 4, (AprilJune 1978), pp. 293-303.)In 1968 he testified on behalf of members of the Preservation Society who were charged under the Relations Act for publishing racialist material. They prevailed in their defence. In his evidence to the court Gayre described blacks as being feckless and he maintained that scientific evidence showed that blacks prefer their leisure to the dynamism which the white and yellow races show.(Billig, Michael (1979). Mankind Quarterly: The editors. in Psychology, Racism & Fascism: A Searchlight Pamphlet. Birmingham: A.F. & R. Publications.)Publications on ancient ZimbabweGayre wrote a few articles()() and a book() proposing a Semitic origin for the Ancient Zimbabwean Civilization. Thus, he suggested that the Shona artefacts which were found at Zimbabwe and in numerous other stone ruins nearby, were placed there only after they conquered the country and drove out or absorbed the previous inhabitants; he added that the ones who remained would probably have passed some of their skills and knowledge to the invaders.Gayres theory is supported by the existence of a community in the north of South Africa  the Lemba  which, in the 19th and early 20th centuries, boasted talents shared with the people of Ancient Zimbabwe  namely, an aptitude for building in stone and for mining and metalwork.() Because of those skills, the Lemba were highly regarded by surrounding tribes.Gayre mentions the Lemba oral tradition that their male ancestors came by boat (from a country to the north which contained large cities) in order to obtain gold. He also draws attention to the numerous Semitic features and customs displayed by the Lemba.Thus, Gayre maintains that the Lemba are descended  through their male line  from the creators of the original Zimbabwean civilization.As evidence of links between the Lemba and Zimbabwe, Gayre( cites the following facts:(i) Models of circumcised male organs were found in some of the ancient ruins; (that is significant because surrounding tribes regarded the Lemba as the masters and originators of the art of circumcision);(ii) The Lemba bury their dead in an extended rather than a crouched position  i.e., in the same style as in certain Zimbabwean graves, where gold jewellery confirmed their association with the ancient civilization;(iii) The old Lemba language was a dialect of Karanga  which is spoken today in the Masvingo area of Zimbabwe; (thus, the Lemba female ancestry must have contained a large MaKaranga element).According to Gayre, the enormous area of agricultural terracing and irrigation channels in the northeast of Zimbabwe was a product of the same ancient civilization  as too were the hundreds of ancient gold mines in the territory.However, modern-day archaeologists disagree with Gayres interpretation and conclusions: they maintain that Zimbabwe was constructed by ancestors of the Shona.()()()(Beach, D. N. (1994). A Zimbabwean past: Shona dynastic histories and oral traditions.)(Ndoro, W.,  and  Pwiti, G. (1997).  Marketing the past:  The  Shona  The  Shona village  at Great  Zimbabwe.  Conservation  and Management  of Archaeological Sites 2(3): 3-8.)()Selected bibliography*Teuton and Slav on the Polish Frontier: : A diagnosis of the racial basis of the Germano-Polish borderlands, with suggestions for the settlement of German and Slav claims. Eyre and Spottiswoode (1944) ASIN: B0007J1KXK*Italy in Transition: Extracts from the private journal of G.R. Gayre. Faber and Faber Ltd (1946) ASIN: B0006DB91U*Gayres Booke: Being a History of the Family of Gayre. Phillimore (1948) ASIN: B00069X8L8*Wassail! In Mazers of Mead: An Account of Mead, Metheglin, Sack and Other Ancient Liquors, and of the mazer cups out of which they were drunk, with some ... upon the drinking customs of our forebears. Phillimore (1948) ASIN: B0007IYD4O*Heraldic Standards and Other Ensigns: Their development and history. Oliver and Boyd (1959) ASIN: B0007IV3L0*The Nature of Arms: An Exposition of the Meaning and Significance of Heraldry with Special... 1961, Oliver and Boyd*The Nature of Arms: An Exposition of the Meaning and Significance of Heraldry with Special... 1961, Oliver and Boyd*Heraldic cadency;: The development of differencing of coats of arms for kinsmen and other purposes. Foreword by the Duke of Salandra and Serracapriola. Faber and Faber (1961) ASIN: B0007IUYCE*The House of Gayre and an account of Minard castle. The Armorial (1960) ASIN: B0007KCG46*The Bantu homelands of the northern Transvaal Duquesne University Press (1962) ASIN: B0007ETDFW*More Ethnological elements of Africa. Armorial (1972) ASIN: B0007AILLS*The knightly twilight, Lochore Enterprises Valletta 1973ReferencesExternal links*The Mankind Quarterly
6017841
Starchaser:_The_Legend_of_Orin
gross        US$3,360,800(Starchaser: The Legend of Orin is a 1985 animated movie. It was written by animation writer Scott and was originally released in 3-D by Releasing. Starchaser was one of the first animated movies to mix traditional and computer animation. It is the only 3-D film distributed by Releasing. De Longis played the evil Lord Zygon.PlotThe film is set millenia in the future. On a distant planet named Trinia, human slaves have lived underground for many years and mine for crystals (which are used as starship fuel) for a god named Zygon and his robot minions. During another day of mining, Orin, the hero of the film, finds a jeweled sword embedded in the rocks. One of the slaves, the grandfather of Orins girlfriend Elan, recognizes the sword and sacrifices his life in order to keep the sword a secret. When Orin later takes the sword into his hands, it ascends into the air and buries itself in the caverns floor. A projection of an old man appears from the blade, saying that above the caverns is a magnificent universe that the people may find. The blade then disappears, leaving only the hilt.Forced to leave Orins younger, blinded brother Calli behind, Orin and Elan embark to discover the said universe and find the blade to the sword. They eventually emerge from the mines inside a military base, where they meet Zygon, who reveals that he is not a god, but actually hides the face of a human man under his mask. Zygon kills Elan, but Orin escapes this fate when the sword hilt distracts Zygon. When Zygons robots fire on him, they strike a crystal deposit, and in the resultant explosion Orin is hidden from Zygon and presumed dead. Thereafter, Orin digs a tunnel to the surface of Trinia, where he is later captured by Man-Droids, a group of decaying half-organic, half-robotic beings who intend to tear him apart and use his body parts to replace their own. Unexpectedly, his swords hilt produces what is apparently an invisible blade, killing two of the Man-Droids and helping Orin escape. Orin subsequently runs into a human smuggler named Dagg Dibrimi, who takes Orin (whom he dubs Water Snake for his outrageous tale about human slaves in the mines) along on his journey to smuggle crystals. Eventually, Dagg seizes a load of crystals from a hovering freighter, but is driven away by Zygon and his robotic guards. During the fight, Dagg seizes a Fembot and uses it as a shield from laser blasts. Subsequently re-programmed by Dagg, this Fembot, named Silica, becomes attached to him. During that time, a mysterious Starfly appears and bonds with Orin.Dagg flies the Starchaser to a city called Toga-Togo on the planet Bordogon, where he abandons Orin and gives Silica to a slave auctioneer. Orin wanders through the city, trying to find a clue that will lead him to the location of the hilts blade. Just then, Orin meets a fortune-teller, who tells him to visit a place called Novaluna. Later, Orin sees Silica offered for sale, whereupon he offers high prices to buy her. When the auctioneer finds that Orin has no knowledge of local currency, he takes Orins freedom in addition to Silicas; but Dagg, moved by his own conscience, frees them. Later, Dagg and Orin visit the home of two desert-dwelling merchants, to whom Dagg sells the stolen crystals. Because Zygon has placed a price on Orins head, the merchants offer to buy Orin as well, but Dagg refuses. In response, the merchants place a bomb in Daggs payment. Orin is forewarned by the Starfly, whereupon Dagg and Arthur throw the money and bomb into their enemies camp. Thereafter Dagg agrees to take Orin to Novaluna, but they are shot down by Zygons robotic soldiers. Dagg is captured and the ship is rendered inactive; Orin is thrown clear of the ship but is rescued by Aviana, the daughter of Bordogons Governor.Upon having woken and met Aviana, Orin tells her his story, whereupon Avianas computer reveals that the hilt has historically been used by a group of legendary guardians called the Ka-Khan to vanquish threats to humanity. Among these threats was a tyrant called Nexus, after whose defeat the hilt vanished until Orins discovery of it. Aviana takes Orin to Trinia, where he again faces Zygon. Orin attempts to kill Zygon for Elans death and thereby exposes him as a robot. Zygon then reveals that he is Nexus, seeking again to rule over humanity with his army of robots. Zygon takes Orins hilt and begins to co-ordinate the attack, while Orin and Aviana are imprisoned in the cell block wherein Dagg is also captive. Just as Orin and Aviana confess their feelings toward one another, Aviana is taken aboard Zygons flagship as a hostage. Orin is again approached by the Starfly, who brings him the hilt, which he uses to free himself and Dagg. They enter Zygons flagship and take control of it, using it (again aided by the Starfly) to destroy the enemy fleet. They are rejoined by Silica, who has restored the Starchaser.Orin and his friends penetrate Zygons base, but are attacked by his remaining troops. While Dagg and Silica stay behind to fight off their pursuers, Orin enters his original cavern home and begins to denounce Zygon, but is interrupted by Zygon himself. They fight, resulting in Orin dangling over a chasm while Zygon gloats over him. As Orin hangs over the chasm, three Starflies appear and merge into one; but instead of giving him the hilt at his request, it states that he has no need of the hilt, adding that there never was a blade. Orin therefore realizes that the power to create a cutting force came from himself. At this, he pulls himself up, generates such a force, and uses it to kill Zygon. Orins people subsequently rise in revolt and win their freedom. Above, Silica mistakenly causes the accumulated crystals to explode, triggering a chain reaction which threatens to collapse the caverns. Orin then uses the hilt to open a fissure by which his people ascend to Trinias surface, where Orin uses his new-found power to heal Calli of his blindness. Dagg, Silica, and Aviana join Orin and his people there. Moments later, several Starflies reveal themselves to be the spirits of the past Ka-Khan, including the elder man of the hilts projection. They invite Orin to join them; but he refuses for the time being in favor of living with his friends. Thereafter the other Ka-Khan leave him to merge with the stars.Cast*Colligan - Orin*Argenziano - Dagg*De Longis - Zygon / Nexus*North - Elan / Aviana *Tremayne - Arthur*Bartley - Kallie *Caravelli - Silica*Romanus - Aunt Bella*Moschitta Jr. - ZGorkProductionProduced in 1984, Starchaser: The Legend of Orin was the worlds first animated project to be made in the 3D format.()Releasethumb|120px|left|Patrons attending the film during its initial release were given this promotional pin.The film was released in the United States by Releasing on November 22, 1985.(  Spending at least 17 days in theaters, it made US$1,614,660 on its opening weekend and US$3,360,800 overall.(  The film did not fare well in South Korea, where animation production took place.(Starchaser was released on VHS and Laserdisc in 1986 by Pictures, and also by KVC Home Video.  The DVD was released on June 21, 2005 by MGM.ReceptionThe New York Times described it as such a brazen rip-off of George Lucass Star Wars that you might think lawyers would have been called in.()ReferencesExternal links**Starchaser screenplay:   
6026708
Noisy_text_analytics
Noisy text analytics is a process of extraction whose goal is to automatically extract structured or semistructured information from noisy unstructured text data. While analytics is a growing and mature field that has great value because of the huge amounts of data being produced, processing of noisy text is gaining in importance because a lot of common applications produce noisy text data. Noisy unstructured text data is found in informal settings such as chat, text messages, e-mails, boards, newsgroups, blogs, wikis and pages. Also, text produced by processing spontaneous speech using speech recognition and printed or handwritten text using character recognition contains processing noise. Text produced under such circumstances is typically highly noisy containing spelling errors, abbreviations, non-standard words, false starts, repetitions, missing punctuations, missing case information, pause filling words such as um and uh and other texting and disfluencies. Such text can be seen in large amounts in contact centers, rooms, character recognition (OCR) of text documents, message service (SMS) text, etc. Documents with language can also be considered noisy with respect to todays knowledge about the language. Such text contains important historical, religious, ancient medical knowledge that is useful. The nature of the noisy text produced in all these contexts warrants moving beyond traditional text analysis techniques. Techniques for noisy text analysis Missing punctuation and the use of non-standard words can often hinder standard language processing tools such as taggingand parsing. Techniques to both learn from the noisy data and then to be able to process the noisy data are only now being developed.  Possible source of noisy text * wide web: Poorly written text is found in web pages, chat, blogs, wikis, forums, newsgroups. Most of these data are unstructured and the style of writing is very different from, say, well-written news articles. Analysis for the web data is important because they are sources for market buzz analysis, market review, estimation, etc. Also, because of the large amount of data, it is necessary to find efficient methods of extraction, classification, summarization and analysis of these data.* Contact centers: This is a general term for help desks, information lines and customer service centers operating in domains ranging from computer sales and support to mobile phones to apparels. On an average a person in the developed world interacts at least once a week with a contact center agent. A typical contact center agent handles over a hundred calls per day. They operate in various modes such as voice, chat and E-mail. The contact center industry produces gigabytes of data in the form of E-mails, chat logs, voice conversation transcriptions, customer feedback, etc. A bulk of the contact center data is voice conversations. Transcription of these using state of the art speech recognition results in text with 30-40% error rate. Further, even written modes of communication like online chat between customers and agents and even the interactions over email tend to be noisy. Analysis of contact center data is essential for customer relationship management, customer satisfaction analysis, call modeling, customer profiling, agent profiling, etc., and it requires sophisticated techniques to handle poorly written text.* Printed Documents: Many libraries, government organizations and national defence organizations have vast repositories of copy documents. To retrieve and process the content from such documents, they need to be processed using Character Recognition. In addition to printed text, these documents may also contain handwritten annotations. OCRed text can be highly noisy depending on the font size, quality of the print etc. It can range from 2-3% error rates to as high as 50-60% error rates. Handwritten annotations can be particularly hard to decipher, and error rates can be quite high in their presence.* Short Messaging Service (SMS): Language usage over computer mediated discourses, like chats, emails and SMS texts, significantly differs from the standard form of the language. An urge towards shorter message length facilitating faster typing and the need for semantic clarity, shape the structure of this non-standard form known as the texting language. References *Special Issue on Noisy Text Analytics - International Journal on Document Analysis and Recognition (2007), Springer, Guest Editors Craig Knoblock, Daniel Lopresti, Shourya Roy and L. Venkata Subramaniam, Vol. 10, No. 3-4, December 2007.*Wong, W., Liu, W. & Bennamoun, M. Enhanced Integrated Scoring for Cleaning Dirty Texts. In: IJCAI Workshop on Analytics for Noisy Unstructured Text Data (AND); Hyderabad, India..(See also* analytics* extraction* linguistics* language processing* entity recognition* mining* summarization* classification* qualityde la informacin
6036736
Northern_Islands_Municipality
thumb|right|450px|Northern Islands Municipality is one of the four main political divisions of the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands. It consists of a long string of the northernmost islands of the Northern Marianas, including (from north to south) de Pajaros, the Islands, Asuncion, Agrihan, Pagan, Alamagan, Guguan, Bank, Sarigan, Anatahan, and de Medinilla. The total land area of the islands, including offshore islets and rocks, is 154.755 km (59.75 sq mi).PopulationAs of April 1, 2000, the 2000 census reported a municipality-wide population of only 6 persons  (all on the island of Alamagan), but Pagan and Agrihan are also known to have seasonal populations. Many Northern Island inhabitants have secondary residences on Saipan due to economic, educational or other needs. Some islands had also been evacuated due to volcanic activities such as in the case of Anatahan (2003) and Pagan (early 1980s, since reinhabited).The mayors office and municipality administration, traditionally in the village of Shomushon on Pagan, is now in exile on Saipan. There are more than 100 registered voters in the municipality. http://www.saipantribune.com/newsstory.aspx?cat1&newsID52052 For the NMI House of Representatives, Northern Islands voters are grouped with one of the Saipan districts.Transportation and CommunicationsMost of the Northern Islands can only be reached by boat, except for an airstrip that serves Pagan. There are no electricity or telephone systems, and residents rely on generators for electricity and radio for communications.EconomyAgriculture and fishing are essentially the only economic activities, although on Pagan pozzolan-mining became a small industry after the early-1980s volcanic eruptions.References* Northern Mariana Islands and constituent municipalities, United States Census Bureau* Pascal Horst Lehne and Christoph Gbler: ber die Marianen. Lehne-Verlag, Wohldorf in Germany 1972. External link Official site of the Northern IslandsIsole SettentrionaliIslands
6049169
Negele_Boran
:  Negele Borana (or Neghelle) is a town in southern Ethiopia. Located in the  Zone of the Region on the road connecting Ababa to Odo, it has a latitude and longitude of  with an altitude of about 1475 meters above sea level. It is the administrative center of Liben woreda. Negele Boranas principal importance is that a barrack revolt in this town is considered the first incident of the Revolution.() Overview The town is reported to have telephone service, a post office and electricity, as well as at least one primary and one secondary school, but no financial institutions.(Socio-economic profile of the Guji Zone Government of Oromia Region (last accessed 26 May 2008)) The electrical power was introduced by a branch of the Electric Light and Power Authority (EELPA), and in January 1961 a diesel-driven 120 kW electric power plant for the town was completed.(Local History in Ethiopia (pdf) The Nordic Africa Institute website (accessed 27 May 2008)) A 2004 report states that Negele Borana is supplied with electricity by the Ethiopian Electric Power Corporation (the successor utility to the EELPA) from the national grid.(Woreda administration sources, as quoted in  Final Report for Aposto-Wendo-Negele (World Bank Report E1546, vol. 1), pp. 71f) There is also an airport (ICAO code HANG IATA EGL). Military Base, an important installation of the Army, is located to the northeast.Philip Briggs describes Negele Borana as something of a frontier town, a cultural boiling pot that is predominantly Oromo but also has strong Somali, Borena, and Muslim influences. ...  Negeles distinctive character and cultural blend are personified in one of the most lively and absorbing markets in East Africa -- especially on Sundays when the camel market is held.(Philip Briggs, Ethiopia: The Bradt Travel Guide, 3rd edition (Chalfont St Peters: Bradt, 2002), p. 421.) History The town of Negele was founded in the early 20th century; the Swedish doctor F. Hylander described it in 1934 as an Amhara new settlement and fortress with palisades, which was the farthest outpost towards Jubaland.(At the beginning of the Italo-Ethiopian War from 4 October 1935, Negele served as the headquarters of Ras Damtew The Italians subjected the town to frequent bombing raids.( The Italians under General Graziani captured the town shortly after their victory at the of Ganale Dorya, which further weakened the southern Ethiopian defenses.() The town was occupied by the British Gold Coast Brigade on 27 March 1941, who had pushed north from Dolo.() The British colonial unit found that the Italians had abandoned the settlement 10 days before they arrived, and in the time between the buildings had been looted and destroyed by the neighboring Oromo.( By the time David Buxton visited Negele Borana in 1943, he found that a battalion of the Army had garrisoned this half-built Italian settlement.(David Buxton, Travels in Ethiopia, second edition (London: Benn, 1957), p. 91)The Lutheran Mission operated a station in Negele from 1949. Their most important activity was to start a hospital for the town in one of the abandoned Italian buildings, which they operated until 1956 when the Ministry of Public Health took it over. In 1958, Negele was one of 27 places in Ethiopia ranked as First Class Township.(On 12 January 1974, enlisted men and non-commissioned officers of the Fourth Brigade stationed at the Military Base protested over their substandard living conditions. There was nothing new about discontent among soldiers serving in the desolate conditions in these far-flung garrisons, note Marina and David Ottaway. The heat was unbearable, the food barely edible, and the water was bad or in short supply. The last straw was when the officers refused to let the soldiers use their well after their own water pump   broke down. The soldiers arrested their superior officers and petitioned Emperor Haile Sellasie for redress of their grievances. The Emperor sent Lieutenant-General Dubale to investigate the matter; the mutineers took him prisoner, forced him to eat and drink as they did, then tied him up and put him under a tree for eight hours while they negotiated with the defense ministry. Furious, the Emperor sent two bombers to overfly the garrison and intimidate them to release Deresse, but did not punish the soldiers. The whole incident was hushed up for a while.(Marina and David Ottaway, Ethiopia: Empire in Revolution (New York: Africana, 1978), pp. 45f)During the War, the Army attempted to capture Negele Borana throughout August 1977, but the local garrison was able to successfully beat back the attacks.(Gebru Tareke, The Ethiopia-Somalia War of 1977 Revisited, International Journal of African Historical Studies, 2000 (33, #3), pp. 635ff at p. 647. (accessed 13 May 2009))Rights activists in southern Oromia reported to Rights Watch that students, farmers, and business people had been detained in Negele Borana. As of 25 January 2010 several hundred people, mostly affiliated with the Peoples Congress, were said to be still incarcerated in Negele Borana jail. These arrests reportedly were in response to protests about the activities of mining companies in the region, which the authorities attributed to the opposition.(One Hundred Ways of Putting Pressure, p. 37. Human Rights Watch report, released 10 March 2010) Demographics Based on figures from the Central Statistical Agency in 2005, Negele Borana has an estimated total population of 42,958 of whom 22,193 are men and 20,765 are women.(CSA 2005 National Statistics, Table B.4) The 1994 national census reported this town had a total population of 23,997 of whom 12,036 were men and 11,961 women.  See also *Negele Borana bombings Notes BoranBoranit:NeghelliBoranBoranBoran
6061627
Pennsylvania_Regions
Geographic regions of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, United States of America.Southeastern PennsylvaniaDelaware ValleyImage:Map of PA Delaware Valley.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Valley Region of PennsylvaniaThe Delaware Valley is named for the Delaware River which flows through the region.  Consisting of the following counties:* Bucks* Philadelphia* Delaware* Montgomery* ChesterThis valley primarily contains the Philadelphia Metro Area.Pennsylvania Piedmont300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Pennsylvania Piedmont RegionThe Pennsylvania Piedmont region is a heavily agricultural section of the Plateau located in Eastern Pennsylvania frequently cited as a candidate for extensive ecological preservation.Consisting of the following counties:* Franklin* Adams* Cumberland* York* Dauphin* Lancaster* Lebanon* Chester* Berks* Montgomery* Bucks* Lehigh* NorthamptonPennsylvania Dutch CountryImage:Map of PA Dutch Region.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Dutch Country RegionPennsylvania Dutch Country refers to an area of southeastern Pennsylvania that has a high percentage of Amish, Mennonite and Fancy Dutch inhabitants and where the Pennsylvania German language was historically common.Consisting of the following counties:* Lehigh* Berks* Lebanon* Dauphin* Lancaster* York* Perry* Cumberland* Adams* FranklinLehigh ValleyImage:Map of PA Lehigh Valley.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Valley Region of PennsylvaniaLocated along the River.Consisting of following counties:* Lehigh* NorthamptonThis valley primarily contains the Allentown Metro Area.Northeastern PennsylvaniaNortheastern PennsylvaniaImage:Map of PA Northeast.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting PennsylvaniaThis mountainous area of Pennsylvania includes the Mountains, the Mountains and former coal mining cities, boroughs, and villages.Consisting of the following counties:* Pike* Luzerne* Lackawanna* Monroe* Montour* Wyoming* Bradford* Carbon* Columbia* Northumberland* Schuylkill* Sullivan* SusquehannaThe PoconosThe Poconos, or the Pocono Mountains region, is a mountainous region of about 2,400 square miles (6,200 km) located in northeastern Pennsylvania, approximately 30 miles north of Allentown, which are a popular recreational destination for local and regional visitors.Consisting of the following counties:* Carbon* Monroe* Pike* Wayne* Luzerne* SusquehannaCoal RegionImage:Map of PA Coal Region.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Anthracite Region of PennsylvaniaThe Coal Region is a term used to refer to an area of Northeastern Pennsylvania in the central Appalachian Mountains.  The region is home to the largest known deposits of anthracite coal found in the Americas, with an estimated reserve of seven billion short tons.* Schuylkill* Carbon* Northumberland* Columbia* Luzerne* LackawannaWyoming ValleyImage:Map of PA Wyoming Valley.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Valley Region of PennsylvaniaWyoming Valley is a region of northeastern Pennsylvania. The valley is a crescent-shaped depression, a part of the ridge-and-valley or folded Appalachians, which includes the metropolitan areas of Scranton, and Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania.Consisting of the following counties:* Luzerne* LackawannaThis valley primarily contains the Wilkes-Barre Metro Area and the Scranton Metro Area.Endless MountainsImage:Map of PA Endless Mountains.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Mountains Region of PennsylvaniaThe Endless Mountains are a chain of mountains in northeastern Pennsylvania which are part of the Mountains chain. The mountains are not true mountains, geologically speaking, but are a dissected plateau and are part of the Plateau, along with the higher Mountains to the east of the Endless Mountains in York. Consisting of the following counties:* Sullivan* Wyoming* Bradford* SusquehannaNorthern TierImage:Map of PA Northern Tier.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Tier Region of PennsylvaniaThe Northern Tier is a geographic region in north-central Pennsylvania. Consisting of the following counties:* Sullivan* Wyoming* Bradford* Susquehanna* TiogaCentral PennsylvaniaSusquehanna River Valleyof PA Susquehanna Valley.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Susquehanna River Valley Region of Pennsylvania. Those in red are those through which the river physically flows, dark red counties are part of the watershed.The Susquehanna River is a river in the northeastern United States. At approximately 410 mi (715 km) long, it is the longest river on the American East Coast.South Central Pennsylvania300px|thumb|Counties constituting the South Central region of Pennsylvania South Central Pennsylvania is a geographic region that lies between the Valley and Pennsylvania, United States. Consisting of the following counties:* Adams* Cumberland* Dauphin* Franklin* Huntingdon* Juniata* Lancaster* Lebanon* Mifflin* Northumberland* Perry* Schuylkill* Snyder* YorkHappy ValleyImage:Map of Pennsylvania highlighting Centre County.svg|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Valley Region of Pennsylvania Happy Valley is a large valley located in central Pennsylvania. The State University is located in the valley. Consisting of the following county:* CentreCumberland ValleyImage:Map of PA Cumberland Valley.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Valley Region of PennsylvaniaThe Cumberland Valley is a geographic region that lies between South Mountain and the Blue Ridge Mountains of central Pennsylvania and western Maryland, United States.Consisting of the following counties:* Cumberland* FranklinWestern PennsylvaniaLaurel HighlandsImage:Map of PA Laurel Highlands.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Highlands Region of PennsylvaniaThe Laurel Highlands, in the southwestern part of the state of Pennsylvania, traverses the Laurel and Chestnut ridges of the Mountains.Consisting of the following counties:* Fayette* Somerset* WestmorelandPittsburgh Metro AreaImage:Map of PA Pittsburgh Metro Area.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the Metro AreaConsisting of the following counties:* Allegheny* Armstrong* Beaver* Butler* Washington* WestmorelandAllegheny National ForestImage:Map of PA Allegheny National Forest.gif|300px|thumb|Counties constituting the National Forest Region of PennsylvaniaThe Allegheny National Forest is a National Forest located in northwestern Pennsylvania. The forest covers over 500,000 acres (2,000 km) of land.Consisting of the following counties:* Forest* Elk* Warren* McKeanPennsylvanias Northwest Region300px|thumb|Counties constituting Pennsylvanias Northwest Region* Erie* Crawford* Mercer* Venango* Warren* Lawrence* Butler* Clarion* Forest
6071053
Republic_of_Morskoj
The Republic of Morskoj, from the 360 video game Chromehounds, is a participant in the War. The Republic controls the northern region of the Neroimus area. Once under the control of the USSR, the territory controlled by the Republic of Morskoj is mountainous and often covered in snow. Morskoj is known for its large and powerful military. This is reflected in the Republics developed weaponry, often sacrificing weight for power.Characteristics from Chromehounds:The Republic of Morskoj*Area: 62,380 km*Population: 3,580,000*Capital: Ostrov ( from Russian island)*Ethnicity: Native of Morskoj, and Hispanic*Language: Morskovian, Russian*Religion: Russian Orthodox, Roman Catholic, others*Head of State: President *Gov. Type: Republic*Industries: Mining, Timber, Farming, Metallurgy*Currency: IsraThe former Soviet state is located in the Eastern region of Neroimus. The people of Morskoj are now independent, but suffered many hardships as a minority when the U.S.S.R. had control. Geographically, the country is covered with rigid mountainous areas which were once rich with mining resources.Morskoj currently faces a state of tension against the Great Soviet Socialist Republic who is scheming for a reunion. However, the nations are on much friendlier terms with the Republic of Russia who is also in opposition of the G.S.S.R.
6083682
Church_of_the_Assumption_of_the_Virgin_Mary_(Most)
right|thumb|upright1.2|Church of the Assumption of the Virgin Mary , in the foreground the Hospital of the Holy Spirit (2006)The Church of the Assumption of the Virgin Mary (in Czech kostel Nanebevzet Panny Marie) is a late Gothic church building in Most, a city in the nad Labem Region of the Republic. Previous building The dean church in Most, which stood in the middle of the church yard near the road to atec, burned down in 1515, and only the eastern crypt and the inner peripheral brickwork of the western tower could be saved. (The foundation of this church is indicated in 1253 till 1257 and indirectly proven by a document of pope Bonifacio VIII from 1296. The construction was originally an early Gothic basilica of three naves.) Construction    The building of the new church began on August 20, 1517, when the cornerstone was laid, and was financed by individual donors. The designer was Heilmann from Schweinfurt. He proposed the church as a big hall of three naves, with inside supports, a pentagonal presbytery and a prismatic tower with a gallery in the main elevation. The northern wall contains a vestibule, and a sacristy is located in the north-western wall.During the first year, demolition work was carried out. Heilmann handed over the project in 1518, and control of the building works was taken over initially by the foreman Jrg (Georg) of Maulbron and later by another foreman called Peter (possibly Heilmann). The vaults of the peripheral chapels were finished during the second decade of the 16th century, then the inner pillars were erected and in 1532 the church was prepared for vaulting. Then, the windows were placed and the vaulting ribs were dressed. The carcassing was finished in 1549 and the renaissance portals installed in the second half of the 16th century. Unfortunately the church burnt out in 1578, and was finally repaired by 1602. The church was consecrated in 1597.( E. Poche (ed.), Umleck pamtky ech 2., p. 432. (In Czech))Later repairsA new roof was put on the church in 1650. The actual main altar was constructed during 17351739. The altar decoration was made in the workshop of the sculptor Eder and the main altar picture was produced by Kramoln - both in 1773. A boundary wall round the cemetery, church and the ossuary was demolished in 1840. Another big repair was made during 18801883, during which the interior was reshaped into the style, and a part of the baroque inventory was removed. New gothic paint was used, and equipment was installed in the new gothic style. The plaster renovation of the outer walls, as well as a treatment of the stone parts was made in 1932. Transport of the building During the sixties, Mosts historic center was completely destroyed to make room for the expanding lignite mines, a process that lasted until 1980.  Unlike other historical building it was decided to save the church by moving it away from mining area.An expert committee was set up by the Ministry of Culture of Czechoslovakia to supervise the project, presided over by academician Bechyn. From 1969 the committee was led by Myslivec.To move the building, a variant on a bow path was chosen. The transfer was overseen by the firm Transfera Praha, an organisation of the Czech Ministry of Culture, and was performed by Prmstav Pardubice and koda Plze.Prior to moving the building, the peripheral masonry, the bearing and supporting pillars were reinforced, and the remainder of the western tower was demolished. The church circumference was reinforced by a concrete ring and the church was gripped by a steel framework construction on the inner as well as outer sides. The preparation work lasted seven years, as it was also necessary to demolish all houses in the transfer path and fill in the former opencast mine.53 transport trucks were set on special rails, which were inserted under all statically important points of the building. These transport trucks worked using computer controlled hydraulics, as were four booms used to pull the church. During movement of the church on the road section, rails which had already been passed over were moved from behind the building to in front of it, allowing them to be used again.Between September 30 and October 27, 1975, the church was moved a distance of 841.1 meters at a velocity of 13 centimeters per minute to the vicinity of the old hospital with a small church of the Holy Spirit, and it was set on an iron-concrete two-storied foundation.(Kolektiv autor, Pesun kostela v Most, Praha 1975. (In Czech)) After the move was completed, restoration work went on until 1988, and the church was solemnly consecrated again in 1993.This building was mentioned in Book of World Records as the heaviest building ever moved on wheels (12 700 t).ArchitectureThe church is 60 m long and 30 m large, has only one tower, conforming to the South-German late-gothic layout. Its interior walls are plain, and the peripheral walls are broken by two rows of windows. The lower windows belong to the individual chapels and the upper ones belong to the flank naves of the hall. The inside of the church forms a big hall, divided into three naves by seven pairs of octahedral columns. Between the counterforts are 16 chapels, two side vestibules, a sacristy, a double worm staircase on the eastern side and a worm staircase on the western side. Each of the chapels has its own ribbed vault and is dedicated to the patron saints of its donors  the guilds, rich citizens and one to St. Bartolomew, patron saint of the abbot of Osek.( E. Poche (ed.), Umleck pamtky ech 2., p. 432. (In Czech))The church is used both for religious services as well as an exposition of the Gothic and Renaissance art of the north-western Bohemia, and the church basement is used as an exhibition space for the Gallery. Literature * E. Poche (ed.), Umleck pamtky ech 2., Praha: Academia 1978. P. 431 f. (In Czech) References  External links * Short overview (in Czech)Nanebevzet Panny Marie (Most)   ()   ()
6098117
Eglingham
Eglingham is a village in Northumberland, England, situated about  north-west of Alnwick and  from Wooler. It lies in the sheltered valley of the Eglingham Burn, a tributary of the Aln, about  above sea level, in a rural area set amongst rolling countryside, within  of the Hills. The village is surrounded by mainly arable farmland, moorland and woodland, including an arboretum and some commercial forestry.The village has about 60 dwellings and a population of about 100,(Eglingham Conservation Area Appraisal, retrieved 20 December 2006) most situated either side of the through-road, and including the local manorial property, Hall.Eglingham is also a parish, about nine miles (14 km) in length by four and a half in breadth, with an area of . It comprises 16 settlements - Bassington, Beanley, New and Old Bewick, South Charlton, Brandon, Branton, Crawley, Ditchburn, Eglingham, Harehope, Hedgley, East and West Lilburn, Shipley, Titlington - and several smaller places. The Breamish, which rises in the Cheviots, runs through the parish. The geological composition of the parish includes rich gravelly loam along the path of the river; clay predominating in the centre of the parish, and unenclosed moorland in the south and east. Within the moor area is Kimmer Loch, covering , and reputed to abound in perch and pike.The parish is largely agricultural, although gravel extraction continues to the west. Villages in the parish also serve as bases for commuters working in Alnwick and upon Tyne.HistoryThe earliest records of human occupation in the parish are finds of neolithic or Age flint tools, a spearhead, and many burial sites, variously cairns, barrows and cists. A number of Age settlements are evident, including a fort east of Shipley moor. Settlements dating to Roman times are found on Beanley moor. It may be surmised that the parish was well populated and involved in extensive farming, from the ability to support multiple communities, a number of which - such as at South Charlton, North Charlton, and possibly in Eglingham village - had early medieval churches. A leper hospital was established at Harehope. Eglingham village was situated on the historic route from Alnwick to Wooler.In addition to agriculture, the parishs population was also engaged in mining coal and quarrying limestone and freestone, all of which are described as being available in abundance.(National Gazetteer, 1868, from the Genuki website) A nineteenth-century travellers guide describes a stream of water which is turned black as common ink by an infusion of galls.(The Travellers Guide, 1805, by Chamberlain Oulton, p. xxv) Eglingham colliery closed in November 1897, after becoming unprofitable owing to the costs of removing water from the main coal seams at Black Hill.(Eglingham colliery, from the Mining Museum, accessed 07 Dec 2006)In more recent times, in 1972, the village and a considerable amount of surrounding land were declared a Conservation Area.According to the History, Topography, and Directory of Northumberland,(Excerpt from the History, Topography, and Directory of Northumberland 1855, Whellan, on the Genuki website) its population in 1801, was 1,536; in 1811, 1,538; in 1821, 1,666; in 1831, 1,805; in 1841, 1,832; and in 1851, 2,000.The parish offered a relatively prosperous living in the form of a vicarage in the diocese of Durham, valued in 1868 at 835. The church of St Maurice is a stone structure, rebuilt after the Restoration, having been destroyed, together with neighbouring chapels, by the Scots during the Rebellion, and was enlarged by the addition of a transept in 1836.(Some time between 1217 and 1226, Richard Marsh, the  of Durham, gave the tithes of Eglingham to the Abbey of St Albans to help the monks make a better ale, taking compassion on the weakness of the convents drink, according to an eighteenth-century historian.(History of the Christian Church, 1907, C. Scribner, p 328.) Landmarks Hall, dating to the 16th or 17th century, built originally as the home of the family. Village facilities include a village hall, a small primary school, and a pub-restaurant, the highly regarded Tankerville Arms. Religious sites The 13th-century parish church is dedicated to St Maurice and may originally have served as a fortified pele tower where the villagers could take refuge from marauding bands of cattle thieves, or Reivers. The church bell, cast in the Countries, is one of the only two foreign bells in the of Newcastle; the other is at Lambley.() Notable people *Baker Tristram (18221906), English clergyman, Biblical scholar, traveller and ornithologist born at Eglingham vicarage*Stanley Alder (18981984), portrait painter, born at EglinghamReferencesExternal links*Eglingham on the Keys to the Past website*Eglingham Conservation Area Character Appraisal circa 2005 from District Council*Eglingham colliery, from the Mining Museum*Eglingham School*GENUKI*Eglingham Parish Newsnl:Eglinghampl:Eglingham
6103842
Neighborhoods_in_Spokane,_Washington
Washington has neighborhoods ranging from the late Victorian-era to the ultra modern. The neighborhoods listed here are recognized by the city and each has a neighborhood council. The neighborhoods are listed alphabetically under two geographical divisions: those north of the River and those south.North SideThe north side of Spokane is a large patchwork of neighborhoods extending from downtown eight miles (13 km) north into the suburban Mead area, from the Spokane River Gorge in the west eight miles (13 km) to Beacon Hill in the east.  The north side is largely residential but contains several large retail districts as well as University and University. Retail centers such as the Northtown Mall, and Northpointe Plaza lie along Division Street, the citys north-south meridian which splits into U.S. Route 395 and U.S. Route 2 at (The Y) along the citys northern edge. Balboa/South Indian TrailAn arterial now runs along what was once a major Native American thoroughfare in the northwestern part of the city, along the edge of the Spokane River Gorge.  Today, the area is dominated by middle to upper-middle class homes, many of which were built from the 1960s to the early 1980s.  Many stands of native Ponderosa Pine trees cover the hills and prairies surrounding this neighborhood.Five Mile PrairieA cliff-ringed mesa five miles (8 km) north of downtown Spokane, and  higher, Five Mile is one of Spokanes newer residential areas. Homes here tend to be expensive due to the views, and to the fact that the area lies within the Mead School District. Sky Prairie Park, Prairie View Elementary School and the Five Mile Grange are community hubs. The mesas north and west slopes remain wild and forested. Although no retail business districts yet exist atop Five Mile Heights, the hill overlooks the commercial centers of Francis Avenue to the south, Indian Trail Road to the west, Wandermere to the northeast and North Division to the east. Mead High School is one mile (1.6 km) north of the hill. Holy Family hospital lies two miles (3 km) southeast.HillyardA city chartered independently of Spokane, later incorporated into the Spokane city limits.  Downtown Hillyard, which runs along Market Street, was recently listed on the Register of Historic Places as a historic district, a fact which should spur continued redevelopment of the district.  Hillyard was named in honor of Great Northern Railway magnate, J. Hill. It is the poorest section of Spokane per capita. The construction of the new Spokane Corridor freeway is expected to bring renewal to Hillyards economy.LoganThe Logan Neighborhood comprises the residential area just north of Gonzaga University in central Spokane. University students occupy many of the neighborhoods homes.University DistrictThere are two connected campuses northeast of downtown, University, and the Campus housing State University Spokane and Washington University Spokane.  Plans call for increases in the student population in coming years, as well as additional housing, services, and entertainment geared toward a young, professional audience. Significant renewal and renovation, primarily of professional and medical business, is occurring in the area east of Division, west of Hamilton and north of the I-90 freeway.MinnehahaThis is a series of neighborhoods along Upriver Drive, along the north bank of the River about five miles (8 km) east of downtown Spokane. The area is known for the granite climbing rocks and hiking/biking trails of John H. Shields Park along Upriver Drive; the park is known as Minnehaha rather than as Shields Park. The Centennial Trail bike trail and a series of small parks and swimming holes along the river make this a popular getaway for city residents. Homes tend to be older along the river, with some newer subdivisions appearing on the terraces and slopes above. Just east, past Argonne Road, the Arbor Crest Winery occupies the former Riblet Mansion and its grounds high atop a jutting promontory overlooking the Spokane River and surrounding valley.Nevada/LidgerwoodAlso called Nevawood this area in Northeast Spokane is home to Northtown Mall, which at one time was the largest mall west of the Mississippi. Most houses in this neighborhood were built in the mid-seventies however new home construction is common. Whitman Elementary School, Garry Junior High School and R. Rogers High School are all located within the Lidgerwood neighborhood.North HillGarlandThe Garland Historical District is a mid-20th century neighborhood located  north of Downtown. The area (also known as the Garland Business District) is considered a community with many local shops, pubs, and restaurants. The neighborhood has an independent newspaper, The Garland Times, which serves as a guide to neighborhood events.(http://www.thegarlandtimes.com) Garland is home to one of two Spokane-area Milk Bottles, Fergusons Caf, and the Garland Theater, a popular independent movie theater. While the Milk Bottle (now a restaurant), and Garland theater serve as the neighborhoods most notable landmarks, Fergusons Caf, which first opened in the 1930s, was featured in three movies, Quest, & Joon and Would I Lie?. On the morning of September 26, 2011, the Milk Bottle restaurant, owned by Mary Lou Ritchie, and the historical Fergusons Caf, located next door, were heavily damaged in a fire. Fire investigators believe the fire started in a walkway between the two restaurants.(http://www.spokesman.com/stories/2011/sep/26/milk-bottle-fergusons-badly-damaged-fire/?prefetch1)North Indian TrailA suburban area within the northwestern corner of the Spokane city limits, North Indian Trail features upscale homes overlooking the Spokane River Gorge. Large, recent residential developments such as Sundance and Pacific Park are typical. A shopping complex at the intersection of Indian Trail Road and Barnes Road serves surrounding communities including Five Mile Prairie, Rutter Parkway, Seven Mile and rural areas beyond.NorthwestA residential neighborhood in the northwest part of the city that features a large park and sports complex known as Shadle Park, also home to Shadle Park High School.  The area is composed of post-war houses.  There is also a site of historical interest here, Drumheller Springs, the site of the first white American-style school built in the Oregon Territory, circa 1830.  Local Indians were taught here by Garry, a chief of the middle Spokane people who preached Christianity and peace among the Native Americans that inhabited Inland Northwest.  This site is now managed by the Spokane Parks and Recreation Department as a natural area.  A trail that once led from downtown Spokane all the way to Canada still runs through the preserve.West Centralright|thumb|Nettletons AdditionThis neighborhood includes Washington States largest historic district listed on the Register of Historic Places, Nettletons Addition. Like much of Spokane, West Central suffered from mid-century suburban flight earning the area the name of Felony Flats to locals, but 2000 Census data showed improvements.  In Socio-Economic Changes in Spokane County Census Tracts from 1990 and 2000, the Spokane-Kootenai Real Estate Research Committee noted a distinct decline in poverty levels in West Central.  More recently, discussion of Kendall Yards, a large-scale new urbanism development bordering the southern edge of West Central, has sparked renewed interest in this historic neighborhood.West HillsWhitmanSouth HillThe neighborhoods south of Spokane are generally known as the South Hill. The area includes Park, Lincoln Heights, Cannons Addition, South Perry, Comstock, Moran Prairie, and Brownes Mountain.  The leafy west end of South Hill is considered Spokanes old-money area.  From Downtown, the view of the South Hill is dominated by evergreen trees and two large man-made features: Sacred Heart Medical Center, which is Spokanes largest hospital, and the Cathedral of St. John the Evangelist, seat of the Diocese of Spokane and a magnificent example of  modern English architecture. Brownes AdditionFile:Patsy Clark Mansion1.JPG|thumbnail|right| The Clark MansionA National Historic District west of Downtown, Brownes Addition was Spokanes first prestigious address. Notable for its array of old mansions built by Spokanes early elite, in Queen Anne and early Craftsman styles, the area also is home to Coeur dAlene Park and the recently rebuilt and expanded Museum of Arts and Culture (MAC). A prominent feature of the MAC is Campbell House, a turn of the 20th century mansion built by Amasa Campbell, a local mining magnate. The mansion was designed by renowned architect Cutter. His daughter Helen Campbell donated the house to the Eastern Washington Historical Society, which subsequently built a museum on the east lawn. The English Tudor Revival home retains most of its original decor and is a favorite tour destination.Cliff/CannonEast CentralThis neighborhood was bisected when Interstate 90 came through decades ago, and it is still recovering. The area sits at the foot of the South Hill, east of Downtown along the freeway.  With plans for feeder lanes to be added to I-90, there will likely be further impact upon the neighborhood.  What remains of the residential integrity of the area lies to the south of I-90, mostly in an area known as Liberty Park. The area north of the freeway and east of Hamilton has had little renewal since its original development in the early 20th century. The area between Nevada and the Downtown area is currently experiencing renewal and renovation, with an emphasis on medical and professional business, and is part of the Spokane University District.Grandview/ThorpeLocated just west of Downtown, near International Airport, Sunset Hill features older neighborhoods with smaller houses, as well as new subdivisions; however, some of the lower parts of the hill are very poorly zoned areas with dirt roads, grass lots and very small, dilapidated homes. Sunset Hill is bisected by I-90 and Sunset Boulevard, which represents one of the remaining sections of the old U.S. Route 2, once the main road between Spokane and Seattle prior to the completion of Interstate 90. In fact, I-90 features one of the most striking views of the city and Mt. Spokane behind it in the distance, as seen by travelers heading east along the freeway upon reaching the crest of the Hill on their way down into the city.  A. Finch Arboretum, an expansive park filled with a variety of tree species and wildlife, is located on Sunset Hill.Latah/Hangman ValleyLincoln HeightsManito/Cannon HillThe boundaries of this area are considered to be approximately from Arthur Street to Lincoln Street in the east-west direction, and from 14th Avenue to 37th Avenue in the north-south direction.  Best described as the area immediately surrounding Manito and Cannon Hill Park, which are separated by only two residential blocks, this neighborhood covers a fairly large area.  Manito and Cannon Hill are centered prominently in this community. At one time, the park was a zoo with a number of exotic animals calling it home.  Exhibits included an owl barn, penguins, and large cats of various species.  The neighborhood feeds many local elementary schools including Wilson, Roosevelt, Hutton, and Jefferson. There is also the Cataldo Catholic School one block north of Cannon Hill Park. Most elementary students move on to Sacajawea Middle School and then Lewis and Clark High School.  This neighborhood is populated mostly by middle-class families and features homes from many eras, from Mid-Century Modern to Victorian to Arts & Crafts bungalow-style homes.  Manito and Cannon Hill Park each have a boulevard running nearby which features many of the remaining Craftsman bungalow-style homes built, in some cases, as early as 1904.Peaceful ValleyA quaint, long-humble residential neighborhood descending into the Spokane River Gorge just west of downtown, Peaceful Valley is now benefiting from surrounding upscale development in Brownes Addition, Kendall Yards and West Downtown. Still, the Valley remains one of the quietest, greenest, most affordable neighborhoods within easy walking distance of the citys core. A few luxurious riverfront homes mix with a greater number of small bungalows and apartments, some of which are tucked under the huge Maple Street Bridge. Peoples Park and Latah Creek bound the neighborhood to the west. In many ways, Peaceful Valley seems little changed since the film & Joon was set and filmed here in 1993.(http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0106387/locations) It is also Spokanes oldest neighborhood in that large, native fishing villages once filled this area.RiversideSpokanes central business core boasts recently revitalized shopping, housing and entertainment, with major projects recently completed and more underway.  As most river cities do, Spokane revolves around its river, which tumbles through downtown in a series of rapids and falls. Along the river is Riverfront Park (site of the 1974 Worlds Fair), the Inland Northwest Bank Performing Arts Center, the newly remodeled and expanded Convention Center, and the Park Square shopping mall. Nearby one finds the Davenport Hotel, the growing Davenport Arts District, numerous shops, pubs and restaurants, and much new urban housing on the way, displacing many of the low-income residents and businesses that dominated downtown during the 1980s and 90s.  Of special note is a brand new neighborhood being developed on the northern periphery of the downtown core.  The new development is called Yards, and follows similar projects in cities like Houston and Denver.  It will feature over 1,500 new urban residences and tens of thousands of square feet of new shopping, entertainment, and office space, making it one of the largest upscale urban redevelopment projects in the country.Downtown is home to Spokanes city and county government offices, most notably the Spokane County Courthouse, built in the style of a French chateau and featuring large turrets and spires.  A similarly historic structure houses the Spokane Athletic Club, a Spokane social institution housed in a Georgian-style building designed by famed Spokane architect Cutter.  The Club sits just across Riverside Avenue from Our Lady of Lourdes Cathedral, seat of the Catholic Church in the Inland Northwest, and just across Monroe Street from the Thomas S. Foley United States Courthouse.The recently rebuilt Street Bridge over Spokane Falls is a notable symbol of the city, long featured in postcards and in the city logo. Nearby is the modern main branch of the Spokane Public Library, with its unparalleled views of the Spokane River.  Just down Monroe Street is the Fox Theatre, an art-deco movie theatre of yesteryear that recently underwent a multi-million dollar renovation to become the new home of the Symphony.  At the north end of Riverfront Park is the 12,000 seat Veterans Memorial Arena, home to the Chiefs Hockey Club and Shock Arena Football Club.  In addition to numerous local and regional events, the Arena plays host to events such as NCAA March Madness, numerous big-name concerts, and in 2007 and 2010, the U.S. Figure Skating Championships.  Across Mallon Avenue from the Arena is the Flour Mill, a converted structure that once produced flour in abundance but now houses a variety of offices, shops, and restaurants in a unique setting.RockwoodA mostly middle- to upper middle-class neighborhood, Rockwood is so named because Rockwood Boulevard winds in and around the many houses, parks, and lush, wooded areas. There are many large houses in this area.SouthgateSouth PerryOriginally known as the Grant Park addition, the Liberty Park/Lower Perry Neighborhood dates back to the late 19th century. The Grant Park area was once much larger than it is today. In the old days, it had two lumberyards, a butcher shop, barber shop, library, ice cream parlor, bakery, steam cleaner and several grocery stores. Today, within easy walking distance, youll find two convenience stores, laundry services, a drug store, a caf, an espresso shop, quilting services, a print shop, dog grooming, small engine repair and sales, auto repair, dance classes, dental and counseling services, hair salon, massage therapy clinic, florist, commercial photographer, martial arts school and a second hand store.One of Spokanes earliest elementary schools, Grant School, has been teaching neighborhood children since it first opened classrooms in 1900. And one of Spokanes oldest religious congregations, the Liberty Park Methodist Church, has kept its doors open since 1912. The Liberty Park Florist has been in business with a long and proud record of serving their community.Some of the buildings in the business district date back from the early 1920s and feature some fine examples of local granite stonework, decorative shingles and there is even a Dutch windmill, something of a landmark for the area.(City of Spokane - City Government) References ( External links *Photos of Downtown Spokane*Images of Spokane neighborhoods at night*Downtown Spokane*Nettletons Addition*South Perry Neighborhood
6121592
Siege_of_Boonesborough
 campaignbox  The Siege of Boonesborough took place in September 1778 during the Revolutionary War. The attack on the Kentucky settlement of Boonesborough was led by Blackfish, a Shawnee leader allied to the British. Months before the battle, Blackfish had captured and adopted Boone, the founder of Boonesborough. Boone escaped the Shawnees in time to lead the defense of the settlement. Blackfishs siege was unsuccessful and was lifted after ten days. Boone was then court-martialed by fellow officers who suspected him of having British (or Shawnee) sympathies. Boone was acquitted, but he soon moved away from Boonesborough.BackgroundSettlement of KentuckyIn 1774, the British and Dominion of Virginia defeated a coalition of Native Americans in the Country, primarily Shawnees, in War. In the treaty that ended the war, the River was established as the boundary between Shawnee lands north of the river and western Virginia (present Virginia and much of Kentucky) to the south. The Native Americans were not unified, however, and many leaders did not recognize the treaty&mdash;which ceded their prime hunting grounds&mdash;to be binding.In 1775, Richard Henderson of Carolina purchased a large amount of Kentucky land from the Cherokees, who also hunted in Kentucky, on which he intended to establish a colony called Transylvania. Hendersons employee Boone blazed the Trail into central Kentucky and built Fort Boone, soon renamed Boonesborough. Boonesborough and the rest of Transylvania became part of Virginia in 1776. Several families from the east soon settled there. Shawnees to the north were unhappy about American expansion into Kentucky, and they sporadically attacked Boonesborough.Meanwhile, the Revolutionary War had begun in the east. In 1777, British officials opened a new front in the war with the American colonists by recruiting and arming Native American war parties to raid the Kentucky settlements. Henry Hamilton, the British Lieutenant Governor of Canada at Detroit, found willing allies in leaders such as Chief Blackfish of the Shawnees, who hoped to drive the Americans out of Kentucky and reclaim their hunting grounds. As the raids intensified, Americans who strayed from fortified settlements like Boonesborough were likely to be killed or captured. American Indians brought 129 scalps and 77 prisoners to Hamilton in 1777. (Lofaro, p. 83)Capture of Daniel BooneUnable to dislodge the Kentuckians from their fortified settlements, the Indians destroyed crops and killed cattle, hoping that food shortages would compel the Kentucky settlers to leave. With the food supply at Boonesborough running low, the settlers needed salt to preserve what meat they had. In January 1778, Daniel Boone led a party of thirty men to the salt springs on the Licking River. On February 7, 1778, when Boone was out hunting meat for the expedition, he was surprised and captured by warriors led by Blackfish. Because Boones party was greatly outnumbered, he convinced his men to surrender rather than put up a fight.Blackfish wanted to continue to Boonesborough and capture it since it was now poorly defended, but Boone convinced him that the women and children were not hardy enough to survive a winter trek as prisoners. Instead, Boone promised that Boonesborough would surrender willingly to the Shawnees the following spring. Boone was improvising, saying anything to keep the Shawnees from attacking Boonesborough. He did not have an opportunity to tell his men what he was doing, however, and many of them concluded that he had switched his loyalty to the British.Boone and his men were taken as prisoners to Blackfishs town of Chillicothe. Per Shawnee custom, some of the prisoners were adopted into the tribe to replace fallen warriors. The remainder were taken to Detroit, where Indians received a bounty from Governor Hamilton for each prisoner (or scalp) taken. Boone was adopted into a Shawnee family at Chillicothe, perhaps into the family of Chief Blackfish himself. He was given the name Sheltowee, meaning Big Turtle. Like most of the other adoptees, Boone was watched closely, but he eventually escaped. On June 16, 1778, when he learned that Blackfish was preparing to return to Boonesborough with a large force, Boone eluded his captors and raced home, covering the 160 miles (260 km) to Boonesborough in five days.Upon his return, some of the men expressed doubts about Boones loyalty, since after surrendering the salt making party he had apparently lived quite happily among the Shawnees for months. Boone responded by leading a preemptive raid against the Shawnee village of Paint Lick Town on the other side of the Ohio River. This accomplished little, and the raiding party hurried back to Boonesborough when they discovered that Blackfish had marched south.NegotiationsOn September 7, 1778, Blackfishs force arrived outside Boonesborough. Boone counted 444 Native Americans and 12 white men. The former were mostly Shawnees, with a number of Cherokees, Wyandots, Miamis, Delawares, and Mingos. The latter were French-Canadian militiamen from Detroit, former French subjects now fighting on behalf of the British Crown. Although this was the largest force yet sent against the Kentucky settlements, taking a fortified position like Boonesborough would still be difficult without artillery to reduce the stronghold.Blackfish called Boone out of the fort for a parley and reminded Boone of his promise to surrender the settlement. Blackfish presented letters from Governor Hamilton which proclaimed that the settlers would be well treated and taken to Detroit if they surrendered. If they did not surrender, there were no guarantees. Boone told Blackfish that he would present the offer to the others. He could not make this decision himself,  Boone said, since during his captivity other officers had assumed command. Back in the fort, Boone outlined the situation. The consensus was to fight rather than surrender. The decision was made to prolong the negotiations with Blackfish as long as possible, since reinforcements from Virginia were expected. Boone and Major William Bailey Smith went outside again and told Blackfish that they feared that the trip to Detroit would be too hard on the women and children. Blackfish pointed out that he had brought 40 horses to transport those unable to walk. Boone asked for another day to consult with the others. Leaders from the two sides smoked a pipe together and then broke off negotiations for the day.Over the next two days, settlers in the fort prepared for the siege. Based on faulty intelligence received from Hamilton in Detroit, Blackfish believed that there were at least 200 militiamen in the fort, when in fact there were only about 40 effective gunmen inside. The Kentuckians reinforced the illusion of a greater number of men by having some of the women in the fort carry weapons while dressed in mens clothing. On the evening of September 8, Blackfish and Boone met again. Boone told a surprised Blackfish that the fort would not surrender. Blackfish proposed that a formal treaty conference with all of the leaders be held on the next day.The treaty session began on September 9, with leaders from the two sides sharing a meal outside the fort. Afterwards, the council began. In case of trouble, both sides had gunmen covering the meeting from a distance. Blackfish demanded to know by what right had the white people taken possession of this country. Boone replied that they had bought the land from the Cherokees at Shoals. A Cherokee chief confirmed that this was true. Blackfish accepted this answer and then proposed that if the settlers would pledge their allegiance to the king of Great Britain, the Shawnees would accept the Ohio River boundary and both sides would live in peace. A treaty to this effect (which does not survive) was then signed.(Faragher, p. 189.) The Shawnees then approached the Americans to shake hands and seal the agreement. What happened next is unclear. According to one popular interpretation, the Shawnees, having failed to secure the surrender of Boonesborough, attempted to seize the American leaders. However, as historian John Mack Faragher and others have argued, there is little evidence that this was the Shawnees intention. A scuffle broke out, and marksmen from both sides opened fire. Despite a few injuries, the Americans managed to scramble back into the fort. The Indians rushed the gate but were driven back by heavy gunfire. Negotiations were over; the formal siege had begun.SiegeGunfire was exchanged over the next several days. After the initial flurry of shooting, Boone&mdash;who reemerged as the natural leader even though as a captain he was outranked by Major Smith and Colonel Callaway&mdash;urged the Kentuckians to conserve their gunpowder. At night, Native Americans ran up to the walls and attempted to throw burning torches onto the roofs of the houses within. This was ineffective, however, because the warriors made easy targets for the Kentucky marksmen.On September 11, Dagneaux de Quindre, in command of the Detroit militia, convinced the Indians to begin digging a tunnel from the bank of the river towards the fort. Known as mining, the goal was to place barrels of gunpowder in the tunnel under a section of the forts walls. When these barrels were exploded, the wall would collapse, leaving a place for the attackers to rush in. When the defenders inside the fort heard the digging, they began to dig a countermine, hoping to collapse the attackers tunnel prematurely. The diggers on both sides began to yell taunts at each other. Heavy rains caused the Indians tunnel to collapse before it reached the fort.Boones brother Boone was known as an inventor. He fashioned a makeshift wooden cannon, reinforced with iron bands, which was fired once or twice at groups of Indians before it cracked. Squire Boone also made squirt guns out of old musket barrels, which were used to put out fires on the roofs.The Shawnees launched their final assault on September 17, again trying to set fire to the fort. They were beaten back, and a heavy rain helped to put out the fires. The Shawnees lost more men killed in this attack than on all previous days. The next day, they gradually broke off the siege. They separated into scattered war parties and raided other settlements, inflicting far more damage in their traditional mode of warfare than they had done during the siege.(Faragher, p. 198.)The two Boonesborough Siege casualites at (http://www.bondurant-family.org/history/Daniel%20Boone.html) and (http://www.dhyatt.com/history_4_frontier.html)AftermathAfter the siege, Colonel Richard Callaway brought charges against Boone, alleging that Boone was in favour of the British government. Joining Callaway was Captain Logan from nearby Logans Station. Logan and Callaway both had nephews who had been surrendered by Boone at the salt licks and were still prisoners. In the court-martial proceedings, held at Logans Fort, there were four charges against Boone::#Boone had surrendered the salt making party without a fight;:#While in captivity, Boone had promised to surrender Boonesborough to the British;:#After his return, he had led the Paint Lick expedition, which weakened Boonesborough at a time when Blackfishs army was expected;:#Boone had exposed the officers to ambush by agreeing to meet the Indians at the peace treaty outside the fort.After listening to all the testimony, the court found Boone not guilty, and even promoted him to major because of his actions. Despite this vindication, Boone was humiliated by the episode and rarely spoke of it again.(Court-martial: Faragher, pp. 199&ndash;202; Lofaro, pp. 105&ndash;106.)Boone then went to North Carolina to retrieve his family, who had returned there during his captivity, believing him to be dead. When Boone came back to Kentucky, he established a new settlement called Station rather than resettle in the place where he had been court-martialed.While Boone was in North Carolina, a retaliatory raid was launched against Blackfishs town of Chillicothe in the spring of 1779. Blackfish successfully defended his village but was shot in the leg and later died when the wound became infected. On March 8, 1780, Richard Callaway was caught outside Boonesborough by Shawnees and was killed, scalped, and mutilated.The siege of Boonesborough was dramatized in an episode of the 1964 CBS television series The Great Adventure, with Peter Graves starring as Daniel Boone. The events are now reenacted yearly at Boonesborough State Park.Notes(References*Bakeless, John. Daniel Boone: Master of the Wilderness. Originally published 1939, reprinted University of Nebraska Press, 1989. ISBN 0-8032-6090-3*Draper, Lyman Copeland. The Life of Daniel Boone. Written in the 19th century but unpublished; edited by Ted Franklin Belue and published in Mechanicsburg, Pennsylvania: Stackpole Books, 1998. ISBN 0-8117-0979-5*Elliott, Lawrence. The Long Hunter: A New Life of Daniel Boone. New York: Readers Digest Press, 1976. ISBN 0-88349-066-8*Faragher, John Mack. Daniel Boone: The Life and Legend of an American Pioneer. New York: Holt, 1992. ISBN 0-8050-1603-1*Lofaro, Michael A. Daniel Boone: An American Life. Lexington, Kentucky: University Press of Kentucky, 2003. ISBN 0-8131-2278-3External links*The Fort Boonesborough Foundation*List of people in Boonesborough during the siege*Photographs from the 2005 reenactment of the siegeav Boonesborough
6131861
Northeast_Coast_National_Scenic_Area
The Northeast Coast National Scenic Area () is an area in Northeastern Taiwan with special geographical and historical distinction.  Location The Scenic Area ranges from Nanya Borough, District, Taipei in the north to North Porth of Toucheng Town, Yilan County, and covers Rueifang and Gongliao Townships of New Taipei and Toucheng Township of Yilan. History In December 1979, the Report for Northeast Coast Special Scenic Area Planning by the Tourism Bureau, Department of Transportation of the ROC (Taiwan) was commended to Chengchi University and was ratified by Yuan in February 1982.The Scenic Area was founded on June 1, 1984 and promoted to a National Scenic Area on July 1, 1995. Administration The duties of the Northeast Coast National Scenic Area Administration include maintenance and patrol of the area. They also provide information and services, such as online applications for:* Visiting Island* Pleasure-boat sailing and docking at ports of the Longdongwan preservation area.* A multimedia guide to the Scenic AreaThe Administration Office is located at No. 36 Singlong St., Fulong Village, Gongliao Country, just near the Fulong Bathing Beach. Scenic spots * Jinguashi and Jioufen, the main gold mining site of Taiwan during the Dynasty and Japanese rule.* Cape* Bay* Coastal Park and golden beaches* Beach* Rock Fishing Area around Shicheng Borough, Toucheng Town* Ancient Trail, a trail built during the Ching Dynasty between Dali Borough, Toucheng Town and Gongliao Country.* Honeymoon Bay* Island, visiting the island or whale watching* Park, for watching crashing wavesExternal links* Northeast Coast National Scenic Area Administration official websitezh:
6149852
Fay_Gillis_Wells
Fay Gillis Wells (October 15, 1908-December 2, 2002) was a pioneer aviator, globe-trotting journalist and distinguished broadcaster.	In 1929 she was the first woman pilot to bail out of an airplane to save her life and helped found the Ninety-Nines, the international organization of licensed women pilots.  As a journalist she corresponded from the Soviet Union in the 1930s, covered wars and pioneered overseas radio broadcasting with her husband, the noted reporter Wells, and was a House correspondent from 1963 to 1977.  During the 1930s and 40s she and her husband carried out sensitive government missions in Africa.  For many years she actively promoted world friendship through flying. Born in Minneapolis, she grew up in various towns in the US and Canada following her father, Julius H. Gillis, a mining engineer.  She was graduated from the Battin High School in Elizabeth New Jersey in 1925, and studied at State University, but left before graduation to pursue other interests.  In August 1929 she began flying. On September 1st, 1929 she became the first woman pilot to be a member of the Club (bailing out of an airplane to save her life) when her plane disintegrated during aerobatics over Long Island.  She soon became the first air saleswoman and demonstrator hired by the Curtiss Flying Service.  Later that year she helped found the Ninety Nines, and served as its first secretary, with Earhart as the first president.  At the time of her death she was one of four charter members remaining active.From 1930-34, while in the Union with her father, she traveled as a correspondent covering aviation activities for the New York Herald Tribune, and as a special reporter for the New York Times and Associated Press.  While there she was the first American woman to fly a Soviet civil airplane and the first foreigner to own a Soviet glider.  She also handled the logistics in Russia for famed aviator Wiley Posts solo round-the-world flight in 1933, and was the New York Times correspondent at the coronation of Emperor Pu Yi of Manchukuo in 1934.In 1935 she was planning to accompany Post on another round-the-world flight when she eloped with the distinguished foreign correspondent Linton Wells (1893-1976).  They spent their honeymoon covering the Italian invasion of Abyssinia (Ethiopia) and the Syrian riots for the Herald Tribune.  Wiley Post got Will Rogers replace her on the flight, on which both later were killed.While in Ethiopia Linton gave Fay a leopard cub for Christmas. They named her The Queen of Sheba, but called her Snooks. Snooks was not the only exotic pet Fay had. Over her life, Fay had two cheetahs, a lemur, and a small fox from the Sahara Desert. After covering Hollywood for the Herald Tribune in 1936, she and her husband pioneered overseas radio broadcasts from Latin America in 1938 for Magic Key of RCA.(Dunning, John, On the Air: The Encyclopedia of Old-Time Radio, Oxford University Press, New York, 1998, p. 422. ISBN 0-19-507678-8) She was a founding member of the Overseas Press Club and helped establish the Amelia Earhart Memorial Scholarships.  In 1939, at the suggestion of President Roosevelt, she and her husband investigated potential African locations for a Jewish homeland.  After the outbreak of the war, they headed the US Commercial Company in West Africa buying strategic materials for the war effort.Returning to the states after the birth of her son Linton II in Luanda in 1946, she was a full-time mother, living for a time on a houseboat.  Ever imaginative, she designed yacht interiors, wrote a syndicated column called Nautical Notebook for the Herald Tribune, and got a patent on a furniture design for boats.She came to Washington in 1963 to open the Washington News Bureau for the Storer Broadcasting Company (then the largest privately owned radio and television network in the US).  From 1964 to 1977 she served as Storers White House correspondent.  She was the first female broadcaster accredited to the White House, and one of three women reporters chosen to accompany President Nixon to China in 1972.During this period she renewed her association with flying and education, beginning with the Amelia Earhart stamp in 1962.  She was chairman of the first international 99s convention in 1967 and began encouraging the use of flying and the planting of trees to promote international friendship.  In 1976, during the Bicentennial year, this led to the creation of the International Forest of Friendship in Atchison, Kansas, Amelia Earharts home town.  From 1976 she served as Co-General Chairman for the annual ceremonies at the Forest, and was actively planning future events at the time of her death.  She also worked to establish several scholarship funds.Fay Gillis Wells received many awards in the fields of aviation and broadcasting.  These included:  1972 Woman of the Year by OX5 Aviation Pioneers, 1984 Womens Aerospace Achievement Award, 1998 Esther Van Wagoner Tufty Award for broadcasting and personal achievement, 2001 Katherine Wright Award for outstanding contributions to aviation, 2002 Amelia Earhart Pioneering Achievement Award, and the American Women in Radio and Television Lifetime Achievement Award.  In 1995, Gene and Carolyn Shoemaker, famous discoverers of comets and asteroids, named Asteroid 4820 in her honor.She was survived by a brother Ken Gillis, of Franklin, Michigan, her son Wells II and daughter-in-law Linda M. Wells, of Springfield, Virginia, grandsons Linton Wells III and Frank M. Wells, and several nieces and nephews.  The International Forest of Friendship continues as a living memorial to her contributions.ReferencesExternal linksAn in-depth interview by Ron David was rebroadcast on NosillaCast shows #52 and #53.Cumulatus Laude https://docs.google.com/Doc?dociddhf6v9x4_642fcsg29jk&hlen is a Tribute to Ms. Wells by Ron David published on October 15th, 2008 - the 100th Anniverversary of her birth. It  includes the interviews mentioned above.Gillis Wells
6157604
Norden_railway_station
Norden railway station is a railway station located half a mile to the north of the village of Corfe Castle, on the of Purbeck in the English county of Dorset. It is the northern-most station on Railway, a railway that currently operates from Norden to Swanage. A and Ride site is adjacent to the station, and visitors can leave their cars, and ride the train to the beautiful village of Corfe Castle and the popular seaside destination of Swanage.The Norden Nest Buffet is open at Norden station on most operating days. The site is also the home of the Mineral and Mining Museum. History  The Swanage Railway follows the route of the former and South Western Railway line from Wareham to Swanage, a line that opened in 1885 and was finally closed by Rail in 1972. From the time of closure, a strong campaign to reopen the railway as a locomotive operated railway developed, and the Swanage Railway began operating a steam service at the Swanage end of the line in 1982. As the line was progressively extended northwards towards Corfe Castle, concerns grew that terminating the line there would make existing parking problems in the picturesque village worse. It was therefore decided to extend the line the further half a mile to Norden, and build a Park and Ride site there.()Although there was never a passenger station at Norden prior to the opening of the current station in 1995, the station is built on the site of the former Norden Ball clay works. These works were served by a siding off the Wareham to Swanage railway, and also by two gauge railways that connected the Ball clay pits to the works, and the works to small ports on the south side of Harbour.  The earliest of these was the Plateway, a horse-drawn plateway that opened in 1806 and was Dorsets first railway.  At the beginning of the 20th century this was superseded by Tramway, a conventional locomotive hauled railway. After the Second World War this railway was replaced with a local system that ran across the Skew Bridge at the eastern end of the station to the mines on the southern side of the A351. Because of this heritage, the Swanage Railway is developing the Purbeck Mineral and Mining Museum on the site at Norden.() Services Services run every day from the beginning of April to late October, with weekend only operation in March, November and December. The level of service varies from 6 to 17 trains a day in each direction, depending the season and the day of the week. Trains from Norden travel southbound to stations at Corfe Castle (2 mins), Harmans Cross (12 mins), Herston (trains stop only on request), and Swanage (23 mins).()Although track is now complete through to the junction with Rail at Worgret Junction, the normal service on the Swanage Railway still terminates at Norden. Special services occasionally work to and from the main line. References  External links * Purbeck Mineral & Mining Museum web site
6163442
The_Buoys
The Buoys was a rock band from the early 1970s.  Its membership included Bill Kelly, Fran Brozena, Jerry Hludzik, Carl Siracuse and Chris Hanlon, based in the Wilkes-Barre-Pennsylvania area.  Bob Gryziec was the original bass player and a member of the group when they recorded Timothy. Hits by Rupert HolmesThey are most famous for their recording of Holmess Timothy, a song deliberately written to get banned, based on a theme of cannibalism.  Holmes himself selected the group to record the song, although The Glass Prism had been his first choice.  Because The Glass Prism were under contract to RCA, Holmes and C. Michael Wright had to go to their Plan B.  Recorded at Scepter Recording Studios in New York City and released by Records, with whom the Buoys had been signed but previously ignored, the song hit #17 on US charts in 1971.  The song was recorded after the 1963 mine cave-in in PA, a small mining community outside of Hazleton, PA.  Rupert Holmes told rock journalist Maxim Furek, I learned about the Sheppton Mine Disaster after Timothy was on the charts.  If I had known about that at the time, I probably never would have written the song because I dont want to make fun of something thats tragic.(Furek, Maxim W. The Pina Colada Man: Northeastern PAs Adopted Son Comes Home to Crow. Timothy, 1981.)Scepter executives did not catch what the song was about until after it started climbing the charts, after which they claimed that Timothy was a mule, a concept Holmes found more offensive than cannibalism, which he intended.  Holmes, with D. Jordan, wrote a less-successful hit for them titled Give Up Your Guns, an epic narrative dealing with an escaped bank robber.  Much more serious in tone than their previous hit, Give Up Your Guns reached only #84.  By contrast it was a massive hit twice in mainland Europe, when originally released, and when re-released in 1979.  Holmes wrote a number of other songs for the band, including The Prince of Thieves, Blood Knot, and Tomorrow, most of which had much of the darkness but little of the humor of Timothy.  Like Give Up Your Guns, they are complaints by criminals.  Holmes now writes Broadway musicals.Additional songsTheir other songs, written by the band without Holmes, include the following:*Sunny Days/Memories*Tell Me Heaven Is Here*Castles*Streams Together*Good Lovin*Pittsburgh Steel*Absent Friend*Sunny Days*Look Back America*Lizas Last RideIn addition, the songs Dont Try to Run and Dreams were written by Brozena, Kelly, and Hludzik only.StyleMusically The Buoys combined CSN-style harmonies blended with assorted musical approaches. Their eclectic style combines piano as a major instrument, with guitar, drums, strings, winds, brass, and harp, but tends to vary in sound heavily from the 1950s n roll sound (Good Lovin, Sunny Days) to more 1960s-influenced songs of protest (Look Back America, Pittsburgh Steel), 1930s-style pop like These Days, to Renaissance-influenced prog like Castles.  Without Holmes, the darker lyrical aspects largely went away, though Pittsburgh Steel contains more dark humor; Pittsburgh steelworkers plot to kill their foreman by dumping him in a vat of ore.Then and NowAfter The Buoys, Bill Kelly and Jerry Hludzik teamed up as The Jerry-Kelly Band. In 1980 they formed a band called Dakota. Dakato toured the country as the opening act for Queen. The national sold-out tour took them to places such as Baton Rouge, Montreal, Toronto, Philadelphia, Houston and Atlanta. Danny Seraphine of Chicago, produced several albums for them. The group reformed, again in the 1990s with several new members, playing folk-country influenced rock.  An album on disc of eighteen of The Buoys songs was released in 1993 by S.A., Inc., and Records, in some markets as Give Up Your Guns and in others as Timothy:  Golden Classics.  Both albums contained the same cover image:  a vintage photograph by Ochs of the five core band members standing before the entrance of a building, under an awning that says Timothy.  On the right, Give Up Your Guns is spraypainted on the wall of the building.  This includes most of their pressed recordings, although an alternate B-side take of Lizas Last Ride did not make it on.  According to Rupert Holmess webmaster, this pressing is unauthorized and neither Holmes nor the Buoys receive any royalties from its sales.The band Dakota disbanded in 1987. Bill Kelly has relocated to Nashville where he operates Sweet Suite Music. Jerry Hludzik moved to Philadelphia where he operates the cryptic Last Man Standing. Kelly and Hludzik have regrouped several times as The Buoys, but with a different lineup of musicians.References(*Nash, Bruce, and Allan Zullo.  The Wacky Top 40:  The Most Outrageous, Hilarious, and Unforgettable Songs in Pop History.  Massachusetts: Bob Adams, Inc., 1993.*Chisak, Richard. Is There Life After the Garden? The Dakota-Queen Tour. Timothy. March, 1981.BuoysBuoys
6170159
Mara_Sumire
File:Marchanativos3.jpg|right|150px|thumb|Sumire in an indigenous march in downtown Lima.sumire2.JPG|thumb|150px|right|Mara Sumire in a meeting in front of Legislative PalaceMara Cleof Sumire de Conde (born in an indigenous community in Province, Region) is a Peruvian politician. She is currently a Congresswoman representing Cusco for the period 2006-2011, and belongs to the for Peru party.Mara Sumire is the daughter of the founder of the Peasants Federation of Cusco (Federacin Departamental de Campesinos del Cusco), Sumire, and was raised in the community of Collachapi (Layo district, Canas province, Cusco region). Her mother tongue is Quechua.Dr. Sumire is an experienced lawyer from Cusco, who has provided legal advice for the Farmer Federation of Cusco in its struggle for land and womens organizations. She is a member of the Evangelical Methodist Church, a leader of the Association of Andean Women (AMA) and was one of the  1,000 women candidates for the 2005 Nobel Peace Prize.She said that she will seek to legislate in favor of the development of poor communities from the southern Andes and the decentralization process in the country. Moreover, she will seek to monitor regional governments and to battle against corruption.She was elected to the Peruvian Congress in 2006, where she was the second Peruvian parliamentarian who was sworn in in Quechua, immediately after her fellow congresswoman Supa, for which both were sharply criticized by Hildebrandt and some other members of Congress.(Dina Ludea Cebrin: Lengua quechua - del miedo y desprecio al respeto y visibilizacin.)(Mayra Castillo: En el nombre del quechua. El Comercio, 31 de marzo de 2007)Mara Sumire focuses on indigenous language and land rights of the poor communities in the Andes and indigenous people across Peru. After supporting protests of indigenous people against mining in the Amazon in 2009, she and several other congressmen were suspended for three months.External links*Mara Sumire: CV (Congreso del Per, in Spanish)*Mara Sumires personal blogReferences(SumireSumireSumire
6176832
Bushiribana_and_Balashi
Bushiribana and Balashi are the sites of two former gold smelters on the Caribbean island of Aruba. Bushiribana The Bushiribana smelter was built in 1872 by the Aruba Island Gold Mining Company to extract gold from the ore that was being mined in the nearby hills of Plat. It operated for ten years. Today, its remains are a stopping-off point for tourists on their way to view the Natural Bridge, which collapsed on September 2, 2005. Balashi Balashi, at the southern end of Pass, is where the Aruba Gold Concessions company built a gold smelter in 1899. It closed in 1916, during the First World War, for lack of raw materials and spare parts, most of which came from Germany.
6188077
Hurricane_Creek_(Alabama)
Hurricane Creek is a tributary of the Warrior River located in Southwestern County in western Alabama.  It is over 30 miles long and its watershed covers approximately 120 square miles.  It is used by communities around it, including the city of Tuscaloosa, for recreation and offers a wide variety of aquatic life and quality aesthetics.  Three areas of this stream are on the federal 303(d) list of impaired streams, meaning they are protected by the Water Act from further degradation.  Current threats to water quality include active coal mining, abandoned mine lands, siltation, and some areas with high coliform bacteria levels.External links*The Friends of Hurricane Creek
6200072
Ontario_Highway_532
next_route      533Secondary Highway 532, commonly referred to as Highway 532, is a provincially maintained secondary highway in the Canadian province of Ontario. The route connects several mining and milling towns in Algoma District, notably Searchmont. The route is remote, ending at a mine access road  north of Highway 556, its southern terminus.A former designation of Highway 532 travelled through Muskoka along the Sound Colonization Road and was redesignated as Highway 141 in 1974. At that time, the present route was established following what was until then a segment of Highway 556. It has remained unchanged since then. Route description The southern terminus of the highway is at Highway 556,  south of Searchmont. It is the only highway that passes through the community and connects with the entrance to the Resort Ski Area. Just north of the town, the paved surface ends as the highway becomes a rough, hilly dirt road with blind corners. The highway passes through the hamlet of Wabos, and approximately  to the northeast comes upon a left-hand turn where a sign indicates that Highway 532 ends.( The route is  long.( History The current route of Highway 532 was first assumed by the of Highways in early 1956, along with several dozen other secondary highways. It was likely maintained as a development road prior to that. It formed the final  of Highway 556.()()The original use of the Highway 532 designation was in southern Ontario. In 1956, this route was designated along the Parry Sound Colonization Road between Highway 69 at Corners and the former route of Highway 11 at Falkenburg, north of Bracebridge. When the Highway 11 bypass east of Bracebridge was completed and the old route decomissioned in 1958, Highway 532 was extended south through Bracebridge to Falls.()The route remained this way until January 1, 1973, when the Municipality of Muskoka was formed. Unlike most other secondary highways in the new municipality, the route was not decommissioned entirely, but rerouted southeast of Raymond. Instead of travelling south through Beatrice, Falkenburg and Bracebrige, the route continued east along what was Highway 516, passing through Utterson and ending at Highway 11.()This new routing was short-lived; in 1974, the entirety of the highway was upgraded to a Kings Highway and redesignated Highway 141. Highway 532 assumed its current routing through Algoma that same year,()and has remained unchanged since then.( Major intersections The following table lists the major junctions along Highway 532. The entirety of the route is located within District.(){| classwikitable stylewidth:100%;|-!scopecol|Location!scopecol|km(!scopecol|Destinations!scopecol|Notes|-|rowspan2|Algoma District|0.0|||-|14.2|Christina Mine Road| References 
6213703
SPMI
SPMI May refer to:* Petersburg Mining Institute* Serious/severe and persistent illness* Party of Michigan party
6223285
Feldbahn
thumb|Feldbahn locomotive from World War 1A Feldbahn is the German term for a gauge railway, usually not open to the public, which in its simplest form provides for the transportation of agricultural, forestry () and industrial raw materials such as wood, peat, stone, earth and sand. Such goods are often transported in tipper wagons, known in German as , hence such a railway is also referred to as a .Military useDuring the First World War, the enormous logistical demands of warfare led to the development of military narrow gauge railway or  networks, also referred to as railways. Throughout World War I, the British and French also used trench railways, called Department Light Railways and Decauville Railways respectively. However, the German approach was less improvised and more permanent. With each successful advance, the British and French forces faced ever lengthening supply lines, while the Germans retreated deeper into their homeland. As a result, the  was an organic growth of existing agricultural, industrial and mining railways. After the war, much remaining trackage and rolling stock was put to use in more conventional narrow gauge applications throughout Europe. General use In the processing industry, these narrow-gauge railways once held an important role. As a result, Feldbahnen were frequently associated with refractory clay factories, brickyards, sugar factories and iron and steel mills. They were also used for pulling canal barges, transporting military materiel and personnel and removing materials from large-scale building sites and the rubble from ruined cities after the Second World War. gauges were between  and .The track (rails and sleepers) utilised, ranged from light, rail frames that could be carried and laid by two men and were often laid directly on the ground with no trackbed, to properly laid, ballasted lines for heavy loads and extended use.  Tight curves enabled lines to be more easily routed, largely without structures being required, even in difficult terrain. Provisional track laid along the edges of ditches as they were being extended forward, often on soft ground, led occasionally to derailments. As a result, on many , wooden planks and other lifting gear were carried. Turntables were usually operated by hand.Simple and robust vehicles characterised everyday operations. Locomotives were not always at the coal face, so it was quite common for individual wagons - even when loaded - to be moved with horses or by human muscle power alone. In tight spaces or where access was difficult, the help of children and youngsters was enlisted to haul tipper wagons.Frequently rolling stock was hand-built or was manufactured to order in small batches. Usually no signals were installed, the low speeds enabling trains to be driven by sight. At level crossings on larger roads, temporary bells or light signals were installed, that enabled trains to cross safely.A special type of  were the engineering railways () of the former Germany. These were laid for training and maintenance purposes in the parks of several cities including Berlin, Magdeburg, Dresden and Halle. They were usually run by children and young people under adult supervision. These engineering lines were (and are), unlike the other , open to the public and sometimes have signal boxes and extensive rail safety equipment (like the Pionier-Eisenbahnen).In the munitions depots of the German Federal Navy (), narrow-gauge railways with a rail gauge of  were used to move ammunition and materiel. In the depot at Laboe type S 14 () rail profiles were laid and later changed to new S 20 () rails . One type DS 60 locomotive and 18 DIEMA DS 90 locomotives were used. The railway stock there also included a fire fighting train, a blower and even a rotary snow plough. Three seated coaches were available for the transport of personnel. The line at Aurich depot was closed in 1982 and last operations in Laboe took place in 1993. Finally, in December 1996, the Laboe railway was closed. Its total track length was . A DS 90 locomotive, no. 9, is still in the depot at Laboe as a memorial. Todays situation The use of  has reduced dramatically in the last 40 years, as their tasks have been taken on by lorries and  electrically driven conveyor belts. They are now used only where the ground conditions (e.g. moorland or peat bogs) or lack of space (mining) render the routine use of other means impractical. The  is still widely used in Germany in industrial peat extraction, especially in Saxony and Schleswig-Holstein. In addition they are still used occasionally in brickworks and other industrial premises. As a result increasing numbers of museums and societies dedicate themselves to the protection of historical  railways. This includes efforts in many places to restore closed  again and to give them new life as museum railways. Feldbahn museums and working lines  Germany  Baden-Wrttemberg railway in the Wurzacher Ried* Bad Wurzach* Buchen* Mannheim, Technoseum* Neckarbischofsheim* Spiegelberg* Wiesloch Bavaria * Frstenfeldbruck: Frstenfeldbruck Model Railway Club* Hengersberg* Nrnberg: Feldbahn Museum 500* Rottau am Chiemsee: Bavarian Moor and Peat Museum* Oswald-Riedlhtte: Riedlhtte Feldbahn and Waldbahn, 600 mm, Length: 1 km* Petersaurach/Rgland (district): Franconian Feldbahn Museum Berlin * Berlin - FEZ Wuhlheide: 500 mm Feldbahn project at FEZ Wuhlheide* Berlin - Garten: 600 mm museum railway (built from Feldbahn components on the former BUGA site, several vehicles are replicas of historic prototypes) Brandenburg * Mildenberg: Mildenberg Brickworks Park, 2 clay tipper railways, 500 and 630 mm Hesse * am Main: Frankfurt Feldbahn Museum* Bad Schwalbacher Kurbahn* SolmsOberbiel: Feldbahn and Fortuna Pit Railway Museum* Bad Orber Light Railway: reactivated in 2002 with a Feldbahn track Mecklenburg-Vorpommern * Schwerin: Historical Agriculture Museum* Slze: salt museum, peat railway Lower Saxony * Baltrum: island railway for luggage transportation, 19491985* Burgsittensen: Moor Railway* Deinste: German Feldbahn and Kleinbahn Museum* Diepenau: Uchter Moor Railway* DrochtersenAschhorn: Moorkieker Moor Railway* Eichenberg: Eichenberger Waldbahn* Essern: Essern Moor Railway* Fredenbeck-Wedel: Wedel Feldbahn* FreistattHeimstatt: deaconry* Flgeln: Ahlenmoor Moor Railway* Goldenstedt-Arkeburg: Nature information centre* Gro-Hesepe: Emsland Moor Museum* Hildesheim: Hildesheim Feldbahn Museum* Oog  Minsener Oog Coastal Defence Railway (Lorenbahn for light goods traffic)* am Rbenberge* Ostercappeln-Hitzhausen: museum for narrow gauge industrial railways* Sassenburg-Westerbeck: moor railway and Euflor Peat Works (part of the moor nature trail at www.moorlehrpfad.de)* SaterlandRamsloh: moor railway services, Koch Peat Works* Wiesmoor: Peat and Settlers Museum North Rhine-Westphalia * Lengerich Lengerich Railway Society* Lage: Feldbahn in the WIM Lage Brickworks* Oekoven: Feldbahn museum* Witten-Bommern: Theresia Mine Pit and Feldbahn Museum* Railway Museum* Schermbeck-Gahlen Feldbahn* Eslohe Mechanical and Local History Museum Rhineland-Palatinate * Ems: Pit railway in the Ems Mining Museum* Guldental* (Pfalz): Waldbahn stub line* Serrig: estate Saxony - Blick auf das Areal des Feldbahnmuseums - geograph.org.uk - 9281.jpg|thumb|Saxony: View of the Feldbahn Museum in Herrenleite* Chemnitz: Feldbahn in the Railway Museum* Glossen bei Oschatz: Feldbahn viewing point* Leipzig-Lindenau: Museum Feldbahn, 800 mm* Lindenau (Radebeul): Radebeul-Lindenau sawmill Feldbahn* Lbau: Werners Garden Railway* Lohmen: Herrenleite Feldbahn Museum, Dresden Historic Feldbahn* Niederwrschnitz (bei Chemnitz): Old Brickworks Feldbahn Saxony-Anhalt * Elbingerode: pit railway* Bennstedt: Feldbahn under construction* Schlanstedt: Schlanstedt Historic Feldbahn* Drrenberg 1836 opening of the TollwitzDrrenberger Feldbahn (4,5 km) with the first German railway tunnel (133 m) Schleswig-Holstein * Aumhle near Hamburg: 600mm Feldbahn on the terrain of the VVM* Bramstedt* Bad Malente Gremsmhlen* Neritz-Flogensee, chicken farm,  600 mm, length 300 m* Tolk-Schau in Tolk near Schleswig (Stadt)* Nordstrandischmoor island: island railway* The line to the halligs of Oland and Langene are built to a 900mm gauge which is uncommon amongst Feldbahnen. (however the definition of a Feldbahn is not a question of gauge, but rather of purpose and operation.)* Buchhorster Waldbahn, as museum railway operated remaining line of the former brickworks and matchworks near Lauenburg an der Elbe. Thuringia * Ilfeld - Netzkater: pit railway* Ilmenau: in the Rose Show Mine* Lichtenhain: Waldeisenbahn* Trusetal: Hhn Pit - pit railway Austria * Lower Austria: Freiland in Trnitz, Feldbahn and industrial railway museum* Lower Austria: im Gebirge, Rotte Nawald: Nawald Waldbahn* Lower Austria: Schwechat, Schwechat Railway Museum* Upper Austria: Wels, Scholz Feldbahn http://home.tele2.at/~at-19649/Versuche/Vorlage.htm* Vienna: Geriatriezentrum Am Wienerwald Feldbahn* Salzburg: Diabesbahn Saalfelden (closed in 2008 and replaced by a standard gauge line)* Salzburg: Grogmain Museum Feldbahn (rebuilt in 2009) Austria/Switzerland * Lustenau: International Rhine Control Railway (Bahn der internationalen Rheinregulierung) Switzerland * Schinznach-Dorf: Schinznach Nursery Railway (www.schbb.ch)* Otelfingen: Swiss Feldbahn and Werkbahn Society Czech Republic * Kolnsk epask drka: sugar beet line (Rbenbahn) Literature * Dierk Lawrenz: Feldbahnen in Deutschland, Franckhsche Verlagshandlung, Stuttgart 1982, ISBN 3-440-05114-5 (Die schmalspurigen Industriebahnen und ihre Fahrzeuge)* Claus Schubert: Feldbahnen in Sddeutschland, Klaus Rabe, Kln 1989, ISBN 3-926071-03-6* Andreas Christopher: Die Feldbahn, Ingrid Zeunert, Gifhorn 1989, ISBN 3-924335-11-7 (Feldbahnbetriebe in Deutschland)* Andreas Christopher: Die Feldbahn, Band 2, Ingrid Zeunert, Gifhorn 1990, ISBN 3-924335-13-3 (Feldbahnbetriebe in sterreich)* Frank Harding/ Andreas Christopher: Die Feldbahn, Band 9, Zeunert, Gifhorn 2007, ISBN 3-924335-54-0 (Feldbahnbetriebe in der ehemaligen DDR)* Winfried Barth/ Andreas Christopher: Feldbahnen in Hessen, Drehscheibe, Kln 2002, ISBN 3-929082-22-5 (Industriebetriebe, Sammlungen, Denkmler)* Harald Becher: Feldbahnen in Thringen, Band 1, Rockstuhl, Bad Langensalza 2002, ISBN 3-934748-96-1 (Feldbahnen in Bad Langensalza, Erfurt-Gispersleben, Gotha, Hngeda/Seebach, Laucha, Straussfurt und Stregda) See also *Decauville*railway*Heeresfeldbahn - German and Austrian military field railways*of rail transport in Germany*railway*Department Light RailwaysExternal links* There is an English-language discussion forum at Railways of Germanyde:Feldbahneo:Kampofervojo
6226723
Glentunnel
Glentunnel is a small village in the District of the Canterbury region of Zealands Island.  It is officially recognised as a populated area less than a town.()  The 2001 Zealand Census of Population and Dwellings gave Glentunnels population as 129.  It is located on State Highway 77 and was served by the Branch, a line railway, from the lines opening on 3 November 1875 through to its closure on 31 March 1962.  Few remnants of the railway remain in the town, with the stations platform incorporated into the backyard of a private residence.(David Leitch and Brian Scott, Exploring New Zealands Ghost Railways, revised edition (Wellington: Grantham House, 1998 1995), 71-2.)Industrial activity such as lignite coal mining and the manufacture of pottery and bricks used to take place in the region around Glentunnel.  This was the reason the railway was built, but activity declined sharply in the 20th century and has been effectively non-existent since the 1980s.(Selwyn District Council, Glentunnel and Coalgate, accessed 19 May 2008.)The historic Deans family homestead located in Glentunnel was extensively damaged by the Canterbury earthquake, so much so that it has been described as being practically in ruins.()References
6242477
John_Williams_(Welsh_politician)
John Williams (1861&ndash;20 June 1922) was a Welsh Labour Party politician.Williams was a Miners Agent, a close associate of William Abraham and a prominent Liberal-Labour politician.  At the 1906 general election, Williams was first elected as of Parliament for the Welsh constituency of Gower in Glamorgan. He stood as a Liberal-Labour candidate and won election despite being opposed by a Liberal candidate. Upon election he took the Liberal whip and was active the in the Liberal partys Trade Union group. When the miners Federation of Great Britain decided to affiliate to the Labour party in 1909, along with the other welsh mining MPs, he joined the Labour party.He held his seat until his death in 1922, at the age of 60.References*
6253266
Bankhead,_Alberta
Bankhead, Alberta was a small mining town that existed in the early twentieth century, in National Park, near the town of Alberta. The mine was located at Cascade Mountain, which contains high grade anthracite coal deposits. The Bankhead coal mine was operated by the Pacific Coal Company, a subsidiary of the Pacific Railway, which needed the coal to fuel its engines. The mine began operations in 1903. A local newspaper report published 17 June 1922 indicated that notices of the closure of the Bankhead Mines had recently been posted through that town.  The notices made it clear that on and after 15 July the staff of Bankhead Mines would not be required and the coal operations would cease.  The report concluded:  This would indicate that after the above date Bankhead will be a dead town so far as coal mining is concerned.(Crag & Canyon 17 June 1922 / Bankhead mines Closing)  This report concluded that no reasons were given for the closure, although it was generally understood that mining there had not been profitable.  There had been a strike at the mine two months before this announcement, and the mines had been closed since that time.  Another report on the mine closure noted that around 200 to 300 men were employed there with the output of coal running between 500 to 600 tons per day.  The town population was around 1,000 people.(Crag & Canyon 24 June 1922 / Mine Closed Permanently)All of Bankheads buildings were built and owned by the company and rented to the residents.(Crag & Canyon 24 June 1922 / Mine Closed Permanently)  In 1926, many of the towns buildings were moved to Banff and Canmore. The Bankhead Railway Station now sits on the grounds of the Banff Hostel on Tunnel Mountain Road. It has a map of the Bankhead townsite posted outside its front door.Today, an interpretive trail runs through Lower Bankhead. Signs are placed along the trail identifying the major buildings, as well as other interesting facts. Many foundations of buildings are visible. One building remains intact and contains displays viewed through the windows. Remains of the town are also visible adjacent to the Upper Bankhead parking lot.Bankhead is located on the Minnewanka road, just a few minutes drive from the Banff townsite or the Canada Highway.Near Bankhead was another coal mine, Anthracite. This mine was a failure because of heavy water inflow in the underground. The Anthracite mine shut down in 1904 and was abandoned.See also*of ghost towns in AlbertaReferences* External links*Ghost towns. Bankhead - Alberta, Canada Ghost Town*Bankhead Mines, 1904.  Glenbow Museum Archives*Bankhead, city view, 1890s.  Glenbow Museum Archives*Bankhead man wins Distinguished Conduct Medal at Gallipoli. Crag & Canyon / 06 November 1915*Lt. Horace Lyster of Bankhead wins Military Medal. Crag & Canyon / 08 April 1915(Alberta)
6253371
LHD
LHD can mean:* helical device* Haul Dump, a vehicle used in mining (hard rock)* hand drive, a vehicular transport term* Helicopter Dock, a US Navy hull classification symbol for multipurpose amphibious assault ships of the Wasp class* of Humane Letters, from Latin Litterarum Humanarum Doctor, an honorary academic degree* Heat Detection, a type of alarm system utilized in tunnels and special hazardsde:LHDes:LHDja:LHD
6263652
Margaret_Mee
Margaret Mee, MBE (born 22 May 1909, Chesham, England, UK  died 30 November 1988, Seagrave, Leicestershire, England, UK(Obituary, The Times, 3 December 1988)) was a British artist who specialized in plants from the Brazilian Amazon rainforest. She was also one of the first environmentalists to draw attention to the impact of large-scale mining and deforestation on the Basin.Early lifeMargaret Ursula Brown was born in Whitehill, Chesham in 1909. She attended Challoners Grammar School (Amersham), followed by The School of Art, Science and Commerce (Watford). After a short period of teaching in Liverpool she decided to travel abroad. In 1933 she was in Berlin and witnessed the burning of the Reichstag and subsequent Jewish boycott which confirmed her left-wing views. During the World War she worked in Hatfield as a draughtswoman at the Havilland aircraft factory.(Margaret Mee profile at the Oxford Dictionary of National Biography)Personal lifeMargaret Brown married twice. Firstly to Reginald Bruce Bartlett in January 1936.() Like her husband, she became a committed union activist for the Union of Sign, Glass and Ticket Writers and joined the Communist Party.(Margaret Mee - Artist and Rebel. Nonesuch Expeditions. 1988 Retrieved December 2010) Margaret addressed the TUC in 1937, proposing the raising of the school-leaving age and was subsequently offered, but declined, a job with Bevan. The marriage to Bartlett was not happy and, after long separation, ended in divorce in 1943.(JSTOR Biography of Margaret Mee Retrieved December 2010) She later married Greville Mee who was also attending St. Martins School of Art in the late 1940s.Career as artistAfter the war Margaret studied art at Martins School of Art, London. In 1950 she attended the School of Arts and Crafts, where she learnt her style of illustration, and received a national diploma in painting and design in 1950.She moved to Brazil with Greville Mee, in 1952 to teach art in the British school of Paulo. Her first expedition was in 1956 to Belm in the Basin. She then became a botanical artist for So Paulos de Botanica in 1958, exploring the rainforest and more specifically Amazonas state from 1964, painting the plants she saw, some new to science, as well as collecting some for later illustration. She created 400 folios of gouache illustrations, 40 sketchbooks, and 15 diaries. Margaret travelled to Washington, USA in 1964 and briefly to England in 1968 for the exhibition and publication of her book, Flowers of the Brazilian Forests. She returned to Brazil and joined protests to draw international attention to the deforestation of the Amazon region.(DeathMargaret Mee died following a car crash in Seagrave, Leicestershire on 30 November 1988. She was 79 years old. In January 1989 a memorial to her life, botanical work and environmental campaigning took place in Gardens.(Recognition and honoursIn 1976 she was awarded the MBE for services to Brazilian botany and a fellowship of the Linnean Society in 1986. She also received recognition in Brazil including an honorary citizenship of Rio in 1975, the Brazilian order of Cruzeiro do Sul in 1979, In her honour, after her death the Mee Amazon Trust was founded to further education and research in Amazonian plant life and conservation, by providing scholarships for Brazilian botanical students and plant illustrators who wish to study in the Kingdom or conduct field research in Brazil.( In 1990 Mee was recognised for her environmental achievements by United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) and added to its 500 Roll of Honour. The Diaries of Margaret Mee, which she wrote between 1956 and 1988, were published posthumously in 2004 and included an illustrated account of her expeditions to the Amazonian rainforest.() Most of her illustrations are now part of the Kew Gardens collection.(Brazil: The lady who loved the river)References(Selected bibliography* * * * * * External links*Oppenheimer Kew Gardens Edition*Before the Amazon. Nonesuch expeditions.MeeMeeMee
6279877
Ashfield_by-election,_1977
The Ashfield by-election was held on 28 April 1977 in the Ashfield constituency in the mining area of Nottinghamshire, following the resignation of Labour of Parliament Marquand. Conservative candidate Tim Smith was the narrow winner in what was thought to have been a very safe Labour seat.Marquand had resigned to take up a post at the Commission in Brussels, as an advisor to the Kingdoms newly-appointed Commissioner Jenkins. His majority at the October 1974 general election had been 22,915(UK general election results, October 1974: Aberavon  Banbury at Richard Kimbers Political Science Resources), which made the seat look very safe.There was another by-election held on the same day, in Croslands nearby former seat of Grimsby which looked much more marginal. Crosland had died on February 19 1977. The Labour Party directed most of its campaign effort into saving Grimsby, believing Ashfield was in no danger. This strategy succeeded in saving Grimsby, but allowed Tim Smith to win by 264 votes(1977 by-elections at British Parliamentary By-elections) (after a recount) over Labours Michael Cowan.Smith was unable to hold the seat at the 1979 general election, when Labours Haynes won with a majority of 7,797.ResultsReferences( 
6298855
Riddarhyttan
Riddarhyttan is a locality in Municipality, County, Sweden with 500 inhabitants in 2005.( It has an old iron mining tradition, which can be followed back to the last centuries before Christ, the last mine was closed down in 1979. Geography and geology Riddarhyttan is, along with Skinnskatteberg, one of only two urban areas or localities (more than 200 inhabitants) in the Municipality in the western part of County, on the border to County. It is located in the north of the historical province of Vstmanland. The area of the locality, as defined by Sweden, is 1.5677 km2.(The national road 68 is running through Riddarhyttan and the lake Lien is located next to it.( It lies in the middle of the historically mining district Bergslagen. It is about 30 km to Fagersta, 35 km to Lindesberg and 70 km to Vsters.When the last ice age in Bergslagen came to an end about 9500 years ago, Riddarhyttan was located on the border between land and sea.(( That resulted in kettles, erratics and other specific landforms. When the ice was melting, iron was released from the bedrock into the groundwater and became exposed iron oxide (ochre). That gave rise to a red-colour soil in some parts of Riddarhyttan, especially in the area called Rda Jorden (red earth).( History People started to extract iron from the red earth in the Riddarhyttan area sometime between 700 BC( and 400 BC,( which makes it the oldest area with ironworks in the Bergslagen region. Remains of several primitive furnaces have been found and the age have been established by carbon dating. The iron-making was carried on until about the birth of Christ.(The locality Riddarhyttan dates back to the Ages. Hlsingegruvan and Munkhyttan was mentioned as early as 1420.( It was the State that first commenced mining in the area but private persons, or Bergsmn, were granted to use the mines later on. In 1611, Thomas Hammarsmed was granted the right to erect a forge and an iron blast-furnace.(Iron and steel in Sweden, pp. 6566) References and notes refs()()()( )()() Sources * External links *riddarhyttan.nu *Images of Kllfallet, Bckegruvan and Bastns by Jakob Ehrensvrdnl:Riddarhyttanno:Riddarhyttansv:Riddarhyttan
6314846
Glen_Maye
left|thumb|250px|Waterfall in Glen MayeGlen Maye (or Glenmaye,   Luxuriant Glen) is a small village on the west coast of the of Man, just south of Peel.It is home to the glen of the same name, which is well known for its picturesque waterfall and the sheltered and fern-filled woodland walk through the glen to the small pebble beach on the coast. At the bottom of the glen is the Mona Erin wheelcase, the only visible evidence of the mining that took place here between 1740 and 1870. The glen comprises some  situated on either side of the River, and came into National Heritage ownership in 1960.The village is also known for its house, The Waterfall Hotel, located at the entrance to the glen and near the waterfall itself.External links*Information about Glen Maye*Information about Manx Glens and PlantationsMayeMuighMuighMaye
6318887
Osrblie
Osrblie is a village and municipality in District, in the Bystrica Region of central Slovakia. The village is best known for biathlon races, with World Cup events taking place since the mid 1990s and with one World Championships in 1997.HistoryIn historical records the village was first mentioned in 1580, although it was established much sooner, around the second half of the 15th century, with the reference to the iron ore mining, which lasted until the 19th century.GeographyThe municipality lies at an altitude of 580 metres and covers and area of 24.03km. It has a population of around 430 people.External links* Official website * http://www.statistics.sk/mosmis/eng/run.htmlcs:Osrbliede:Osrblieeo:Osrbliefr:Osrblieit:Osrblie(Szlovkia)nl:Osrbliepl:Osrblie( )sk:Osrbliesv:Osrbliewar:Osrblie
6331094
Atlantic_World
The Atlantic World is an organizing concept for the historical study of the Ocean rim from the beginning of the of Exploration to the anad era. In many ways the history of the Atlantic world culminates in the Revolutions of the late 18th century and early 19th century. slave trade continued into the 19th century, subsiding with the Amendment to the United States Constitution outlawing slavery in 1865 and the abolishment of slavery in Brazil in 1888. The historical subdiscipline concerned with the study of the Atlantic World is history.GeographyThe Atlantic World comprises the five continents bordering the Atlantic Ocean: Europe, Africa, America, America, Antarctica; the Arabian and Caribbean subcontinents are the furthest extent of the Atlantic rim from East to West.  The Sea and Sea in the World, as well as the Sea and of Mexico in the World, represent the core of global affairs on either side of the Rim.  The Ocean and Ocean are Northern and Southern frontiers on the Atlantic Rim.Until the invention of aircraft in the twentieth century, seafaring was the primaryin many cases, the onlymode of long-distance travel.  New settlements were typically established on seacoasts; over time the population gradually spread inland.  The Atlantic rim was a community created by maritime traffic on the Atlantic Ocean.  Distant settlements were linked by elaborate sea-based trading networks.  The Atlantic Rim is in many respects a counterpart to the Rim.EmergenceSince Antiquity, the Basin had functioned as an interconnected cultural, economic and geopolitical sphere, the focal point of what the Greeks called the Oikumene. This regional unity reached its apotheosis in the pan-Mediterranean political dominion imposed by the Empire but persisted even after the of the Roman Empire and into the modern period and beyond. The first historian to offer a comprehensive account of this unified Mediterranean history was the French historian of the School Braudel, who argued in his books The Mediterranean and the Mediterranean World in the Age of Philip II and The Structures of Everyday Life that the countries that bordered the Mediterranean should not be studied as isolated and discrete states, but should instead be situated within the larger geographic, economic and political context of the World.Following the earliest European voyages to the New World and Africa and the division of the Americas between the Empire and the Empire effected by the of Tordesillas, a network of economic, geopolitical and cultural exchangean Atlantic World comparable to Braudels Mediterannean World -- began to coalesce among the nations and peoples that inhabited the litoral of America and America, Africa and Europe.Environmental historyThe beginning of extensive contact between Europe, Africa, and the Americas had sweeping implications for the environmental history of all the regions involved.  In a process known as the exchange, numerous plants, animals, and diseases were transplantedboth deliberately and inadvertentlyfrom one continent to another. The epidemiological impact of this exchange on the indigenous peoples of the Americas was profound, causing massive and widespread mortality (see history of American indigenous peoples). Many foods that are common in present-day Europe, including tomatoes and potatoes, originated in the New World and were unknown in Europe before the sixteenth century.  Similarly, some staple crops of present-day West Africa, including cassava and peanuts, originated in the New World.  Some of the staple crops of Latin America, such as coffee and sugarcane, were introduced by European settlers in the course of the Exchange.Slavery and other labor systemsThe slave trade played a role in the history of the Atlantic world almost from the beginning.  As European powers began to conquer and claim large territories in the Americas in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, the role of slavery and other forced labor systems in the development of the Atlantic world expanded.  European powers typically had vast territories that they wished to exploit through agriculture, mining, or other extractive industries, but they lacked the work force that they needed to exploit their lands effectively.  Consequently, they turned to a variety of coercive labor systems to meet their needs.  Native Americans were employed through slavery and through the Spanish system of encomienda.  European workers arrived as servants or transported felons.  African workers were imported via the slave trade and were used extensively throughout North and South America.The extent of voluntary immigration to the Atlantic world varied considerably by region, nationality, and time period.  Many European nations, particularly the Netherlands and France, failed to obtain as many voluntary European immigrants as they hoped to.  In Netherland, the Dutch coped by recruiting immigrants of other nationalities.  In England, the massive Puritan migration of the first half of the seventeenth century created a large free workforce and thus obviated the need to use unfree labor on a large scale.  Colonial New Englands reliance on the labor of free men, women, and children, organized in individual farm households, is called the family labor system.The French colony of Saint-Domingue was one of the first American jurisdictions to end slavery, in 1794.  Brazil was last nation in the Western Hemisphere to end slavery, in 1888.Political historyThe Spanish conquistadores conquered the Aztec empire in present-day Mexico and the Inca empire in present-day Peru with ease, assisted by horses, guns, and above all by the devastating mortality inflicted by newly introduced diseases such as smallpox.  To some extent the prior emergence of the Inca and Aztec empires as regional powers aided the transfer of governance to the Spanish, since these native empires had already established road systems, state bureaucracies and systems of taxation and intensive agriculture that were in some cases inherited wholesale by the Spanish. The early Spanish conquerors of these empires were also aided by political instability and internal conflict within the Aztec and Incan regimes, which they successfully exploited to their benefit.One of the problems that most European governments faced in the Americas was how to exercise authority over vast expanses of territory.  Spain, which colonized Mexico, Central America, and the greater part of South America, established a network of viceroyalties to administer different regions of its New World holdings: the of New Spain (1535), the of Peru (1542), the of New Granada (1717/1739), and the of Rio de la Plata (1776).  Britain approached the task of governing its New World territories in a similar, though less centralized, manner, establishing about twenty distinct colonies in North America and the Caribbean from 1585 onward.  Each British colony had its own governor and elected assembly.  In both New Spain and British North America, each viceroyalty or colony interacted directly with the Spanish or British Crown and had no formal relationship with the other American colonies that belonged to its mother country.Independence movements in the New World began with the Revolutionary War and the Revolution soon followed.  The Quasi-War, Purchase, Wars, of 1812, Doctrine and Colonization Society signified stability and aggressive autonomy on the part of Americans.  The New World equalized its power to the Old, in the quagmire of vicious wars raging throughout Europe and abundance of land to expand in under Destiny.  Ultimately, Americans as of Enlightenment successors of the Renaissance Virginia colony and of Reason Company would inherit colonial economic competition and political conditions from the of the Three Kingdoms in the form of the violent Civil War.  Remnants of the Cavalier Company and Roundhead Company would resurrect in their respective forms of Confederacy and Union.As a historical conceptHistorian Bailyn traces the concept of the Atlantic world to an editorial published by journalist Lippmann in 1917.(Bailyn, Atlantic History, 6-7.)  The alliance of the United States and Great Britain in World War II, and the subsequent creation of NATO, heightened historians interest in the history of interaction between societies on both sides of the Atlantic Ocean.(Bailyn, Atlantic History, 9.)In American and British universities, Atlantic World history is supplementing (and possibly supplanting) the study of specific European colonial societies in the Americas, e.g. British North America or Spanish America.  Atlantic world history differs from traditional approaches to the history of colonization in its emphasis on inter-regional and international comparisons and its attention to events and trends that transcended national borders.  Atlantic world history also emphasizes how the colonization of the Americas reshaped Africa and Europe.See also* history* of Discovery* history* empire* Seed* slave trade* Revolutions* America* France* Netherland* SpainNotesFurther reading** Bailyn, Bernard.  Atlantic History: Concept and Contours.  Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 2005.* Egerton, Douglas, Alison Games, Kris Lane, and Donald R. Wright. The Atlantic World: A History, 1400-1888. Wheeling: Harlan Davidson, 2007.* Seed, Patricia.  Ceremonies of Possession in Europes Conquest of the New World, 1492-1640.  New York: Cambridge University Press, 1995.* Taylor, Alan.  American Colonies.  New York: Viking, 2001.* Thornton, John.  Africa and Africans in the Making of the Atlantic World, 1400-1680.  Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 199* External links* Atlantic History Seminar, Harvard University* The Atlantic World: America and the Netherlands, sponsored by the Library of Congress
6339133
Parangdo
ParangdoIeodo (, ) or Parang IslandIeodo  Island may refer to:*Ieodo, also known as Parangdo, a disputed reef in the East China Sea*An island of uncertain location claimed by South Korea in 1951; see documentsUnderwater reef () located at the 4th block of seabed mining areas in the continental shelf within a part of the territory of the Republic of Korea. The top of the reef is below 4.6m sea surface thus can be seen only in severe waves. Because of this, the reef was considered to be a legendary island where sons or husbands who went out into the sea and never returned to have lived or have taken refuge. Based from the summit, the east and south form a steep slope while the west and north form a gentle slope. The total area based on depth contours of 50m is estimated to be approximately 2 (east-west 1.4 , north-south 1.8 ). It was first discovered in 1900 by a British merchant vessel the Socotra thus earning its name, Socotra Rock. The British Navy measured the reef to be 5.4m below sea level, and in 1938 Japan planned to install an artificial structure on top of the reef but it was canceled due to the Pacific War. In 1951, as a project to identify its territory, Korea explored the reef and submerged a copper plate with Ieodo, territory of the Republic of Korea engraved on it. In 1987, the Korean Maritime and Port Administration installed a lighted buoy, the first ever structure on Ieodo.
6357789
Shock_Wave_(novel)
Shock Wave is a book written by Cussler. First published in 1996, it is the thirteenth book in Cusslers Pitt series.  The events in the book take place between January and March 2000.Plot summaryWhile investigating the deaths of a large number of marine animals, Dirk Pitt and Giordino encounter a group of tourists on Island.  Aboard the tourists cruise ship (the Polar Queen), a mysterious disease has killed everyone on board. The tourists are brought to the Ice Hunter, a research vessel for the National Underwater and Marine Agency (NUMA). Here, they find out that the Polar Queen is missing and will not respond to their calls. After some searching, Pitt and Al discover that the missing ship is heading towards a cliff. After being winched onto the ship from a helicopter, Pitt steers and manages to narrowly avoid the crash. But he finds only one surviving passenger on board: Dierdre.  Maeve, the tour guide from Seymour Island, is Deirdres sister, and she seems perplexed to find Deirdre aboard.Pitt and Al uncover more evidence to suggest that the passengers of the Polar Queen  were killed by extremely high-powered soundwaves. At this time, more outbreaks occur on a cargo ship and a Chinese junk. The cargo ship blows up while a boarding party from a passing ship is aboard; in the distance, a futuristic yacht is spotted heading away from the scene. We learn that the yacht belongs to the Dorsett Consolidated Mining Company, a gemstone mining company headed by the ruthless Arthur Dorsett. Dorsett is also the father of Maeve, Deirdre and a third daughter, Boudicca. Of Dorsetts three daughters, Maeve is the only one who does not work for his company.  As a young girl, she ran away from home, broke all bonds with her family, and changed her last name to Fletcher.By borrowing the US Navy sonar net in the Pacific, NUMA discovers that the acoustic plague appears to be caused by a convergence of soundwaves from four sources around the Pacific: in the southwest, Gladiator Island; in the northwest, one of the Islands; in the northeast, Island; and in the southeast, Island. Since Kunghit Island is located not far from the United States, Pitt decides to go there to investigate. He enlists the help of Mason Broadmoor, a Native American fisherman who, along with his associates, delivers fish to the Kunghit Island mine every week. During one such visit, Pitt is smuggled onto the island and given a tour of the mine by a disgruntled employee. The mine has a revolutionary mining method in which high-powered soundwaves are used to dig through clay containing diamonds. Pitt learns that the Dorsetts have kidnapped both of Maeves sons and are holding them hostage.  The company security force captures Pitt as he leaves the island, but Broadmoor rescues him, and the two escape using jet skis.Soon after returning to the US, Pitt, Al and Maeve are sent to Wellington to board another research vessel, the Ocean Angler. Their mission is to covertly infiltrate Gladiator Island, find Maeves sons, and bring everybody back to the vessel. However, the plan is derailed when the pickup car drives them to a Dorsett company warehouse instead of to the research vessel. After a failed escape attempt, they are all brought onto the Dorsett yacht and immediately put out to sea. After about a day, Pitt, Al and Maeve are abandoned in the southwest Pacific Ocean, in a small craft  and far away from ordinary shipping routes; in addition, a tropical cyclone is quickly approaching.Meanwhile, the NUMA computer center in Washington discovers a way to predict the coming convergence zones, and in a few weeks the Hawaiian island of Oahu will be hit. The head of NUMA, Admiral Sandecker, fails to convince the President of the looming threat, so he launches a clandestine operation to avert the disaster. The plan is to reflect the soundwaves from the convergence zone back towards Gladiator Island. A giant reflector is obtained from a government agency; it is dismantled, loaded onto the Famous Deep-sea recovery ship Glomar Explorer, and brought into the convergence zone. Pitt, Al, and Maeve have successfully endured the storm and finally stumbled upon a small island. Here they find the remains of a sailboat, which they use along with their own battered craft to build a small sailship. With this ship, they set course for Gladiator Island, planning to rescue Maeves sons from her evil family. As they climb ashore, the sound reflector outside Oahu successfully reflects the high-powered soundwave toward Gladiator Island. At the same time, scientists realize that this could cause both volcanoes on the island to erupt. Admiral Sandecker is shocked when he receives a call from Pitt, using Mr. Dorsetts phone.Pitt and Al rescue Maeves sons and kill Arthur, Boudicca and Deirdre Dorsetthowever, Deirdre fatally shoots Maeve before Pitt kills her. Pitt and Al flee, using the Dorsett yacht to make their escape.  Al takes the children aboard a helicopter that was parked on the yacht, and as they fly away from the island, Al sees the yacht become engulfed by a pyroclastic ash cloud with Pitt still on board.Al arrives to a safe landing point, where he is recruited by rescue officials to fly back to the island. Al is concerned about what he will find there, but he has already decided to fly back and try to rescue his friend Pitt. Al also agrees to take a load of food, fresh water, and medical supplies to the islanders, who will most certainly need the items in the days following the eruptions. Upon his arrival at the island, Al is told that the authorities have received no radio communication to suggest that Pitt is still alive.  As Al begins to mourn the loss of his best friend, he hears new information about a stranded yacht that has been seen floating several miles from the island.  Al, feeling it might be Pitt, flies the helicopter to the coordinates hoping to find Pitt alive.    Al indeed finds that Pitt is alive, having survived by barricading himself from the searing heat of the ash cloud.  Sadly, however, Maeve is discovered dead from the injuries she sustained at the hand of her sister. We also discover that, prior to her untimely death, she and Pitt had pledged their deepest love for each other.After Pitt is rescued, he flies back to D.C. on a commercial jet flight and heads home, but not before spending some time in a hospital recovering from his very serious injuries.  durto (romanzo)
6366835
Landfill_mining
Landfill mining and reclamation (LFMR) is a process whereby solid wastes which have previously been landfilled are excavated and processed.(Landfill Mining Landfill Mining, Preserving Resources through Integrated Sustainable Management of Waste, Technical Brief from the World Resource Foundation) The function of landfill mining is to reduce the amount of landfill mass encapsulated within the closed landfill and/or temporarily remove hazardous material to allow protective measures to be taken before the landfill mass is replaced. In the process, mining recovers valuable recyclable materials, a combustible fraction, soil, and landfill space. The aeration of the landfill soil is a secondary benefit regarding the landfills future use. The combustible fraction is useful for the generation of power. The overall appearance of the landfill mining procedure is a sequence of processing machines laid out in a functional conveyor system. The operating principle is to excavate, sieve and sort the landfill material.The concept of landfill mining was introduced as early as 1953 at the Hiriya landfill operated by the Dan Region Authority next to the city of Aviv, Israel.(Landfill Mining Paper D.J. van der Zee, et al. (2003?) Assessing the Opportunities of Landfill Mining) Waste contains many resources with high value, the most notable of which are non-ferrous metals such as cans and metal. The concentration of aluminium in many landfills is higher than the concentration of aluminum in bauxite from which the metal is derived. Practical applications Landfill mining is also possible in countries where land is not available for new landfill sites. In this instance landfill space can be reclaimed by the extraction of waste and other substances then refilled with wastes requiring disposal.Mining construction landfill sites is the simplest form of landfill mining. Construction landfills contain three basic components, wood, scrap metal and gypsum, or drywall, along with a minimal amount of other construction materials. The wood collected can be used as fuel in coal burning power plants and the scrap metal reprocessed. Mining of municipal landfills is more complicated and has to be based on the expected content of the landfill. Older landfills, in the United States before 1994, were often capped and closed, essentially entombing the waste. This can be beneficial for waste recovery. It can also create a higher risk for waste and leachate exposure as the landfill has not fully processed the stewing wastes. Mining of landfills and properly stabilized modern sanitary landfills provides its own benefits. The biodegradable wastes are more easily sieved out, leaving the non biodegradable materials readily accessible. The quality of these materials for recycling and reprocessing purposes is not as high as initially recycled materials, however materials such as aluminum and steel are usually excluded from this.  Landfill mining is most useful as a method to remediate hazardous landfills.(Multiple Purpose industries uses landfills for energy) Landfills that were established before liner technology was well established often leak their unprocessed leachate into underlying aquifers. This is both an environmental hazard and also a legal liability. In the US, Environmental Protection Agency fines can tax the local economy up to 30 years after the site has closed. Mining the landfill simply to lay a safe liner is a last, but sometimes necessary resort. Tools and machinery The parts of the mining process are the different mining machines. Depending on the complexity of the process more or fewer machines can be used. Machinery is easily transported on trucks from site to site, mounted on trailers. The following machines are added in order in increase of mining complexity:*Excavators*Moving floor and elevator conveyor belts*A coarse rotating trommel screen*A fine rotating trommel screen*A magnet*Front end loader*Odor control sprayer The mechanics of mining An excavator or front end loader uncovers the landfilled materials and places them on a moving floor conveyor belt to be taken to the sorting machinery. A trommel is used to separate materials by size. First, a large trommel separates materials like appliances and fabrics. A smaller trommel then allows the biodegraded soil fraction to pass through leaving non-biodegradable, recyclable materials on the screen to be collected. An electromagnet is used to remove the ferrous material from the waste mass as it passes along the conveyor belt.A front end loader is used to move sorted materials to trucks for further processing.Odour control sprayers are wheeled tractors with a cab and movable spray arm mounted on a rotating platform. A large reservoir tank mounted behind the cab holds neutralising agents, usually in liquid form, to reduce the smell of exposed wastes. Operational flow Excavators dig up waste mass and transport it, with the help of front end loaders, onto elevator and moving floor conveyor belts. The conveyor belts empty into a coarse, rotating trommel. The large holes in the screen allow most wastes to pass through, leaving behind the over-sized, non-processable materials. The over-sized wastes are removed from inside the screen. The coarse trommel empties into the fine rotating trommel. The fine rotating trommel allows the soil fraction to pass through, leaving mid-sized, non-biodegradable, mostly recyclable materials. The materials are removed from the screen. These materials are put on a second conveyor belt where an electromagnet removes any ferromagnetic debris. Depending on the level of resource recovery, material can be put through an classifier which separates light organic material from heavy organic material. The separate streams are then loaded, by front end loaders, onto trucks either for further processing or for sale. Further manual processing can be done on site if processing facilities are too far away to justify the transportation costs. See also *picker*Biogas*cover*liner*tax References 
6384472
Hepburn_Springs,_Victoria
Hepburn Springs is a resort town located in the middle of the largest concentration of springs in Australia. It is in Victoria, 48 km northeast of Ballarat.  At the 2006 census, Hepburn Springs had a population of 601 and Hepburn had a population of 375.()  Total population of Hepburn-Hepburn Springs is 976 and the Daylesford-Hepburn Springs area has a population of 3071. The town is named after Captain John Hepburn who was an early squatter of central Victoria.Hepburn and Hepburn Springs are twin towns which are often badged together under the Hepburn Springs name.  Hepburn Springs was originally known as Spring Creek and Hepburn as Old Racecourse.  Old Racecourse is the location of the recreation reserve and new racecourse is Victoria Park in nearby Daylesford. Both Hepburn and Hepburn Springs were located on the Jim Crow Diggings and the towns were settled by miners in the 1850s, predominantly from China, England, Ireland, Germany, Switzerland, Italy and France. The Hepburn Post Office opened on 1 January 1854 and closed in 1964. Later, the Hepburn Springs Post Office opened on 1 October 1908()Today the village is known as a tourist destination town where visitors can sample the local waters, and has spa and massage retreats, three cafes, six restaurants, four food takeaway venues, two pubs, a live music venue, three bars, a general store, shops and galleries.Hepburn Springs is predominantly Edwardian architecture unlike the Victorian architecture of nearby Daylesford.  This is due to the devastation of the 1906 bushfire which destroyed most buildings in the settlement.(Gervasoni, Clare Bullboar Macaroni and Mineral Water Hepburn Springs Swiss Italian Festa Inc P 112 and http://www.slowfoodcentralvictoria.org.au/)Hepburn Springs is located in the State Forest between former volcanoes - Mt Franklin and Wombat Hill.  The prevalence of mineral water in the area is related to the distance from the great dividing range and the volcanic nature of the geology.Mineral Springsthumb|210px|Hepburn Mineral Spring - Locarno and the pavilionIn the 1864 its citizens met at the Savoia Hotel (Gervasoni, Clare Bullboar Macaroni and Mineral Water Hepburn Springs Swiss Italian Festa Inc P 14 P 71) and petitioned the government to protect the mineral springs from mining - the water was rated above gold and the Hepburn Mineral Spring Reserve was created in 1865.(Gervasoni, Clare Bullboar Macaroni and Mineral Water Hepburn Springs Swiss Italian Festa Inc P 72)  Many of its residents came from spa areas in Italy, Germany and England and appreciated its value.   A Bathhouse was created in the 1890s which has been remodelled several times.  The latest remodelling opened in 2008.  Several springs exist in the main reserve - Soda, Sulphur, Pavilion, Locarno and Wyuna.  Golden Spring, Hendersons and Lithia Spring are located in the vicinity.(Mineral Springs Map)(information on mineral content at Springs Inventory.)Swiss and Italian Influencethumb|210px|Pasta was made in Hepburn Springs from 1865The influence of the Italians of Australia - Italian speaking Swiss from the cantons of Ticino and Grison and the northern Italians is still present in the township - through the names of its residents, the names of its springs (Locarno) and buildings (Savoia Hotel, Parma House, Perinis, Bellinzona) and the annual Swiss-Italian Festa.The heart of the Italian speaking community was the area around the Savoia (Spring Creek) Hotel and the Macaroni Factory.  The Savoia is named after the royal family of the unified Italy.  An Italian reading library was located at the hotel and pasta was made opposite in Lucinis Macaroni Factory which was also home to the Democratic Club.  Lucinis moved from Lonsdale Street, Melbourne in 1865, where they had set up as the first pasta factory in Australia in 1864. Vanzettas bakery supplied bread and Crippa, Perini and the Gervasonis (Yandoit Creek) produced wine. A local delicacy is bullboar which is a sausage made from beef, pork, garlic and spices.(Bullboar Young Gourmet information)  In 2005 Daylesford Secondary College came second in ABCs Young Gourmets by making bullboars from the Gervasoni and Sartori recipes which gained much media attention over the fate of Charlotte the pig, with little concern for the steer involved! (Age Coverage of Young Gourmet Bullboar)  The Bullboar has been named an endangered recipe by the Food Movement.A book on the Swiss Italians in the region entitled Bullboar Macaroni and Mineral Water by Gervasoni details the influence of the Swiss Italians on Hepburn Springs.In 2007 the Melbourne Immigration Museum featured a display entitled Wine Water and Stone reflecting the Swiss and Italian heritage of the area.Heritage listed sitesthumb|200px|Hepburn loves the Burras and the Laurie Sullivan Recreation ReserveHepburn Springs has 7 sites on the Heritage Register: Mineral Springs Reserve including the bathhouse and the pavilion; Pool which was named Victorias Favourite Built Place in 2004; Parma House; Blowhole Gold Diversion Tunnel where Chinese miners diverted the Jim Crow Creek; Former Macaroni Factory which is still owned by the descendents of the Lucini family; Jim Crow Creek Gold Mining Diversion Sluice and Breakneck Gorge Puddling Site which is located near the Blowhole.(Heritage sites)The Hepburn Planning Scheme also lists a number of sites of local heritage significance including the Savoia Hotel, Wyuna, Mooltan, the Grande, the Palais, Dudley House, Mineral Springs Hotel and the Breakneck Gorge culvert.Entertainmentthumb|210px|Hepburn Springs Palais - musical heart of HepburnThe Palais is a well known and popular bar and music venue which regularly attracts national and international acts including Paul Kelly, Seymour and Cole.  The Palais was a popular dance venue in the 1920s - 1950s and has a sprung wooden floor which is good for dancing.The recreation reserve is a popular place for walking amongst the trees planted by Laurie Sullivan, many of which are now memorials to local stalwarts who were instrumental in the development and management of the reserve.The area is well known for its health, wellbeing and food.  Several day spas utilising mineral water are located in the township as well a wide range of restaurants, cafe, hotels, guest houses and accommodation options.The town is surrounded by the Hepburn Regional Park.  There are many opportunities for short or long bushwalks, often along old gold mining water sluices and peppered by mineral springs.Playgrounds are found at the Hepburn Mineral Spring Reserve and at the Laurie Sullivan Recreation Reserve.  Barbecue facilities are located at the Hepburn Mineral Spring Reserve and the Hepburn Pool.SportThe local Rules Football team is the Hepburn Burras who play at the Laurie Sullivan Recreation Reserve in 20th St,competing in the Highlands Football League.( )  In summer the Hepburn Cricket team also play at the reserve.  Hepburn football and cricket clubs have been successful clubs in the early twentyfirst century.Golfers play at the course of the Hepburn Springs Golf Club on Golf Links Road.() Notes  * Daylesford Advocate, Mercury, Express, Mercury-Express. 1859-1870 Data extracted and interpreted by Les Pitt-Daylesford Bibliography * Gervasoni, C Gervasoni Bullboar Macaroni and Mineral Water External links * Hepburn Springs - Official state government tourism site.* Palais music venue* Film Ballarat Hepburn
6391582
Mzi_Khumalo
Mzi Godfrey Khumalo (1955 - ) is a African businessman and mining entrepreneur.He has held the following positions :-* Chairman - Mintek (2004 - )* Director (Non - Executive) - Ridge Mining (2002 - 2004)* Chairman - Capital Alliance Holdings (1995 - 1998)* Chairman - JCI Ltd (? - 1998)* Owner - Mawenzi Asset Management* Owner and chairman - Metallon Resources External links* Anatomy of fast money
6404955
List_of_Star_Wars_species_(AE)
AbyssinThe Abyssin inhabit the planet Byss. They are a nomadic race, often described as brutish and violent.  They stand approximately two meters tall and have a humanoid appearance, with long limbs and weathered skin. They also possess a single large slit-pupiled eye which dominates their greenish-tan foreheads. Abyssins do not take kindly to derogatory nicknames regarding their eye, such as monoc, one-eye, or cyclops. They are quick to anger, especially when taunted or insulted. They are known to look for conflict and rarely show restraint. All Abyssins have the ability to heal quickly and to regenerate body parts, which leads to their belief that change is impossible, and as such they rarely stray from their home world. Abyssins dislike blaster fire and space-battles.(Star Wars Ultimate Alien Anthology, page 7)AleenaThis short-bodied alien race was native to the planet Aleen. These beings were characterized by their thick bodies and short limbs. They waddle when they walk, and were ungainly to look upon. Their heads were dominated by a long, thin plate of body which extended back from the skull, and their faces were flat. Two small eyes sat over a wide mouth which was filled with short, sharp teeth. Aleena were known for their quick-change metabolism, which helped them escape from sagcatchers on their home-world. Individuals were bred for their color variation, another way they avoided becoming prey. As a people, the Aleena had a strong warrior tradition. They possessed exceptional reflexes as well as a fast metabolism which allowed them to convert food into energy very rapidly in order to escape predators on their harsh home planet.AmaninThe Amanin, nicknamed Amanaman in some regions, are large aliens that have long arms and a broad body. Their heads resemble a hooded cobras head, but with a humanoid face. They prefer to travel in the trees, using their arms to swing among branches, but their shapes also allow them to curl into a ball and roll at incredible speeds. They organize into small tribes that form war with good chiss parties to fight the other tribes for territory. They do not use technology and prefer to fight with spears and arrows, but they are vicious fighters and are galaxy-renowned for it. Their reputation was even more so after they wiped out an entire stormtrooper division that had set up on their home planet. During and after the rule of the Empire, they sold their POWs into slavery. They are also popular as guards and bodyguards with the criminal elements of the galaxy. The Hutts are the biggest users of their services.An Amanin can be seen briefly in of the Jedi. This alien serves as one of Jabbas guards in his palace and can be seen guarding one of Jabbas most prized possessions- Solo encased in carbonite. He is yellow with brown/green stripes and carries a long spear.AnsionianAnsionians are tall and thin. In addition to possessing only one nostril, they have relatively large eyes. The Ansionians hail from the planet of Ansion, and are known to be lovers of peace. Many Ansionians, called Alwari, live in tribal factions on the plains, away from the human settler-created cities. They are relatively nomadic and resent technology and the fact that it has ruined the face of their planet, but not to such an extent so as to cause violence.(Dean Foster, Approaching Storm (2002). ISBN 0-345-44299-7)AnomidAnomid are humanoid, with grey hair and silver-blue eyes, and are native to the Yablari system. They communicate largely using their own sign language. Fett impersonated one in Dawn, part of the Han Solo trilogy of books. They are reportedly one of the more social species in the Star Wars galaxy.Annoo datThe Annoo dat is a four eyed, reptilian race hailing from the planet Annoo. The average height for an Annoo dat male is 6 and one half feet, while females are half a foot shorter on average. The Annoo dat tend to have rough, yellow scaled skin, with a small row of spines running down their backs and to the end of their short tails. Annoo dat have four eyes, the upper two red and the lower two are blue. The only Annoo dat to ever be named or shown in expanded universe was the separatist General Ashaar Khorda. He appears in the Wessel comic book, and subsequently dies following a plot to destroy Coruscant.AnxThe Anx are large saurian aliens from the planet Gravlex Med. They are typically four meters tall and have long, thick tails as well as beard-like facial protuberances which give them a wizened look.  Atop their heads are large crests. Famed Anx include the Senators Ryyder and Howler, as well as Jedi Knight Madurrin.AnzatiThese aliens appear similar to humans, the only differences being two prehensile probosci and a somewhat enlarged nose. People of their species are rare, but they have an impressive lifespan that can last for over a millennium. The proboscises lie coiled and hidden in pockets within the cheeks and can be extended to drain a victims luck or soup by piercing the brain through the nose. The Anzati are capable of mild telepathic control to render their victims paralyzed, and are assassins of legendary skill. The Jedi hunting mercenary Sing was trained by these assassins, as was the Jedi Master Tholme.  Their planet of origin has never been verified, as all sent to investigate the planet suspected to be Anzat are never seen again. Two more famous Anzati were Dannik Jerriko, an assassin of great renown who hunted Han Solo, as written in Tales From Mos Eisley Cantina.(Tales From Mos Eisley Cantina) and the dark Jedi Tyris.AqualishThe most notorious of the Aqualish, Baba, suffered a severed arm at the hands of Kenobi during a fight in the Eisley cantina. The species has a reputation for being nasty, crude and aggressive, and generally pursue careers as mercenaries, bounty hunters and pirates.  The Aqualish are divided into three different subspecies, the Aquala, the Ualaq and the Quara; these subspecies are differentiated by their hand structure (the Aquala have large, finlike hands, while the Quara and the Ualaq possess five-fingers with clawed digits) and facial appearance (the Ualaq have four eyes and bear some resemblance to Earth spiders, while the Aquala and the Quara have two eyes and more closely resemble a walrus).  The Aqualish hail from the planet Ando. Their home planet is almost entirely covered by water; the only hospitable land consists of a few rocky outcroppings and swamp-covered islands. Aqualish flesh does not cauterize, nor does their blood coagulate, when wounded by a lightsaber. This can be seen in Wars Episode IV: A New Hope.ArconaA strange species, Arcona are scaleless, reptilian humanoids. They have flat, anvil-shaped heads, with clear, marble-like eyes, and skin tone that ranges from mahogany to ebony. The native planet of the Arcona, Cona, is always hot, and has very little water. The atmosphere is filled with ammonia vapor. The Arconas weaknesses have been exploited in the past; off-worlders used to trade water for mineral rights, but discovered their easy addiction to salt. Traders then imported large amounts of the mineral before communities outlawed the dealings. When the species has become addicted to salt, their eyes turn from green to gold. To survive an Arconan must periodically consume a substance known as dactyl. Salt increases an Arconans need for this substance by a hundredfold.() A well known Arcona was the Jedi Knight Waz (Troy Dennings Star Wars: The New Jedi Order - Star By Star).ArgazdanArgazdans were a green-skinned humanoid species native to the planet Argazda.One individual named Raygar was first featured in the Wars: Ewoks episode Battle for the Sunstar.ArkanianThese aliens are a near-human people with extreme intelligence. They enslaved the Yaka from nearby planets, turning them into cyborgs. Their home planet, Arkania, is not truly their homeworld at all, but was originally a repository for Sith knowledge. One famous Arkanian was the ancient Jedi Master Arca Jeth. Arkanians have three fingers and a thumb on each hand, and can see well into the infrared range of the electromagnetic spectrum.AruzanAruzans, the inhabitants of Aruza, are humanoids with faintly blue skin and dark, nearly black hair. They have the ability to share their memories and emotions with one another by means of cybernetic implants(Star Wars: Tales of the Bounty Hunters) During the time of Imperial subjugation, the enslaved Aruzans hired the bounty hunter Dengar to assassinate General Kritkeen, who was the planetary commander.(Tales of the Bounty Hunters, Payback: The Tale of Dengar)AskajianThese near-Human aliens appear to be bulky creatures and are often dismissed as such. The bulk is actually stored water, a genetic trait acquired from evolving on a desert planet. When needed, the Askajian can draw on this water to survive, in which case they become dramatically thinner as the stored water is used up.AssemblerThe Assembler species is rare and elusive; only one specimen, Kudar Mubat, is known to have ventured off its homeworld. In Mandalorian Armor, Kudar Mubat and Xizor use Fett in a plot to destroy the Bounty Hunter Guild.  Boba Fetts firsthand account of the Assembler homeworld can be found in the Guide to Alien Species. The main Assembler form is a large spider-like creature that is mentally linked to smaller versions of itself. Each node, as the mini-Assemblers are called, is delegated a specific task. For instance, lookouts act as surveillance cameras, and pilots navigate the immense cocoon that an Assembler constructs so that it and its nodes can survive in space. Each node is intelligent, and capable of growing up to become a full Assembler. The main Assembler must therefore be wary enough to kill the nodes before they become mature enough to arrange the Assemblers demise directly or indirectly, thereby taking its place. However, since nodes become more useful as they mature and grow, the main Assembler always faces a dilemma as to when to kill its nodes. It seems probable that this trait is somehow beneficial to the population as a whole, possibly because it ensures that an Assembler is crafty and clever; it would not have become an Assembler or remained an Assembler for long if it were not. Kudar Mubat was a node himself and killed his parent in a time long before Boba Fett was the most feared bounty hunter in the galaxy. Kudar Mubat was, in turn, overthrown and killed by the node known as Balancesheet.BalosarThis was a race of near-humans, noted for the retractable antenepalps atop their heads. Native to a planet also known as Balosar, they were generally regarded as shifty cheaters and scoundrels by other races. This is most likely derived from the fact that they produce and sell death sticks, addictive and eventually fatal drugs distilled from balo mushrooms, which are farmed in large quantities underground. The drugs main black market competitor is the Ryloth drug ryll. As a people, the Balosar seemed to be content to allow their homeworld to be overrun by offworld corporations and criminal syndicates, taking bribes and other payments in return for land grants or other rights. The lowest classes of Balosar were paid poorly for their work in sweatshops and factories, despite the best efforts of the Old Republic.The Balosar Elan Sleazebaggano appears in Episode II Attack of the Clones. He approaches Obi Wan, and asks Obi Wan if he would like to buy some deathsticks. Obi Wan quickly turns him away using a Jedi mind trick, convincing him to rethink his life.Bando GoraShown in the game Wars: Bounty Hunter, the Bando Gora are the Star Wars version of the living dead. These souls of ancient warriors were brought back by the dark Jedi Komari Vosa.They are found all over the galaxy, but originated on one of the moons of Bogden. These beings appear as dark, humanoid creatures, wrapped in black. They answer only to their master. The Bando Gora were the personal army of Vosa, and she used them in crippling attacks on some of the galaxys top industries. In the end, the Bando Gora, along with Vosa, were destroyed by Jango Fett. Fett was secretly hired by Count Dooku to kill Vosa and the Bando Gora. Dooku wanted to test Fett to see if he had the high ability needed to be the template for the Republic clone army.Although Vosa died the Bando Gora did not die with her. Who ever does the proper sacrifice on the moon of Bogden will gain control of whats left of the Bando gora.BarabelThe Barabel are a reptilian species that appears human, save for the scales covering their bodies and a long tail. They are extremely strong and have long pointed teeth. They are one of the most feared aliens in the Star Wars Galaxy. They will eat almost any kind of meat providing it is or was recently alive. They take great thrill in hunting for their food. However, they show an immense amount of respect for the Jedi, and seem to value their wisdom above all else. This is because in their distant history, a wandering Jedi had settled a bloody dispute between two major clans over prime hunting grounds. A trio of Barabels accompanied Anakin Solo and a handful of other young Jedi, on a mission to destroy the Queen voxyn on a Yuuzhan Vong  planet in Dennings Star by Star. Two of the Barabel on the mission perished, as did Anakin Solo. Two of the most famous Barabels are Saba Sebatyne and her son Tesar Sebatyne.()Besaliskright|thumb|Dexter Jettster, a BesaliskBesalisks are a race of four-armed humanoids from the icy planet of Ojom, though  female Besalisks can have up to eight arms. Besalisks evolved from large flightless avians, though they are often mistaken for a reptilian species. They are bulky, fleshy beings able to survive for long periods without food or water. They tend to have a bony crest surrounded by short feathers, and a wide mouth with an elastic sack dangling from it. Because of their size, they are often seen as gluttonous, though this is a misconception. Another misconception is that they are nervous or in poor shape because they sweat profusely, though this is in fact due to the normally freezing temperatures on their home planet. The average Besalisk stands approximately 1.8 meters tall. Their language consists of grunts, growls, and barks, and their written language has a simple alphabet and short words, although Besalisks can speak Basic with ease. Although Besalisks have contributed very little to the galaxy in terms of resources and technology, they are sociable, gregarious, and keen-witted, are found easily in the galactic community and can readily use what other species have to offer. During the reign of the Galactic Empire, Besalisks narrowly avoided slavery by calling in favors with various influential underworld connections. Many are still working off their freedom, especially besalisks that were foolish or desperate enough to seek aid from the Hutts. Besalisks have never sought official representation in the Galactic Senate and generally seem content to go about their business and leave Galactic affairs to politicians and bureaucrats of other species. Communities on their homeworld are sparsely populated, and few offworld colonies of Besalisks are found in any era.One Besalisk, Dexter Jettster, a good friend of Kenobi, is seen in Attack of the Clones.BimmThe Bimm actually exist as two separate species. The member of the first species are super-intelligent peaceful humanoids natives from planet Bimmisaari. They are fond of the color yellow, and often clad themselves in garb of this color. The second species is short and covered in fur with floppy-ears and is also super-intelligent. The two species live side by side on the same planet, and refer to all members native to the planet as Bimms..BithBith are native to the planet ClakDor VII. They have pale skin, large heads and eyes, and long fingers. Their mouths are hidden within three folds of moist skin, and their ears are capable of hearing frequencies far beyond those that most species can perceive. In some cases, Bith have been known to hear high-powered communication broadcast signals without using artificial equipment. Due to their highly tuned audio senses, Bith are often sought after as musicians across the galaxy. They also have great reputations as starship mechanics and scientists. Dan and the Modal Nodes are a Bith band seen playing music in the Eisley Cantina. Bith are also able to store large amounts of information in a very short period of time and retain that information in an undamaged binary state for short periods of time. They are considered mature at ten years of age.In Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic 2, Mira explains not to use a sonic grenade, as Bith have particularly sensitive hearing, a sonic grenade would normally stun other races but would cause a Biths head to pop like a melon. link. Star Wars Episode IV:Blood CarverBlood Carvers are thin humanoids, golden in skin colour, with three jointed arms and legs. Their nose is two separate flaps that contain both the sense of smell and of hearing.Their society hates the idea of wealth and money and sees little to no use for it, basing their hierarchy on honour rather than money.()BoltruniansBoltrunians are a large and muscular reptilian near-Human species with hairless heads, craggy faces, wide noses, and heavy brow ridges.  Boltrunians could live to be over 700 years old.  Well-known Boltrunians included Warto and the Dark Jedi Maw. Often, a Boltrunian would be mistaken for a Trandoshan.Bomarr monksThe Bomarr are not actually a species; rather they were an order of monks whose monastery eventually became Palace. They believe that cutting themselves off from civilization and all corporeal distractions leads to enlightenment and to that end undergo surgery to separate their brains from their bodies and continue their existence as a brain in a jar. They learn to communicate telepathically and by controlling technology attuned to their abilities. On the rare occasions when they need to move, they are able to use a spider-like walking apparatus. The Bomarr were still in Jabbas Palace at the time it appears in of the Jedi, and indeed, as C-3PO enters Jabbas palace, a spiderwalker can be seen. The monks inhabit the lower part of the palace and allow the various smugglers and crime lords like Jabba to use the upper levels, as long as they add another section to the lower levels for use by the Bomarr. When the current ruler of the upper levels is deposed they drive out the stragglers and add the brains of those who do not leave to their order. The infamous Fortuna himself eventually (unwillingly) became a monk, as he had sought power through the monks teachings.(Shayne, Bell M., Of the Days Annoyances: Bib Fortunas Tale, Tales From Jabbas Palace)The animated film The Clone Wars establishes the Bomarr order maintained monasteries on several planets. The facility on Teth, built on the top of a steep mountain, served as the hideout for Separatist forces who kidnapped Jabba the Hutts son Rotta. The architecture was very similar to Jabbas palace. According to dialogue in the film, many of the abandoned monasteries are used as hideouts for smugglers.Bothan Bothans hail from the industrial Mid Rim planet of Bothawui, though they also populate various colony worlds like Kothlis and Torolis. Most Bothans stand about 56 ft. tall. They have tapered pointed ears, elongated heads, and a very few from both sexes have beards.  Bothans are manipulative, crafty, suspicious, curious by nature, loyal, brave, and very smart.  They developed their technology to travel among the stars millennia ago and are longstanding members of the galactic civilization.The Bothans, in the galactic war, play the role of spies from the Rebel Union.To the Bothans, information is the galaxys most valuable currency, as well as its most potent weapon. As a culture, they believe the direct confrontation with foeswhether economic, political, or martialis pointless. In an open conflict, the object both sides desire is often damaged or destroyed. This attitude has made espionage a natural line of work for Bothans. Information and spies are their greatest exports. The famed Bothan spynet is the largest independent intelligence-gathering organization the galaxy has ever known. Beings of power everywhere find Bothans irritating because they have a tendency to use every bit of information they can to acquire leverage or money, but no one wants to be the only person without access to the spynet, so everyone continues to deal with the Bothans.The most renowned Bothans from Chaos Squadron are Jorec Thebe, Giddic Ryne and Relluf Xander, the three surviving Bothans who provided the Death Star II plans in of the Jedi.BouncerBouncers are furry green floating orbs with thin black tails that live on the planet Ruusan. They also appear in the novels and audio dramatizations of Wars: Dark Forces upon the planet Sulon. Morgan Katarn, father of soon-to-be Jedi Master Katarn, discovers the creatures in the Valley of the Jedi in Sulon, naming them appropriately. Bouncers apparently move with the wind, lifting flaps of skin to use them as sails to guide their bodies. They use rocks and other formations to bounce them high, gliding them through the air for travel. Bouncers are said to be attuned with the Force and can communicate with those who can manipulate it. They can also become hostile when exposed to massive amounts of energy from the dark side of the Force, such as Kaans thought bomb.They communicate with other species by speaking into their minds. They can attempt to predict the future.CaamasiThe Caamasi are a species of golden-furred humanoids known for their calm wisdom and pacifist nature. Strongly loyal to the Old Republic, many Caamasi died when their homeworld of Caamas was devastated by the Galactic Empire.CatharThe Cathar are cat-like humanoids from the planet Cathar. Famous Cathar are the Jedi Juhani (though shes actually part of a subspecies of the Cathar that was notable for appearing less catlike than the baseline Cathar species) and Crado and Sylvar, pupils of the ancient Jedi Master Vodo Siosk-Baas. The party member character Juhani from Wars Knights of the Old Republic belongs to the Cathar race.CarondianThe Carondians are the only native species of the planet Caronda, and were almost eliminated when a Republic orbital station crashed onto the planet and set fire to the atmosphere. There are no famous Carondians, they like to remain virtually unknown throughout the galaxy.CelegianThe Celegians are a species of intelligent scyphozoans native to Celegia, appearing as floating brains trailing a cluster of prehensile tentacles. The species are renowned for their wisdom and intellect, and they often travel far seeking to expand their knowledge.Celegians evolved from ocean-dwelling ancestors, and developed a natural form of levitation similar to an organic repulsorlift generator. Their homeworld has a cyanogen atmosphere, which is lethal to most species but necessary for the Celegains, for whom oxygen is toxic. Because of this, when they travel offworld, they are normally encased in a chamber filled with cyanogen; this causes them appear as if afloat in a watery brine. Because of their fragile form and life support requirements, they are rarely encountered.()CereanCereans are a species with long cone-like heads (because they have an extra heart on top of their brain) that hail from the planet Cerea. One example is Master Ki-Adi-Mundi. They have a very low number of males compared to females, therefore Master Mundi was allowed to have one bond wife (Shea) and several honor wives even though he was a Jedi. Cereans sport binary brains within their large heads, and although their coordination is generally somewhat impaired relative to humans or other species, they make up for it with incredible mind control and thought processes.Chadra-FanThe Chadra-Fan are short, furry mamalianoids with bat-like faces. They live in the swamps and marshes of their native planet Chad. They are renowned for their weak strength, emphasized by the saying You punch like a Chadra-Fan.ChagrianChagrians are blue skinned humanoids with horns and lethorns. One example is Amedda, who is the Speaker of the Senate. The Chagrian homeworlds twin suns produce vast amounts of radiation that would kill a normal human. Chagrians evolved their blue skins to filter the radiation.ChazrachThe Chazrach are a short, stocky, reptilian humanoid race with snubbed snouts that serve the Vong as slave soldiers. They are also called reptoids by the inhabitants of the galaxy. They are one of the few species other than the Vong that are not native to the galaxy. They were formerly a free people, but were enslaved during the Yuuzhan Vongs plundering of their own galaxy.For thousands of years, the Chazrach served the Vong as expendable support troops to overwhelm enemy forces. Bred in large numbers, the Chazrach had coral seeds implanted into them to ensure obedience.  A pair of dome-like calcifications protruded from the forehead of each Chazrach, a sign of the coral implants that control the drones. When these calcifications were removed the Chazrach regained limited levels of their intelligence and could be valuable sources of information.Any form of intelligence and initiative that was possessed by the base species vanished over the generations of genetic tampering by the Shapers. This flaw, combined with their small, stocky statures made them incapable of mastering the use of the standard amphistaff used by the Warrior Caste as a whip. The reptoids instead use the inflexible Coufee since the double-edged knife is much more suited to their body form and an inferior breed of the Amphistaff. A few Chazrach served the Vong so well over the generations that they were permitted to join the Warrior Caste at its most basic levels.ChissIn the fictional Wars universe, the Chiss are a humanoid species with pale blue skin, blue-black hair and glowing red eyes. First introduced to the Expanded Universe in Zahns Thrawn Trilogy through his arch villain Admiral Thrawn, the Chiss have since developed into a popular species amongst fans and other Expanded Universe authors.In the Expanded Universe, Csilla is identified as the homeworld of the Chiss. Csilla is a cold world of glaciers and snowy wastes located deep within Chiss Space, and serves as the capital of the Chiss Empire. The Chiss are noted for their lack of droids, or any kind of artificial intelligence. Baron Soontir Fel attempted to change this during the Yuuzhan Vong invasion, by introducing self thinking spacecraft. Any progress on this is more or less unknown. While their history has been marked by nearly continual warfare and conquest of other worlds, the Chiss are generally not personally violent.ChistoriThe Chistori are a lizard-type humanoid race.  They resemble bipedal lizards with a prominent muzzle, an impressive line of teeth, and thick scales.  Few things are known in connection with the reptilians known as the Chistori because they are a secretive race.  Even the Jedi Files do not know their native world.  Due to their reptilian nature, they are cold blooded.  If a Chistori is exposed to cold temperatures for a prolonged period of time they will undoubtedly die.  One example of a Chistori would be Desann.ClawditeClawdites are a genetic offspring from Zolanders, the dominant species on planet Zolan. When Zolanders discovered that their sun had increased its radioactive emissions, they tried to unleash a gene in the Zolander skin cells to activate natural protection against radiation. The results created a new species, Clawdites, which were metamorphs. Clawdites can change their appearance, if keeping body mass as a constant and not retaining the same aspect for a long time. Zolanders ostracized Clawdites and they had many civil wars, but in the end, Clawdites subjugated Zolanders.Wesell, the bounty hunter working with Fett on Coruscant in Attack of the Clones, is the only known example of a Clawdite in the Star Wars movies. Clawdites are also referred to as Changlings, obviously because of their ability to change.Codru-JiCodru-Ji are four-armed humanoids with pointed ears who, while not xenophobic in the typical sense, have not yet integrated themselves into galactic society.  They guard their society and their young with equal ferocity, which can be surprising since an immature Codru-Ji appears almost nothing like a mature Codru-Ji, and in fact can be mistaken for a pet.  Immature Codru-Ji, also known as Wyrwulf, are small, six-limbed lupine creatures who enter a chrysalis phase in puberty and emerge a mature Codru-Ji.()CowayThe Coway appear in the 1978 novel of the Minds Eye, by Dean Foster. The Coway are a fur-covered humanoid species that are native to the planet Mimban, of the Circarpous Major System. Coways live deep underground, and have a strong aversion to surface-dwellers. Coways have small eyes, but are able to see in the dark due to their infrared vision. Additionally, they are able to eat foods normally poisonous to humans because of their more tolerant digestive system. They wear simple, primitive clothing.The underground world of the Coway can be reached through deep shafts known as Thrella Shafts (named after the Thrella, an extinct species known for their numerous underground tunnels and wells). Often these have side-tunnels that lead to Coway dwellings. The tribal government of the Coway consists of a triumvirate who make the major decisions for the tribe.CrokeThe Croke are a very small species. So much so, that they can be held in a persons hand. They also have a reputation for being unpleasant and evil. They are humanoid creatures, and range from 4 inches to 5 inches (100 to 130 mm) in height although occasionally a Croke will be 6 inches (150 mm) tall. They also vary greatly in weight from 5 oz to 32 oz (140 g to 910 g). Average weight for a Croke is 10 oz (280 g). They have natural powers of illusion and shapeshifting. Homeworld is Crakull.DantariDantari are a race of hard skinned humanoids. They hail from the planet of Dantooine, and are relatively primitive. During a short Imperial inhabitation of the planet during Star Wars: Episode IV after Leia revealed the location of an abandoned Rebel base to Grand Moff Tarkin, the Dantari saw these technologically-supreme beings as gods, and have since tattooed themselves with pictures of AT-ATs, stormtrooper helmets, and, for the bravest of Dantari, full-body depictions of stormtrooper armor.DashadeDashades are tall, humanoid reptiles with dark skin. They are powerful warriors and assassins, and they are not affected by the powers of the Force. Their planet, Urkupp, was destroyed in a supernova caused during the Sith War, killing all of the Dashades on the planet. The most famous remaining Dashade is Maliss, an assassin for Black Sun who was cryogenically frozen when his boss discovered that only a few Dashades remained. But he is not the last of his species. New Republic historians have found evidence that Dashade mercenaries may have been employed during the great purge of the Jedi order that accompanied the rise of the Galactic Empire. And perhaps Dashade colonies still exist, founded before the destruction of Urkupp, still waiting to be discovered.In the new Jedi Order books the Dashade people are almost exterminated by the Yuuzhan Vong; but Anakin Solo steps in, and saves one particular tribe before beginning a terrible journey back to the main settlement whilst being pursued by Yuuzhan Vong warriors.DefelThe Defel (colloquially known as Wraiths) are barely visible beings who appear to most other species as shadows, re-enforcing the misconception that they are chameleon-like beings or living shadows. Typically, they are employed as mercenaries or guards. They are from a large, high-gravity, seldom-visited world orbiting the ultraviolet supergiant KaDedus. AfEl has no ozone layer and ultraviolet light passes freely to the surface, while other light wavelengths are blocked by the heavy gases in the planets atmosphere. Thus, all life forms on AfEl can only see in ultraviolet light ranges, and are blind to other wavelengths of light. Often called wraiths, their bodies absorb visible light, giving them the appearance of shadows. The Defel live in underground cities to escape AfEls violent storms. A main export of the planet is the metal meleenium (used in durasteel), which is only known to exist on AfEl.A noted Defel representative of the Star Wars films is Arleil Schous, seen with glowing red eyes in the Mos Eisley cantina of Wars Episode IV: A New Hope.In ultraviolet light, they appear as short, muscular lupine humanoids with thick fur and unusual, three-jointed fingers. They live underground on the planet AfEl, mining the various metals in the planets crust and outer core. Defels can see normally only in ultra-Violet light, and must wear special visors when exposed to normal wavelengths of light, or else they are effectively blind.DevaronianDevaronians are a horned humanoid species from the world of Devaron in the Expansion Region, a planet of low mountains and deep valleys linked by thousands of rivers. It is believed that they are descended from a race of primates that lived in the mountains of Devaron, and that their horns were a genetic mutation that proved useful in fending off predatory birds.The Devaronians are one of the unique races in the galaxy, as their male and female sexes are so vastly different in appearance and temperament. The males are docile, non-aggressive creatures, hairless, with red-tinted skin and a pair of large horns growing from their heads. They take great pride in their horns, and groom them quite regularly. Female Devaronians are covered in thick calico fur that ranges in color from brown to white and are hornless. They are aggressive by nature, and tend to dominate their culture. In addition, the teeth of the males are all incisors, but the females also have molars and prominent canines.Devaronians were one of the first species in the galaxy to develop travel, and the males of the species have been common sights in spaceports throughout the galaxy for thousands of years. Devaronian males are driven by an urge to wander, usually taking the first opportunity to move on from one place to another. As such, they are often found traveling the galaxy as tramp freighter captains and scouts. Female Devaronians, on the other hand, are content to remain in a single location, and, as such, raise the young and run the government of Devaron. The males send as much money as they can manage back to their home world to support their families, but otherwise hardly ever return once they have begun to travel the stars. The females are content with this arrangement, as they tend to view the restless males as disruptive to home life. One Devaronian, KarduesaiMalloc, going by the name of Labria, was seen in the cantina scene of A New Hope. He had one of the galaxys highest bounties posted by the Alliance for his war crimes at the Devaronian city of Montellian Serat, and was eventually captured by Fett.() Unlike most Devaronian males, Labria had a rare mutation that gave him two sets of teeth, a normal male set and a female set that he could retract at will. Such mutants were prized as scouts, as they could travel afar and survive on food normally inedible to males.DrachnamDrachnam appear in the short story Jade Solitare in the compilation of The New Republic. They are a very brutal and violent race employing neuronic whips (a whip with a conductive lash which sends hundreds of volts through the victims body), and long (15) serrated knives. Their home planet is very diverse on the surface ranging from very hot to extremely cold. The planet rotates extremely slowly - one day is about two hundred earth years - so as a result all of the Drachnam cities are dark and dank tunnels underground.The only famous Drachnam is Chay Praysh who is famous for employing female slaves in his palace (Mara Jade once became a slave to his brutal reigime to rescue Ja Bardrins daughter Sansia).DraethosDraethos are a blue-skinned, humanoid species with large teeth, which dwell outside of their mouths, from the planet Draethos. A notable Draethos is Jedi Master Odan-Urr.DrallDrall are short, squat and stocky bipeds, little more than a meter tall. They are covered with short, thick and dark fur. They have short limbs with clawed and fur-covered hands and feet. Drall are a dignified, self-confident species and are known to be quite level-headed. They primarily live on the planet of Drall, but also inhabit other planets of the Corellian system.One notable Drall is Ebrihim, who was a tutor to Han and Leias children on a visit to Corellia. Ebrihim also had an aunt, the Duchess of Mastigophorous, who lived on an estate on Drall.DressellianDressellians are wrinkled humanoids from the planet Dressel. Dressellians believe fiercely in an individuals freedom and will often find it difficult to work in groups, even so many formed a freedom fighting force during the time of the Empire to fight for their right to live as they wanted.(Ann Margaret Lewis. The Essential Guide to Alien Species. Del Rey, 2001.) Dressilians treasure freedom above everything else.Dressellians use slugthrowers (rifles and pistols firing metal projectiles) instead of blasters.DrochSource of the mysterious Death Seed plague, the drochs are an insect race from Nam Chorios that start off life as non-sentient but can become sentient by absorbing the life of victims. A droch can burrow under the skin of its intended victim and drink their life while they sleep, or sometimes while they are awake. Their small size, great agility and fast reproductive cycle means that they can wipe out the population of a city in a matter of only a few days. As the drochs drink their victims life, they also absorb intelligence. The larger, captain drochs can absorb life through the smaller drochs without having to come into contact with the victims themselves. One mutated captain droch, named Dzym, lived to be 250 years old and grew to human size, absorbing intelligence for all that time.(DrovianDrovians are a tall and burly species from Nim Drovis with thick trunk-like legs that, like their arms, end in three sharp pincers. The Drovians divided into two tribes, the Gopsoo and the Drovians, centuries ago and have been at war with each other since. Nearly all Drovians are addicted to a narcotic called zwil; originally imported as a cake flavoring, the Drovians can absorb it directly into their systems through their breathing tubes.(DugDugs are slender, powerfully built beings with a somewhat humanoid build and a unique method of walking. Their strong arms are used as legs, and their lower limbs are used as arms. They walk on three powerful fingers. Dugs have smooth skin, which hangs loose around their necks, fin-like ears, and pronounced snouts.Dugs are known for their ill-tempered demeanor, and many are little more than bullying thugs. Diminutive Dugs often feel the need to throw around their strength in bids to establish dominance. One of the best-known Dugs is Sebulba, a Podracing champion from Pixelito on Malastare.They are also shown in Wars: Bounty Hunter as an enemy on the planet Malastere. Dugs have been known to be greedy, and are most of the time looking for a deal on any product.In Attack of the Clones a Dug is seen in one of the airspeeders during the speeder chase sequence (many fans believe that is Sebulba once again since Anakin cut him off which is similar to the events in the Boonta Eve Classic), and another is seen in Dexters diner.DulokDurosDuros are hairless beings with blue skin and large red eyes and are said to be among the first spacefaring humanoid species, including humans. They are known for their superior astronavigational skills. Their homeworld is Duro which is in the galactic core.  Two Duros can be seen in the Mos Eisley Cantina in Wars Episode IV: A New Hope.  Bane, a Duro on the Cartoon Network show Star Wars, The Clone Wars, is a profesional Bounty Hunter.  The Duros have also appeared in a few Star Wars games such as: Knights of the Old Republic and of the Old Republic II: The Sith Lords.The Duros havent set foot on their world since the Empire polluted it with weapons Factories, Instead they live in large orbital cities surrounding the planet.Duros are related to the Neimoidians, the aliens in charge of the Federation in the prequel films, because many years before the Republic, the Duros colonized the planet Neimoidia, and thus the Neimoidians, a newer version of Duros, were born.  The Duros consider the Neimoidians to be cowardly and take offense at being mistaken by other beings for a Neimoidian. Duros are also known for their great story-telling skills because of the many places that they have visited during their travels throughout the galaxy. Their planet was remade by the Vong during the war into a bio-shipyard for the Vongs living creations.(Carey, Craig R., Chris Doyle, Jason Fry, Paul Sudlow, John Terra, and Daniel Wallace. Coruscant and the Core Worlds. Wizards of the Coast, 2003.)EchaniThe Echani are a mysterious race of well taught fighters, whose most prominent appearance was in Wars: Knights of the Old Republic II: The Sith Lords. Five Echani Handmaiden sisters reside with Jedi Master Atris at her academy at the polar ice cap on Telos. These Echani were trained by Atris to construct barriers in their minds in order to resist force-based powers. The Echani race possess natural martial art skill and wear light armour in battle, although they prefer to wear very little when training to restrict their movements less. The Echani maidens were often used to hunt down rogue Jedi and subdue them for the Order. Human in appearance, they often have silver hair and closely resemble their parents, and therefore their siblings. As long as they have the same parents, Echani siblings are identical in appearance.The best known of the Echani in the Star Wars universe was Brianna, the last of Atris Handmaidens. She served with her Mistress on Telos until the Exile arrived. After speaking with the Exile, she stowed away on board his ship, the Hawk. Eventually, it is revealed that her mother was a Jedi Knight and she herself starts on the path of the Jedi. This fact is the reason that Brianna looks different to her sisters - she does not share the same mother. This story depended on the player of the game choosing a male character. If the player chose a female character, the above story would not occur as so. It is known that the Echani held a traditional rivalry with the Mandalorians. Echani and Mandalorians both saw each other as worthy opponents, therefore causing a war between them to prove whose skills were the better. Due to the combat training of the Echani on a daily level, their bones become tougher, making them more durable. A version of the Echani style of unarmed combat is taught to members of Palpatines Imperial Guard and Sith guard. This style has been adapted to be more brutal and efficient and less flashy. Echani were often seen on snowy/cold planets such as Hoth and Eshan. They made their bases underground since they would have been made out of durable materials.Though not much is known about their aging process it is presumed that they age at a much slower rate than, say, a human and their life expectancy is around four hundred years.ElomNative to the planet Elom, members of this species are short and stocky, and are covered with thick, oily hair. They have two tusks covering the opening of their mouth, and have two small eyes set on a pair of stalks protruding from either side of their head. In addition, they are herbivores.Eloms originally developed on the surface of the planet Elom, but were forced to move underground when water became scarce. Since then, they have remained isolated from the rest of the galaxy, with many Eloms continuing to retreat further underground where living there.There is another intelligent species on the planet, the Elomin. Both species were divided and each thought the other one was extinct. When the Elomin re-discovered Eloms, they tried to make the Republic believe that Eloms were only unintelligent animals, but the truth was discovered and Eloms were granted rights. However, Eloms seem not to be interested in politics and still live in burrows.ElominThe Elomin are tall, demon-like thin humanoids with pointed ears and four horns. They live on the surface of the planet Elom. As a society, the Elomin strove to find order in all things, and worked to create order where it didnt exist. So when they discovered that another species, the Eloms, shared the same planet with them, most Elomin refused to acknowledge that their underground brethren even existed.When Emperor Palpatine rose to power, the Elomin were enslaved and were forced to mine lommite. Some Eloms learned of this and deliberately caused mining accidents in order to free a number of Elomin.EpicanthixThe Epicanthix are tall, muscular, near-humans native to the planet Panatha. They were known as warriors, having conquered many bordering planets such as Bunduki. They live longer than humans, with a life-span of around 130 years.ErKitErKit are usually skinny and grayish-blue, with long ears. The only well-known one is Mandrell.EwokEwoks are a primitive tribal species from the Moon of Endor. They are approximately half the size of humans and covered with fur. The Ewoks are best known for their aid to the Rebel mission to remove the shield protecting the Death Star known as the battle of Endor.  While peaceful by nature, they are extremely territorial and have been known to fight ferociously in protection of their society. Though they are known as Ewoks, they are never actually called that. In fact they are never called anything in Episode VI.EvociiThe Evocii are a primitive humanoid race from Hutta, formerly Evocar. When the Hutts arrived on Evocar, the Evocii were amazed by the technology these large, fat slug-like aliens brought with them and began swapping areas of their own home world for the technology that the Hutts had. Soon they realized that the Hutts owned almost their entire world. Then the Hutts began treating the Evocii like slaves. The Evocii appealed to the Old Republic for help but unfortunately, the laws of the Republic favored the Hutts. The Hutts then brutally relocated the Evocii to Evocars fifth and largest moon Nar Shaddaa where they were used as slaves to build Nar Shaddaa into a spaceport moon. Most of the Evocii eventually died from the various technologies practiced on that moon while the very few survivors mutated into savages.The ancient history of the Evocii tells that their people revered a holy stone, known as the Uransien. Supposedly this spherical stone watched over the people, and as long as it rested peacefully within the Evocii capital, the people enjoyed good health and prosperity. After the Hutts invaded, however, the Uransien was lost. This may have been a factor in the speed of the Evociis despair.In the late years of the deportation, a small group of Evocii stole a Hutt starship and managed to escape the system. Not particularly adept with space travel the small band of Evocii crash landed on a heavily forested planet several days later. These few established a hidden community on their new homeworld, which flourished through many millennia, protected by the giant trees surrounding it. They called their home Grosavinath, or Big Tree.Though it took almost twenty-five thousand years, the quiet Evocii village began to dwindle despite the life abounding in the lush forest. Most believed their term of existence was drawing to a close and that the absence of the sacred rock had finally begun to manifest. One among these believers was the spiritual guide Gothar Marath. He had long been a student of the forces of nature as well as the history of his people. Many of his brethren revered him and the supernatural powers he possessed.There was little debate that Gothar should leave his home when the opportunity arose. Several of the village hunters returned from their night patrol in the forest with a group of strangers. Among them were Abu-Tai and Uri-Kai, two Jedi Knights, Arem-Ta, a rough-hewn freighter pilot, and Meelalin, a blue-skinned Twilek.  It was in this company that Gothar was able to leave the planet and seek out the Uransien, hoping to save his people.Referencesvan rassen uit Star Wars (A-E)
6419756
Petrophysics
Petrophysics (petro is Latin for rock and physics is the study of nature) is the study of the physical and chemical properties that describe the occurrence and behavior of rocks, soils and fluids http://www.seed.slb.com/qa2/FAQView.cfm?ID914. Petrophysics mainly studies reservoirs of resources, including ore deposits and oil or gas reservoirs.  Petrophysicists in the oil and gas industry typically are employed in helping the engineers and other geoscientists understand the rock properties of the reservoir. Petrophysicists evaluate the reservoir rock properties by employing log measurements, in which a string of measurement tools are inserted in the borehole, core measurements, in which rock samples are retrieved from subsurface, and sometimes seismic measurements, and combining them with geology and geophysics. Petrophysical studies are used by engineering, geology, mineralogy, geophysics and other related studies. Some of the key properties studied in petrophysics are lithology, porosity, saturation, permeability, density, mechanics, magnetization, conductivity, conductivity and radioactivity.While most petrophysicists work in the oil and gas industry, some also work in the mining and water resource industries.  The properties measured or computed fall into three broad categories: conventional petrophysical properties, rock mechanical properties, and ore quality.Conventional petrophysical propertiesMost petrophysicists are employed to compute what are commonly called conventional (or reservoir) petrophysical properties.  These are:Lithology: What type of rock is it. When combined with local geology and core study, geoscientists can use log measurements such as natural gamma, neutron, density, Photoelectric, resistivity or their combination to determine the lithology downhole.   Porosity: \phi The amount of pore (or fluid occupied) space in the rock.  This is typically measured using an instrument that measures the reaction of the rock to bombardment by neutrons or by gamma rays. Sonic wave speed and NMR logs are also measured to derive rock porosity.  saturation: S_wThe fraction of the pore space occupied by water.  This is typically measured using an instrument that measures the resistivity of the rock.Permeability: The quantity of fluid (usually hydrocarbon) that can flow from the rock as a function of time and pressure. Formation testing is so far the only direct downhole permeability measurement. In case of its absence, which is common in most cases, permeability estimation is derived from other measurements, such as porosity, NMR, sonic, by empirical correlations. Thickness of rock with enough permeability to deliver fluids to a well bore.  This property is often called Net reservoir rock.  In the oil and gas industry, another quantity Net Pay is computed which is the thickness of rock that can deliver hydrocarbons to the well bore at a profitable rate.Reservoir models are built upon their measured and derived properties to estimate the amount of hydrocarbon present in the reservoir, the rate at which that hydrocarbon can be produced to the Earths surface through wellbores and the fluid flow in rocks.  In the water resource industry, similar models are used to compute how much water can be produced to the surface over long periods of time, without depleting the aquifer.Rock mechanical propertiesSome petrophysicists use acoustic and density measurements of rocks to compute their mechanical properties and strength.  They measure the compressional (P) wave velocity of sound through the rock and the shear (S) wave velocity and use these with the density of the rock to compute:The rocks compressive strength which is the compressive stress that causes a rock to fail.The rocks flexibility,the relationship between stress and deformation for a rock.  analysis is also used to determine subsurface lithology and porosity.These measurements are useful to design programs to drill wells that produce oil and gas.  The measurements are also used to design dams, roads, foundations for buildings and many other large construction projects.  They can also be used to help interpret seismic signals from the Earth, either man-made seismic signals or those from earthquakes.Ore qualityBore holes can be drilled into ore bodies (for example coal seams or gold ore) and either rock samples taken to determine the ore or coal quality at each bore hole location or the wells can be wireline logged to make measurements that can be used to infer quality.  Some petrophysicists do this sort of analysis.  The information is mapped and used to make mine development plans.Methods of analysisCoring and analysis is a direct measurement of petrophysical properties. In the petroleum industry rock samples are retrieved from subsurface and measured by core labs of oil company or some commercial core measurement service companies. This process is time consuming and expensive, thus can not be applied to all the wells drilled in a field. thumb|300px|Figure 1Well Logging is used as a relatively inexpensive method to obtain petrophysical properties downhole. Measurement tools are conveyed downhole using either wireline or LWD method. An example of wireline logs is shown in Figure 1.  The first track, shows the natural gamma radiation level of the rock.  The gamma radiation level log shows increasing radiation to the right and decreasing radiation to the left.  The rocks emitting less radiation have more yellow shading.  The detector is very sensitive and the amount of radiation is very low.  In clastic rock formations, rocks that have smaller amounts of radiation are more likely to be coarser grained and have more pore space, rocks with higher amounts of radiation are more likely to have finer grains and less pore space (Poupon, Clavier, Dumanoir, Gaymard, and Misk, Journal of Petroleum Technology, July, 1970, page 868).The second track over in the plot records the depth below the reference point which is usually the Kelly bush or rotary table in feet, so these rocks are 11,900 feet below the surface of earth.  In the third track, the electrical resistivity of the rock is presented. The water in this rock is salty and the salt in the water causes the water to be electrically conductive such that lower resistivity is caused by increasing water saturation and decreasing hydrocarbon saturation (Brown, A Mathematical Comparison of Common Saturation Equations, SPWLA twenty-seventh annual logging symposium, June, 1986, paper T, appendix 1).The fourth track, shows the computed water saturation, both as total water (including the water bound to the rock) in magenta and the effective water or water that is free to flow in black.  Both quantities are given as a fraction of the total pore space.  The fifth track shows the fraction of the total rock that is pore space, filled with fluids.  The display of the pore space is divided into green for oil and blue for movable water. The black line shows the fraction of the pore space which contains either water or oil that can move, or be produced. In addition to the what is included in blackline, the magenta line includes the water that is permanently bound to the rock. The last track is a representation of the solid portion of the rock.  The yellow pattern represents the fraction of the rock (excluding fluids) that is composed of coarser grained sandstone.  The gray pattern represents the fraction of rock that is composed of finer grained shale.  The sandstone is the part of the rock that contains the producible hydrocarbons and water.Rock volumetric model for shaly sand formationSymbols and Definitions:thumb|300px|Figure 2, a petrophysical rock model for clastic rock formationThe following definition and petrophysics model are a typical shaly sand formation model which assumes:1. Shale is composed of silt, clay and their bounded water which will not flow. 2. Hydrocarbon are stored only in pore space in sand matrix. T -	Total porosity (PHIT), which includes the pore space in sand and shale. Sw -	Total water saturation, the fraction of the pore space occupied by water.e -	Effective shale corrected porosity which includes only the pore space in sand. The pore space in shale which is filled with bounded water is excluded. Swe -	Effective shale corrected water saturation. The volumetric fraction of e which is occupied by water.Vsh - Volumetric fraction of shale.  This includes medium to very fine silt plus clay and the shale bound water.sh - Shale porosity. Volumetric fraction of pore space in shale. These pore space is filled with bounded water by definition. Key equations:(1-e)(1-Vsh) + Vsh + (1-Vsh)*e*Swe + (1-Vsh)e*(1-Swe)  1Sandstone matrix volume  +  shale volume  +   water volume in sand   +  hydrocarbon volume in sand   total rock volumee   T  Vsh *shSee also* evaluation* relation* law* of Petrophysicists and Well Log AnalystsReferences***External links* RockPhysicistses:Petrofsicaid:Petrofisikit:Petrofisicanl:Petrofysicano:Petrofysikkpl:Petrofizykaru:uk:
6425145
Satya_Nandan
Satya N. Nandan, CF, CBE, a diplomat and lawyer from Fiji specializing in ocean affairs, is Chairman of the and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission, where he began a two-year term on 1 January 2009.(Fijis Satya Nandan is new chair of the Western and Central Pacific Fisheries Commission. Pacific Islands News Association, 12 December 2008.)Until that date, he had been the first Secretary-General of the Seabed Authority, a position he held for three consecutive four-year terms since March 1996. Nandan is a Indian who holds a Law degree from the of London and is a Barrister-at-Law of Lincolns Inn, England. He is also a Barrister and Solicitor of the Supreme Court of Fiji. He was a representative of Fiji at the Nations (1970-76 and 1993-95) and was Fijis Ambassador to the Union, Belgium, France, Italy, Luxembourg and the Netherlands (1976-1980). He has served as Secretary for Foreign Affairs of Fiji.AccomplishmentsNandan has had an extensive career in international relations, both as representative of his country and head of several intergovernmental bodies. Some of his numerous positions include:*Representative of Fiji to Nations committees on decolonization, disarmament, legal and political matters. *Under-Secretary-General of the United Nations and Special Representative of the Secretary-General for the Law of the Sea (1983-1992). *Chairman of the United Nations Conference on Straddling Fish Stocks and Highly Migratory Fish Stocks (1993-95).*Chairman of the Multilateral High Level Conference which negotiated the Convention on the Conservation and Management of Highly Migratory Fish Stocks in the Western and Central Pacific Ocean (1997-2000).*President of the meeting of the States Parties to the 1982 United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea (1994-1996). *Head of the Fiji delegation to the Seabed Committee of the United Nations (1970-1973) and to the Third United Nations Conference on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS) (1973-1982). *Chairman of UNCLOS working groups on the Economic Zone, delimitation of maritime boundaries and the high seas (1975).*Chairman of Negotiating Group 4 of the Conference, which dealt with the participation by landlocked and geographically disadvantaged States in the exploitation of the living resources of the neighbouring exclusive economic zones. *Chairman of an UNCLOS group on production policy relating to deep seabed mining.*Chairman of the of 77 developing States (1978-1979).*Chairman of the Committee of Ambassadors of the African, Caribbean and Pacific States (ACP) to the Economic Community (EEC) in Brussels. He participated in the negotiations for Lome I, II and III Conventions between the ACP Group of States and the EEC. *General Editor and Co-Author of the Law of the Sea Commentary series, published by the Center for Oceans Law and Policy of the of Virginia School of Law. *Chairman of the Board of Trustees of the Nations International School in New York (1996-2001).AwardsNandan was awarded an honorary Doctorate of Law by the Memorial University of Newfoundland, Canada (1995) and an honorary Doctorate by the of the South Pacific (1996). He was accorded the rank of Commander of the British Empire (CBE) in 1978 and was awarded Fijis highest honour, Companion of the Order of Fiji (CF), in 1997. He was honoured with the award of the Grand Cross of the Order of Merit of the Federal Republic of Germany by the President of Germany (1996).  He is married and has one son.External sources* Satya M.Nandan: Biographical Note. International Seabed Authority, Press Release SB/10/14, 2 June 2004.* Curriculum VitaeReferences(
6430035
John_Thompson_(UK_politician)
John Thompson (commonly called Jack Thompson, 27 August 1928 &ndash; 21 July 2011)() was a British Labour Party politician.  He was of Parliament for Wansbeck from 1983 to 1997.References*Times Guide to the House of Commons 1992Jack Thompson MP DLJack Thompson, who died on July 21 aged 82, was a canny if low-key Northumberland miners MP who took to Westminster his experience as a reforming Labour leader of the county council.  Jack Thompson Photo: NORTH NEWS & PICTURESAn undemonstrative Left-winger described by one of the Conservative candidates he defeated as an absolute gentleman, Thompson was MP for Wansbeck for 14 years and a whip for seven. His main achievement was the thwarting of plans for a nuclear power station at Druridge Bay, on the countys majestic North Sea coast. John Thompson (known to all as Jack) was born on August 27 1928, the son of a clerk . Jackie Milburn, Newcastle Uniteds most celebrated footballer, was a cousin. After leaving Bothal School he worked at a local pit, completing his education at Ashington Mining College. He became an electrical engineer, and shift charge engineer at Ellington Colliery. He joined the Labour Party in 1960, and from 1965 was secretary/agent in his constituency. He was elected to Newbiggin council in 1970, and Wansbeck council, which succeeded it, in 1974; the same year he became a county councillor. In 1978 he was elected leader of the countys Labour group, and when the party took control in 1981 he became council leader, implementing many changes and increasing its effectiveness. Thompson saw the Druridge Bay project as a threat to the environment as well as to the coal industry, and was alarmed that a pressurised water reactor  which he considered unsafe  was under consideration by the Central Electricity Generating Board. He therefore persuaded the council to campaign against PWRs as such. It was 1987 before he secured a promise from Lord Marshall, chairman of the CEGB, that there would not be a PWR at Druridge Bay; even then he was unconvinced. When the Wansbeck constituency was created at the 1983 election, George Grant, MP for Morpeth, had the best claim to it, but stood down through ill health. Thompson resigned as leader of the council, and was comfortably elected, with sponsorship from the mineworkers union. At Westminster, he co-sponsored a motion urging a campaign against glue sniffing in schools, attacked diktats from Whitehall which he said were destroying local government, and repeatedly criticised the Conservative governments squeeze on education funding. During the miners strike he argued that some pit closures were due to bad management. In November 1984 he joined MPs from the hard Left Campaign Group in a demonstration in the Chamber that forced suspension of the sitting, over deductions from supplementary benefit for striking miners dependants. When the poll tax was first proposed, Thompson warned ministers that while the rating system was unfair, the community charge would be worse  and uncollectable. Thompsons local government experience led to his appointment to the Education, Science and Arts Select Committee for two years from 1985. Prior to the 1987 election, he told Margaret Thatcher her government was totally ignorant about the depressed economic situation in the North. He went on to attack the absolute folly of breaking up the electricity industry prior to privatisation, campaign against a planned toxic waste plant at North Blyth, and criticised Northumbrias ambulance service for opting out of NHS control without consultation. In 1990 Neil Kinnock appointed Thompson Labours Northern whip. In 1991 he told the Employment Secretary Michael Howard his decision to put an extra 120 million into training programmes meant little compared with 1 billion taken out of the training budget over the previous three years. From 1989, Thompson was a delegate to the Council of Europe and the Western European Union. He chaired the Councils Fisheries subcommittee, and the WEUs rules and privileges committee. He retired from the Commons in 1997. Jack Thompson married, in 1952, Margaret Clarke; they had a son Brian and a daughter Norma also 4 Grand children Andrew, Damien, Eve, Laura and a great grandchild Robbie.
6444411
Central_University_of_Ecuador
Spanish)The Central University of Ecuador () is a university located in Quito, Ecuador.  It is the oldest university in Ecuador, and one of the oldest in the Americas. The enrollment is over 10,000 students per year and the university offers a diverse selection of degrees and specialties.HistoryThe university originated from the unification in 1769 between the University of Quito, also known as University of San Gregorio Magno, and the University of Santo Tomas de Aquino, being the first one Jesuit and created in 1622 from the San Luis seminary, and the second one Dominican, founded in 1688. Both were private.In 1776 the contemporaneous government suppressed the San Gregorio university and in 1786 secularized the Santo Tomas university, and its statute came in effect on October 26, 1787. The Real Universidad de Santo Tomas de Aquino was established in 1800.Once Colombia was formed, higher education became a matter for the State, and therefore, on March 18, 1826, the Congress, dealing with public instruction, dictated a law that, among other things, decreed that In the capitals of the Cundinamarca, Venezuela and Quito Departments there will be established Central Universities that embrace in a greater extent the instruction  of Science and Art. This created the Central University of Ecuador.The university is autonomous and is composed of sixteen schools.OrganizationSchools* School of Architecture and Urbanism* School of Arts* School of Administration* School of Agriculture* School of Engineering* School of Economics* School of Engineering, Physics and Mathematics* School of Geology, Mining, and Environment* School of Law, Political and Social Sciences* School of Medicine* School of Odontology* School of Psychology* School of Pharmacy* School of Philosophy and Pedagogy* School of Communication* School of Medicine See also * of colonial universities in Latin America* of universities in EcuadorExternal links*uce.edu.ec, universitys official website (in Spanish)Central de lEquadorCentral del EcuadorCentral del EcuadorCentral do Equador
6461793
US_Silver
US Silver Corporation () is a mining company based in Idaho near dAlene, Idaho. The chairman of the company is Bobby E. Cooper, the CEO is Tom Parker.In 2006 USSC purchased the Coeur, Caladay, and Galena mines from d Alene Mines Corporation Coeur (NYSE:CDE.). The USSC property covers  over an area about  long east to west and  wide.  The property contains two mines and one exploration shaft. The operating Galena mine is located near the center of the property position, the Coeur mine which is on care and maintenance is about  west of the Galena mine and the Caladay exploration shaft approximately  east of the Galena mine.  History of the district The Coeur dAlene Mining District is one of the pre-eminent silver, lead and zinc producing areas in the world, located near the base of the panhandle of northern Idaho, and has produced over 1 billion ounces of silver. Washington is approximately  to the west and Missoula, Montana is approximately  to the east and extends for over  in a northwest-southeast direction. Galena mine The Galena mine has a long history dating back to 1887 but the modern history and mining commenced by ASARCO in 1953 in an effort to explore and exploit outcrops of silver-lead ore.  At that time a shaft was sunk to the 3000 level (3000 feet below the shaft collar) and lateral or level drifts were excavated on the 2800 and 3000 levels.  The level drifts accessed down dip projections of the silver-lead ore from above.   The development on these levels included, drifting on ore and excavation of raises between the 2800 and 3000 levels and some drilling.  The lead ore was ready for production in 1953 when a drift crew on the east end of the 3000 level exposed a wide siderite-tetrahedrite-chalcopyrite vein that assayed over 50 ounces per ton silver.  ASARCO abandoned the silver-lead development and focused on this new high grade discovery.  The new discovery was called the Silver vein and has been the largest vein found at the Galena to date with estimated production of over 100 million ounces of silver at averages grades of over 20 ounces per ton.   From 1953 until present, all exploration, development and production has been focused on the tetrahedrite silver-copper ores.  Because ASARCO focused its efforts in 1953 on the silver-copper veins no systematic exploration program was ever conducted at the Galena for silver-lead ore until USSC took over in 2006. Total production since 1953 is over 160 million ounces of silver, 116 million pounds of copper and 22.0 million pounds of lead from 7.0 million tons of ore.  Average grade of the silver-copper ore has been 22.89 ounces per ton of silver and 0.83% copper.  Average grade of the silver-lead ore has been 8.18 ounces silver and 8.8% lead per ton of ore.  The mine is currently producing silver-copper ore at a rate of approximately 625 tons per day.  Ore grades are approximately 24.0 ounces per ton silver and 0.76% copper.The present day Galena Mine is an underground silver-copper mine and is served by two vertical shafts. The No. 3 shaft is the primary production shaft and is  deep. The Galena shaft primarily provides utility access for water, electrical power and sand backfill for underground operations down to the 4,900 level.  The Galena mine also has an operating 1,100 ton per day floatation mill, maintenance shop, carpenters shop office and dry facilities.  The mine utilizes conventional and mechanized cut and fill mining methods with sand backfill to extract ore from the high grade silver-copper vein deposits that constitute the majority of the ore reserves. Silver and copper are recovered by a flotation mill that produces a silver rich concentrate which is sold to third-party smelters in Canada. Waste material from the milling process is deposited in a tailings pond located approximately two miles from the minesite. The tailings containment pond, which is expanded on an as needed basis, has capacity for approximately eight additional years at current production rates. Coeur Mine The Coeur Mine is an underground silver mine located adjacent to the Galena Mine.  The Coeur Mine operated until mid-1998 when the property was placed on care and maintenance. There has been no mining activity at the Coeur mine since that time. The Coeur Mine is connected to the Galena Mine, which allows future discoveries at either mine to be developed and processed at either facility. This connection is currently being utilized to provide ventilation and secondary access to the Galena Mine. The Coeur mine produced continuously from 1969 through 1991 and again from 1996 through 1997.  The total production was 39 million ounces of silver and 33 million pounds of copper from 2.4 million tons of ore.  Average ore grades were 16.0 ounces per ton silver and 0.68% copper.  This mine is serviced by an operational three compartment shaft with a double drum hoist that goes to  below the surface.  The Coeur mine also has a 600 ton per day flotation mill, maintenance shop, office and dry facility. The Coeur Mill was put back into production in October, 2007 to process lead-silver ores from the Galena Mine. The concentrates produced are shipped to British Columbia and processed by Teck-Cominco. Caladay Property The Caladay property adjoins the Galena Mine. Prior to its acquisition by Coeur in 1991, approximately $32.5 million was expended on the property to construct surface facilities, a . deep shaft and associated underground workings to explore the property. Similar geologic conditions which exist at the Galena mine extend into Caladay below the level of the current workings. The facilities are used to benefit the Galena Mine operations by providing additional ventilation.  Mineralization Ore deposits of the Coeur dAlene Mining District and USSC are hosted by slightly metamorphosed Precambrian sedimentary rocks of the Supergroup. Belt strata are composed primarily of fine-grained quartz and original clay (now metamorphosed to fine-grained white mica, or sericite). Although the composition of these metasediments varies widely, three major rock types are generally recognized.  These rock type definitions were first applied in the district to the Revett Formation (White and Wilson, 1982) but have since been used in describing other Belt formations as well.  The rock types are; quartzite, quartzite, and siltite-argillite.The ore bodies at USSCs property occur as steeply dipping fissure filling veins.  The veins cut through the rocks of the Revett Formation and are found along major fracture systems and major faults.  The veins generally strike east west and northeast southwest and range in thickness from a few inches to over fifteen feet. Two different ore bearing sulfide assemblages are found at the Galena, a silver-copper ore and a silver-lead ore. Grades of the silver-copper veins range from a few ounces of silver to over a thousand ounces of silver per ton and since 1953 have averaged over 22 ounces per ton.  Copper grades range from tenths of a percent to over two percent and since 1953 have averaged 0.83 percent per ton.  Grades of the silver-lead ores average approximately 13 ounces of silver and 16% lead per ton.The cross-section shows the Revett Formation in the core of the Big Creek anticline and the position of the productive veins discovered to date on the north limb of the anticline.  The beds dip steeply to the north and the faults dip steeply to the south.  On a local scale the Revett Formation consists of interbeds of hard (brittle) and soft (ductile) units; the interbed can be from inches thick to over  thick. Exploration targeting Historic exploration at the Galena and Coeur mines was carried out by following the trend of the veins with drifting and diamond drilling.  This method was successful but it is believed that it did not allow for recognition of the larger picture of the geologic interplay of faults, veins, and stratigraphy.  One obvious effect of the trend based exploration was that the underground workings at the Galena mine were developed in NW-SE direction from the central shafts.  The directional development has caused large prospective areas of the Galena and Coeur mines to remain unexplored.  One such area is the hanging wall of the Polaris fault.  The single largest and most productive vein in the Galena and Coeur mines is the Galenas Silver vein which has produced over 25 million ounces of silver and is located in the hanging wall of the Polaris fault.  The trend based exploration caused the workings to be developed in northwesterly trend because of numerous secondary ore vein bearing veins in the footwall of the silver vein.  This development direction caused the workings to cross into the footwall of the Polaris leaving the entire hanging wall of the Polaris fault virtually unexplored for about  from the eastern side of the Galena to the boundary with the Sunshine Mine.Structural control on vein mineralization has long been recognized in the Coeur dAlene District.  However, using these observations in developing predictive exploration models has proven difficult.  With the advent of 3-D modeling software the integration of structure, stratigraphy and geochemistry into a three-dimensional model for use in exploration has been facilitated and is being carried out at Coeur Silver Valley.  The basis of the current structural work at the Galena is that the emplacement of the vein arrays is structurally controlled.  There are secondary controls imposed by stratigraphy and geochemistry but structure is considered the most dominant because the movement of fluid required for vein and mineral precipitation requires the presence of active structures.  A geometric model of the Coeur-Galena was constructed in Datamine Studio software, which has allowed for examination of the faults and veins and their relationships to one another.See also* Hard rock miningExternal links* US SilverSilver
6476851
Midelt
footnotes                Midelt () is a town in central Morocco, in the high plains between the Atlas and Atlas mountain ranges. With an estimated population of 44,780, Midelt serves as the commercial center of a large agricultural hinterland. It is also one of Moroccos principal cities for the mining of several minerals. Coordinates: .GeographyMidelt is situated on the main road between Fes and Meknes to the north and Errachidia to the south. Geographically, it is situated in the high plains surrounding the River, between the Middle and Atlas mountain ranges. The citys elevation is , making it one of the highest large towns in Morocco.ClimateThe elevation of Midelt cools the daily temperatures to make Midelt one of the most temperate of the inland towns. However, many coastal towns have milder temperatures, warmer in winter and cooler in summer.Temperature averages, from the years 1961 to 1990, yield daily maximum/minimum temperatures for January as 12.3 / 0.6 degrees Celsius and for July as 32.6 / 16.3 degrees Celsius.(  Climatological Info. for Midelt, Morocco,  Hong Kong Observatory, 2003, webpage:   HKO-Midelt.)Snow is common in winter, and precipitation continues throughout the year at moderate levels. However, the principal water source of the region is a spring at the foot of Ayachi,  south of Midelt.A dam moderating the flow from the spring was destroyed by a flood in early 2006 following heavy snows the previous winter, damaging the nearby village of Tattiwin.Historyright|thumb|200px|The former French governors residence, now cultural Centre Tarik Ibn ZyadMidelt grew in the first half of the 20th century around a French administrative post by the same name. Previously, villages and ksour had dotted the fertile surroundings. The French established their post to facilitate the mining of lead, gypsum, other minerals, and fossils in the nearby Ahouli and Mibladen mines and elsewhere. The development of these mines led to the construction of a railroad from Midelt to the Mediterranean coast and the electrification of Midelt in 1930. In Morocco, only Casablanca received electricity earlier.After Moroccan independence in 1956, control reverted to the Moroccan government, which occupied the European-style buildings of the former French quarter. Midelt no longer has a regional administrative function; it has his own province but its Wilayah is seated in Meknes.PeopleMidelt is a largely Berber (Amazigh) city with a sizable minority who identify themselves as Arabs. Berber residents speak the Middle Atlas language Tamazight as well as the Arabic dialect, known as Darija. A typical resident will speak Tamazight at home but Darija in public. Educated residents also speak Standard Arabic and French, which are used throughout Morocco in mass media, education, and government.Because Midelt is a new city, almost all Mideltis can trace their roots either to one of the nearby villages or to elsewhere in Morocco. The city also lacks the sharply defined neighborhood divisions and traditional souqs of older Moroccan cities.Very few non-natives live in Midelt. Of these, the longest established are a community of Franciscan nuns and Cistercian monks living at the Monastery of Our Lady of the Atlas in a nearby village. The nuns work with local women and girls to develop handcrafts and teach hygiene, language, and other skills.Economyright|thumb|300px|Plums grow in the village of Berrem, south of MideltMidelt functions as the market for an agricultural area extending from the Moulouya River to Jbel Ayachi, bounded on the east and west by dry plains. This region is best known for apples; other produce includes walnuts, apricots, plums, pomegranates, wheat, corn, and a wide variety of garden vegetables.Nomads and sedentary farmers from the surrounding area also raise sheep and goats for slaughter and for wool. Both of these are sold in Midelt, but largely for local consumption. Locally gathered evidence indicates that the local price of meat is inversely related to rainfall: in wet years, nomads can keep their herds alive through the summer and do not bring them to market; in dry years, animals are better sold than lost to draught.Midelts industrial sector is largely related to the nearby mines, of which only Mibladen continues to operate at high capacity. Lead, gypsum, and a host of lesser-known minerals are extracted for sale to industry and for household decorations.Tourism continues to grow as an important source of revenue for Midelt. The climate attracts many visitors, mostly Moroccans from lower climes and migrs to Europe. These support several small hotels as well as two larger establishments catering to Europeans. In addition to visitors, local handcrafts - especially carpets and blankets in the roughhewn nomadic style - are sold through cooperatives and merchants both locally and in Moroccos larger cities.ReferencesExternal links* Midelt Portal* Association Solidarit de Midelt* A.U.D.I.* Monastery of Our Ladyof the Atlasar:fa:fr:Mideltit:Mideltpt:Mideltsv:Midelt
6486467
Jericho_Diamond_Mine
thumb|300px|Jericho Diamond Mine from the AirThe Jericho Diamond Mine is a dormant diamond mine located in Canadas Nunavut territory. Jericho is Nunavuts first and only diamond mine. It is located  northeast of Yellowknife, Territories and is accessible by air all year and by road from Yellowknife. The project was mined from 2006 to 2008, and produced  of diamonds from  of kimberlite mined from the open pit operation. Over $200 million was invested in the development of the Jericho operations including the construction of a  per day diamond recovery plant, maintenance facility, fuel farm, and offices and accommodation for 225 personnel.On July 19, 2010 Shear Minerals Ltd, a diamond exploration company focused on the Nunavut region, announced its purchase of the Jericho Diamond Mine.(Press release announcing sale ) In late 2010, Shear announced that it would take about a year to devise a plan to reopen the mine. (Shear plans to reopen mine)OperationsThe mine was developed, opened and operated by Tahera Diamond Corporation. The company was provided with CAN $35 million loan by & Co. to assist in construction of the site, as part of a marketing alliance. The mine produced diamonds from 2006 to February 2008, and was Taheras only mining operation. The company reported financial losses in 2007 due to operational difficulties, the high value of the Canadian dollar, high oil prices, and the short operating season of the Tibbitt to Contwoyto road in 2006. Tahera filed for protection from creditors in January 2008, and the mine stopped recovering diamonds once existing ore stockpiles ran out, one month later.There is no registered airport at the site so all heavy equipment had to be brought in by the Tibbitt to Contwoyto winter road. Due to the remoteness of the site the mine was part of the impetus for a proposal to build a port near the community of Bathurst Inlet with a road to both Diamond Mine and Diamond Mine.ProductionThe mine was estimated to be able to produce  a year with a value of CAN $25 million. In the first half of 2006 the mine had processed  for .See also*pipeNotes and references	*Tahera Diamond Corporation - Jericho exploration*Tahera Diamond Corporation - Jericho Diamond Mine*Government of Canada - backgrounder on Mining in the North*CBC report on construction of the mine*NNSL Opportunities North - deep water port at Bathurst Inlet
6492983
Byron_Grote
Byron E. Grote (born 1948 (Notice of BP Annual Meeting 2010 - Dr. Byron Grote biography)(Byron Grote article - NNDB)) is currently an Executive Member of BP. He has been with the company since 1987 following their acquisition of Oil of Ohio where he had worked since 1979. He took the position of Executive member in 2002. He received an M.S. (1967) and Ph.D (1981) in Quantitative Analysis from University, both from Cornells Johnson Graduate School of Management.(Cornell University Alumni Listing - Cf. Byron Grote MS 67 JGSM, PhD 81 JGSM.)Grotes annual salary from BP is $1,340,000. In 2008 his bonus from BP was $1,742,000.() Career Grote joined Oil of Ohio in 1979. He had management responsibilities in international oil supply planning, logistics and crude oil trading.(Dr Byron E Grote: Non-Executive Director - Unilever director biography)In 1985, he was made director of planning for Kennecott, the mining subsidiary of Standard Oil. In 1986 he was appointed vice-president of retail sales.(After BP acquired the Standard Oil minority, he was appointed in 1988 as commercial-vice president for the companys Alaskan production activities. He moved to London soon after to become commercial general manager for BP Exploration.(In 1992 he became group treasurer and chief executive officer of BP Finance, before moving to Colombia as regional chief executive. In 1995 he returned to London to become deputy chief executive officer of BP Exploration.(In 1999, after the merger of BP and Amoco, he was executive vice-president for Exploration and Production.(In 2002 he was appointed to the post of officer for BP.(http://www.bp.com/managedlistingsection.do?categoryId9021802&contentId7040609)ReferencesExternal links* Official biography (BP plc)* BP plc (ADR) on Google Finance
